OVERSIGHT  OF 

TRANSPORTATION  SECURITY  ADMINISTRATION 

(TSA)  FISCAL  YEAR  2009  BUDGET 

S.  HRG.  110–1159 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

MAY  13,  2008 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

75–355 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

PAUL NAGLE,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on May 13, 2008 
...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Kerry  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator McCaskill  .............................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Berrick,  Cathleen  A.,  Director,  Homeland  Security  and  Justice  Issues,  U.S. 
Government Accountability Office  ......................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Hawley, Hon. Edmund S. ‘‘Kip’’, Assistant Secretary and Administrator, TSA, 
U.S. Department of Homeland Security  .............................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Response to written questions submitted by Hon. Daniel K. Inouye to: 

Cathleen A. Berrick  ..........................................................................................
Hon. Edmund S. ‘‘Kip’’ Hawley 
.......................................................................
Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  Roger  F.  Wicker  to  Hon. 
Edmund S. ‘‘Kip’’ Hawley  ....................................................................................

Page 
1 
1 
45 
41 
2 
2 

11 
12 

3 
5 

65 
49 

62 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

OVERSIGHT  OF  TRANSPORTATION  SECURITY 
ADMINISTRATION  (TSA)  FISCAL  YEAR  2009 
BUDGET 

TUESDAY,  MAY  13,  2008 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10  a.m.  in  room  SR– 
253, Russell Senate Office Building, Hon. Daniel K. Inouye, Chair-
man of the Committee, presiding. 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

The CHAIRMAN. I apologize for being late. 
The public’s confidence in the safety and security of our transpor-
tation systems is vital to our social and economic well-being. Since 
the tragic events of September 11th, there is no doubt that we have 
made  significant  progress  in  strengthening  the  security  of  our 
transportation network. 

Following  the  attacks,  Congress  moved  to  quickly  create  the 
Transportation  Security  Administration  to  better  secure  aviation, 
port,  and  surface  transportation  infrastructure.  And  as  you  are 
aware, we have continued to refine our efforts through subsequent 
legislation since the initial creation of the TSA. 

Just  this  past  year,  the  Commerce  Committee  was  instrumental 
in  the  passage  of  the  Implementing  Recommendations  of  the  9/11 
Commission  Act  of  2007.  This  legislation  closes  potential  loopholes 
in  our  Nation’s  aviation  security  regime  by  making  significant  im-
provements  in  air  and  maritime  cargo  security,  airline  passenger 
explosives screening, and the oversight of foreign repair stations. 

Additionally,  the  9/11  Act  dramatically  expands  and  improves 
Federal  security  efforts  for  the  Nation’s  major  surface  transpor-
tation  modes  by  authorizing  new  security  assessments,  grant  pro-
grams,  security  measures  for  passenger  and  freight  railroads, 
trucks, intercity buses, and pipelines. 

While I am confident that the goals of the 9/11 Act will be accom-
plished, the TSA’s Fiscal Year 2009 budget proposal raises a num-
ber of concerns in this regard. The Administration’s complete over-
haul  of  the  TSA  budget  structure  makes  it  unclear  whether  the 
mandates  in  the  9/11  Act  are  receiving  proper  resources  for  imple-
mentation,  particularly  with  regard  to  improvements  in  surface 
transportation security. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

It  is  also  unclear  why  the  Administration  is  asking  to  increase 
funding  for  baggage  screening  when  they  have  been  slow  to  em-
brace  the  provisions  in  the  9/11  Act  for  this  activity  and,  in  fact, 
have not fully utilized the resources already provided. 

We must ensure our Nation remains vigilant in pursuing the se-
curity  of  our  transportation  systems  and  continues  to  adapt  to 
evolving threats. It is critical that the Administration work collabo-
ratively  with  this  Committee  and  other  stakeholders  to  avoid  the 
management problems of the past, ensure the agency has sufficient 
resources,  and  move  forward  with  implementing  the  provisions  of 
the  9/11  Act  in  a  quick  and  effective  manner.  And  I  look  forward 
to hearing how we can best accomplish these tasks. 

It  is  my  privilege  to  call  upon  the  Vice  Chairman  of  the  Com-

mittee. 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator  STEVENS.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  am  sorry  to  be  slightly  late. 
I  do  thank  you  for  holding  the  hearing  and  welcome  the  panel.  I 
look forward to hearing from them again. 

We  know  the  challenges  of  securing  the  vast  transportation  sys-
tem,  and  it  will  continue  to  grow,  I  think.  Those  challenges  will 
continue  to  grow.  The  role  of  TSA  is  often  thankless  and  obstacle 
ridden.  I  do  commend  you  at  the  TSA  for  what  has  been  done.  I 
think there has to be a great deal more done, as the Chairman has 
said. 

We  set  forth  an  ambitious  and  demanding  aviation  and  surface 
mode security schedule for TSA in last year’s 9/11 Act. The proper 
implementation  of  those  goals  will  take  efficient  use  of  an  always 
strained and stretched budget, and we don’t expect it to expand too 
much this year. 

We  do  thank  you  again,  Mr.  Chairman.  Look  forward  to  this 

hearing and the questions I have available to ask them today. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Stevens follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Thank  you,  Chairman  Inouye,  for  holding  today’s  hearing.  I  welcome  our  distin-
guished  panel  and  thank  you  for  your  testimony.  The  Committee  intimately  knows 
the  challenges  of  securing  our  vast  transportation  system  while  also  maintaining 
the  flow  of  commerce.  The  role  of  TSA  is  often  thankless  and  obstacle-ridden,  and 
the  Committee  commends  you  on  your  progress;  however,  there  is  much  that  still 
needs to be done. 

Congress  set  forth  an  ambitious  and  demanding  aviation  and  surface  mode  secu-
rity  schedule  for  TSA  in  last  year’s  9/11  Act.  Proper  implementation  of  those  goals 
will take efficient use of an always strained and stretched budget. 

In the 9/11 bill, the Chairman and I authored a provision to dramatically improve 
the  deployment  and  installation  of  in-line  baggage  systems  at  our  Nation’s  airports 
by utilizing multi-year letters of intent that would allow airports to leverage govern-
ment  contributions  in  the  bond  market.  That  provision  also  utilized  existing  funds 
and did not require additional cost on the air carriers and their customers. 

However, instead of embracing and effectively utilizing our provision, the TSA has 
included  a  proposal  for  a  temporary  increase  in  the  existing  passenger  security  fee 
to  purchase  and  install  explosive  detection  machines  and  in-line  checked  baggage 
systems. 

While the Committee appreciates the idea of expediting deployment of the in-line 
baggage systems, the Committee cannot support an increase in the passenger secu-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

rity fee. During these times of economic instability we cannot afford to put an addi-
tional burden on our air carriers and passengers. 

We  are  approaching  a  serious  period  of  transition  and  it  is  imperative  that  TSA 
set  the  foundation  for  continuity  in  security,  regardless  of  the  outcome  of  the  next 
Presidential  election.  Security  should  not  be  subject  to  political  differences  or  ap-
pointment; it needs to be stable in both the short and long-terms. 

To  assist  the  transition,  the  Agency  needs  to  get  Secure  Flight,  the  national  pas-
senger  pre-screening  program,  operational.  The  Agency  needs  to  effectively  deploy 
new technology at our checkpoints to improve explosive detection. The reported lack 
of  screener  proficiency  is  not  acceptable.  We  cannot  operate  under  a  false  sense  of 
security; we need screener accuracy and real security. 

Finally, I want Mr. Hawley to know how important it is to our economy that the 
air  cargo  screening  benchmarks  be  met.  I  encourage  TSA  to  work  diligently  and 
quickly  to  attain  100  percent  screening  of  air  cargo,  within  the  bicameral  agreed- 
upon  benchmarks  that  were  set  within  the  9/11  bill.  It  is  essential  that  TSA  maxi-
mize  the  screening  of  cargo  on  commercial  aircraft  without  causing  negative  reper-
cussions on the flow of commerce. 

In Alaska, Anchorage International Airport continues to be the number one cargo 
airport  in  the  U.S.,  and  the  third  largest  worldwide  based  on  cargo  weight  landed. 
In addition to our all-cargo operations, the airport is also a major transfer point for 
passenger  air  cargo,  or  what  we  like  to  call  ‘‘combi’s’’.  The  improved  screening  of 
passenger air cargo will provide a higher level of safety and security to my constitu-
ents. It is important to our economy that you meet those benchmarks. 

Thank you Mr. Chairman, I look forward to hearing from our witnesses. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Before  I  proceed,  I  would  like  to  advise  the  witnesses  and  the 
Committee  that  at  approximately  11  a.m.  this  morning,  we  will  be 
having a series of roll call votes. 

With that, we are pleased to have witnesses of very distinguished 
citizens.  First,  the  Honorable  Edmund  ‘‘Kip’’  Hawley,  Assistant 
Secretary for Homeland Security, Transportation Security Adminis-
tration,  and  the  Honorable  Cathleen  Berrick,  Director,  Homeland 
Security and Justice Issues, Government Accountability Office. 

May I call upon Secretary Hawley? 

STATEMENT  OF  HON.  EDMUND  S.  ‘‘KIP’’  HAWLEY,  ASSISTANT 
SECRETARY  AND  ADMINISTRATOR,  TSA,  U.S.  DEPARTMENT 
OF HOMELAND SECURITY 
Mr. HAWLEY. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, Vice Chairman Stevens. 
It is a pleasure to be on the panel again with Cathy Berrick from 
GAO,  and  I  am  also  pleased  to  appear  to  discuss  the  President’s 
Fiscal Year 2009 budget proposal and TSA’s program activities. 

TSA’s focus in the year ahead continues to be improving the abil-
ity of our Transportation Security Officers to detect improvised ex-
plosive  devices  and  other  threats  to  aviation  security  beyond  pro-
hibited items. 

Today,  our  threat  environment  remains  high,  and  TSA’s  chal-
lenge is to defeat known terrorist threats, as well as those the ter-
rorists  invent  specifically  to  get  around  our  technology  and  proce-
dures. This requires us to use technology, our people, and our proc-
ess  in  ways  that  are  effective,  yet  flexible  enough  so  that 
vulnerabilities cannot be exploited and predicted. 

On  the  technology  front,  millimeter  wave  whole  body  imaging 
technology  is  now  deployed  at  JFK,  Los  Angeles,  Phoenix,  and 
Thurgood  Marshall  Baltimore/Washington  International  Airport. 
We  will  deploy  at  least  30  more  of  those  machines  by  year  end. 
Also  by  year  end,  we  will  deploy  600  Advance  Technology  (AT)  X- 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

ray  machines  to  improve  detection  of  IEDs  by  giving  our  officers  a 
much clearer picture of what is in a carry-on bag. 

To  get  the  most  out  of  this  technology  investment,  every  TSO 
working at a checkpoint will undergo this year an extensive twelve 
hour  training,  bringing  together  the  latest  thinking  from  intel-
ligence, explosives detection, and human factors that can affect se-
curity. This will give us the tools to go on offense, to make security 
smarter and harder to beat. 

Underway  now  is  the  most  significant  checkpoint  redesign  in  30 
years.  We  call  it  Checkpoint  Evolution,  an  integrated  security 
checkpoint  bringing  together  the  three  elements  of  people,  includ-
ing  passengers;  technology;  and  better  process.  The  prototype  is 
now  operational  at  BWI.  The  checkpoint  configuration  and  tech-
nology  supports  a  team  approach  that  is  calmer  and  more  condu-
cive to smart security. 

Smart  security  involves  layers.  Risk-based,  layered  security  con-
tinues as a major priority for the year ahead and is reflected in the 
President’s  Fiscal  Year  2009  budget  request.  We  have  added  new 
layers  of  security  in  front  of  the  checkpoint  and  to  other  areas  of 
the airport, including the Travel Document Checkers; Behavior De-
tection Officers who can identify someone who may be a threat be-
fore  they  get  to  the  checkpoint,  let  alone  the  aircraft;  Bomb  Ap-
praisal  Officers  to  help  with  IED  training  and  detection;  and  our 
VIPR  teams  that  intensify  the  visible  presence  of  security  in  both 
aviation and surface modes. 

And  I  would  like  to  point  out  on  the  issue  of  the  surface  modes, 
we have done almost 1,000 of these VIPR teams. Over half of them 
have been in the surface mode. In fact, there was one yesterday in 
Atlanta that I was a part of. So the VIPR teams apply both on the 
aviation side and on surface transportation. 

We  have  also  added  employee  screening  to  protect  the  back  side 
of airports, where we are running a 90-day test of employee screen-
ing  in  seven  airports,  including  Boston,  Denver,  and  Jacksonville, 
Florida. 

To  put  this  in  perspective,  by  the  end  of  2008,  the  vast  majority 
of  passengers  will  be  covered  by  Behavior  Detection  Officers;  100 
percent  of  passengers  will  be  covered  by  Travel  Document  Check-
ers; and over half the flying public by AT X-ray. Every airport now 
has  random  screening  every  day  of  its  employees.  All  of  these  pro-
grams work together as connected pieces in a multi-layered, multi- 
modal,  total  security  system  to  put  us  one  step  ahead  of  evolving 
threats. 

In  prior  hearings,  we  have  discussed  TWIC,  the  Transportation 
Worker  Identification  Credential,  and  Secure  Flight,  and  a  quick 
update is in order on both of those. 

TWIC  is  on  track.  The  compliance  date  is  now  set  at  April  15, 
2009,  which  does  allow  18  months  for  the  enrollment  period.  We 
have  already  got  over  250,000  people  enrolled  and  are  in  place  to 
begin enforcement this October. 

On Secure Flight, the budget request includes an increase of $32 
million  to  accelerate  the  implementation.  And  with  this  Commit-
tee’s  ongoing  support,  we  anticipate  beginning  the  Secure  Flight 
program at the end of 2008 and full program implementation in the 
coming year. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

I  would  like  to  once  again  thank  the  Committee  for  its  support 
of  TSA  and  its  mission.  I  look  forward  to  discussing  all  these 
issues. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Hawley follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. EDMUND S. ‘‘KIP’’ HAWLEY, ASSISTANT SECRETARY 

AND ADMINISTRATOR, TSA, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY 

Good morning Chairman Inouye, Vice Chairman Stevens, and distinguished mem-
bers  of  the  Committee.  Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  today  to  provide 
an update on the Transportation Security Administration’s (TSA) efforts to improve 
aviation  and  surface  transportation  security  and  to  present  the  President’s  budget 
request for TSA for Fiscal Year (FY) 2009 (Request). 

I would like to begin by thanking the members of the Committee for your support 
of  TSA’s  initiatives  to  improve  existing  security  measures  and  to  implement  addi-
tional layers of security. I especially want to thank the Members of this Committee 
for your support of the supplemental funding provided in the U.S. Troop Readiness, 
Veterans’ Care, Katrina Recovery, and Iraq Accountability Appropriations Act, 2007, 
P.L. 110–28, (FY07 Supplemental Act), and the level of funding in the Consolidated 
Appropriations Act, 2008, P.L. 110–161 (FY08 Consolidated Act), which funded crit-
ical  needs  that  the  Administration  identified  in  its  Budget  Amendment.  These  two 
Acts  enhanced  TSA’s  ability  to  implement  vital  security  measures  to  face  ongoing 
and emerging threats. 
Ongoing Threat 

The  effort  to  protect  the  security  of  transportation  systems  remains  as  important 
now  as  it  ever  has  been  in  the  past  six  and  a  half  years.  Since  August  10,  2006, 
the Nation’s threat level for all commercial aviation operating in or destined for the 
United States has been High, or Orange. The Annual Threat Assessment of the Di-
rector  of  National  Intelligence  released  on  February  5,  2008,  confirmed  that  terror-
ists  continue  to  pose  significant  threats  to  the  United  States.  Terrorists  are  likely 
to  continue  to  focus  on  prominent  infrastructure  targets  with  the  goal  of  producing 
mass casualties and significant economic aftershocks. Our enemies are adaptive and 
innovative  in  overcoming  security  obstacles.  This  threat  is  real,  persistent,  and 
evolving. We know they are working to defeat us, and we must remain vigilant. 
FY09 Budget Overview 

The President’s overall Request of $7.1 billion for TSA reflects a total increase of 
$286  million  over  the  FY  2008  enacted  level.  Of  the  total  request,  a  significant 
amount supports annualization of initiatives expanded in FY 2008 as well as a pro-
gram increase of $32M for Secure Flight and $30M for Other Vetting activities. The 
Request  is  comprised  of  $5.3  billion  for  Aviation  Security,  which  now  includes  the 
Federal  Air  Marshal  Service  (FAMS);  $37  million  for  Surface  Transportation  Secu-
rity;  $170  million 
for  Transportation  Threat  Assessment  and 
Credentialing; and $926 million for Transportation Security Support. 
Improving Efficiency in Transportation Security 

funding 

in 

Although  we  face  a  seemingly  unlimited  number  of  possible  scenarios  to  attack 
our transportation systems, we must execute our risk-based approach to security as 
efficient stewards of taxpayer dollars. We also know that prudent financial and pro-
gram management improve security by increasing the effectiveness of existing secu-
rity  measures  and  allow  us  to  expand  the  layers  of  security  while  improving  TSA’s 
interaction with the traveling public. 

TSA has aggressively pursued a number of initiatives to improve our overall effi-
ciency. First, by investing in our most important asset, our workforce, we can deploy 
higher  performing  Transportation  Security  Officers  (TSO).  The  Career  Progression 
Program has been in effect for a full year in FY 2007. This program provides wide-
spread  career  growth  and  professional  development  opportunities  for  high-per-
forming  TSOs.  We  continued  workplace  safety  initiatives  by  requiring  local  safety 
teams  at  field  operation  locations  and  expanded  the  Nurse  Case  Management  Pro-
gram  to  help  our  injured  employees  receive  proper  and  timely  medical  care  and  re-
habilitation.  As  a  result,  we  reduced  the  Lost  Time  Case  Rate  from  4,367  injuries 
or  illnesses  in  FY  2006  to  3,228  in  FY  2007—a  26.1  percent  reduction  to  7.19  inju-
ries  per  200,000  work  hours.  We  provide  part-time  employees  with  full-time  health 
benefits. And, we require our field operations to maintain a robust Model Workplace 
Program  to  facilitate  creative  ways  to  improve  our  employees’  work  environment. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

These  efforts  contributed  to  reducing  our  TSO  attrition  rate:  full-time  attrition  de-
creased  from  13.6  percent  in  2004  to  11.6  percent  in  2007,  and  part-time  attrition 
dropped from 57.8 percent in 2004 to 37.2 in 2007. Our attrition rates include those 
employees who have chosen to continue their Federal service at other DHS and non- 
DHS  agencies.  The  reduction  in  attrition  saves  TSA  many  incremental  costs,  such 
as hiring and training expenses, and increases security by resulting in a more expe-
rienced  and  efficient  TSO  workforce.  Our  change  from  a  centralized  hiring  process 
to  one  coordinated  at  the  local  airport  level  has  reduced  our  hiring  cost  per  TSO 
by over 36 percent from FY 2004 to FY 2007. 

TSA  continues  to  seek  efficiencies  in  our  field  operations.  Through  the  use  of  the 
Staffing  Allocation  Model  (SAM),  we  are  able  to  identify  operational  and  efficiency 
gains  by  better  utilization  of  our  TSOs.  We  improved  our  TSO  scheduling  to  more 
accurately  follow  passenger  loads  and  air  carrier  schedules.  We  increased  the  use 
of  part-time  employees  and  expanded  the  use  of  ‘‘split-shift’’  employees  to  increase 
staffing  during  high  volume  periods,  which  lowered  our  overtime  pay  significantly. 
We  continue  to  install  computers  at  or  near  screening  checkpoints  to  allow  a  more 
efficient use of TSO time for training and reduce their time away from checkpoints. 
The deployment of new technology in FY 2007 increased threat detection and im-
proved  efficiencies  in  checkpoint  throughput,  and  will  continue  to  increase  as  the 
deployment  of  these  technologies  expand  in  FY  2008.  We  added  23  in-line  Explo-
sives  Detection  Systems  (EDS)  for  checked  baggage  screening  at  airports.  We  plan 
to  deploy  over  600  Advance  Technology  (AT)  X-ray  machines  by  the  end  of  2008  to 
improve  detection  of  improvised  explosive  devices  and  increase  passenger  through-
put by providing enhanced, multiview visual detection capabilities for TSOs. Bottled 
Liquid Scanners enhance our ability to discriminate between explosive or flammable 
liquids  and  benign  liquids.  TSA  introduced  millimeter  wave  in  Phoenix,  and  rolled 
out  this  technology  at  LAX,  JFK,  and  BWI  this  spring.  This  technology  can  detect 
items  concealed  on  the  body,  including  plastics,  through  a  robotic  image  that  will 
be  viewed  from  a  remote  location.  TSA  will  be  working  to  socialize  this  technology 
with  the  American  public.  It  is  already  in  use  in  international  transportation 
venues, and will improve security while maintaining passenger privacy by ensuring 
that images will not be saved or stored. We anticipate deploying 30 millimeter wave 
machines by the end of 2008. 

We  improved  our  financial  management  in  many  areas,  to  include  increased  col-
lection  of  late  payment  interest  penalties,  enhanced  internal  controls  over  financial 
reporting,  reduced  funding  carryover,  and  payroll  estimates  adjusted  for  vacancy 
rates. 
Improving Workforce, Effectiveness 

TSA’s risk-based approach to security uses unpredictable, flexible, and layered se-
curity measures. Our investments in people, processes, and technology have allowed 
us to continue a proactive philosophy of deploying flexible security procedures. 

In FY 2007, we significantly improved security at airports by deploying our work-
force  in  new  locations  and  for  new  functions.  We  expanded  the  Travel  Document 
Checker  (TDC)  program  to  over  340  federalized  airports.  The  TDC  program  en-
hances  security  by  disrupting  and  detecting  individuals  who  attempt  to  board  an 
aircraft with fraudulent documents. 

We deployed hundreds of Behavior Detection Officers (BDO) at the 40 busiest air-
ports  as  part  of  the  Screening  Passengers  by  Observation  Technique  (SPOT)  pro-
gram. BDOs are trained to identify potentially high-risk individuals who exhibit be-
haviors that indicate hostile intent. An incident last month in Orlando, Florida, dis-
played  the  effectiveness  and  importance  of  this  program.  On  April  1,  2008,  a  Ja-
maica-bound  passenger,  Kevin  Brown,  aroused  suspicion  of  BDOs,  who,  working  in 
conjunction  with  the  Orlando  Police  Department,  the  Orange  County  Bomb  Squad, 
and  the  Federal  Bureau  of  Investigation,  uncovered  everything  needed  to  make  a 
bomb  in  the  passenger’s  checked  bag.  Their  swift  action  demonstrated  that  BDOs, 
trained to detect deceptive and suspicious behavior, are contributing to airline secu-
rity by detecting and discovering dangerous people and dangerous items. 

We  launched  nationwide  deployment  of  Visible  Intermodal  Prevention  and  Re-
sponse  (VIPR)  teams  in  aviation  and  surface  transportation  sectors,  comprised  of 
TSOs,  BDOs,  Transportation  Security  Inspectors  (TSI),  and  FAMs,  in  cooperation 
with Federal, state and local law enforcement as well as various transportation enti-
ties.  VIPR  teams  enhance  the  security  of  persons  and  critical  infrastructure;  and 
prevent,  prepare  for,  protect  against,  and  respond  to  acts  of  terrorism  in  all  modes 
of  transportation  at  any  location.  We  very  much  appreciate  the  strong  support  the 
Congress  gave  to  the  VIPR  program  in  the  FY  2008  appropriation  and  the  Imple-
menting  Recommendations  of  the  9/11  Commission  Act  of  2007,  P.L.  110–53  (9/11 
Act), which allowed us to expand the program to over 900 VIPR operations to date. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

We  allocated  approximately  700  FTE  for  the  Aviation  Direct  Access  Screening  Pro-
gram  (ADASP),  which  conducts  random  and  unpredictable  screening  of  individuals 
employed  at  airports  and  their  accessible  property  that  are  entering  secured  areas 
of  airports.  TSA  implemented  all  these  actions  through  innovative  uses  of  our  re-
sources. 
FY 2009 Budget Request 

The Request is presented in a structure that proposes realignment and consolida-
tion  of  certain  Program,  Project  or  Activity  (PPA)  elements.  The  proposed  changes 
will enhance the transparency of program accountability and simplify financial man-
agement  by  aligning  operational  program  and  personnel  funding  under  the  same 
PPA.  Many  full-time  equivalents  (FTE)  associated  with  certain  operational  pro-
grams  are  currently  shown  in  the  Headquarters  Administration  PPA.  For  example, 
FTE associated with the training of TSOs will be realigned to the Screener Training 
and  Other  PPA.  Additionally,  National  Explosives  Detection  Canine  Team  (K–9) 
funding  from  several  current  PPAs  would  be  consolidated  under  a  single  National 
Explosives  Detection  Canine  Team  Program.  The  proposed  PPA  changes  will  more 
closely mirror TSA’s organizational structure and increase the accountability of sen-
ior leadership for their respective programs. 

The Request proposes the realignment of FAMS funding by eliminating the sepa-
rate appropriation and incorporating it as a single PPA within the Aviation Security 
account.  The  proposed  realignment  will  complete  the  integration  of  the  FAMS  back 
into  TSA  and  enhance  our  ability  to  respond  more  rapidly  to  emerging  threats  to 
transportation. 
Aviation Security 

The  Request  builds  upon  the  success  of  many  of  our  current  programs  while  en-
hancing  our  ability  to  deploy  a  surge  of  resources  and  flexible  security  measures  to 
meet  the  challenge  of  an  evolving  terrorist  threat.  The  Request  includes  full  year 
funding  for  the  behavior  detection  program  ($43  million/660  FTE)  and  the  airport 
employee  screening  program  ($36  million/750  FTE),  both  of  which  were  initially 
funded  in  the  FY  2008  Budget  Amendment.  The  Aviation  Security  appropriation 
also reflects full year funding for 10 multi-modal VIPR teams ($30 million/225 FTE). 
SPOT  and  VIPR  are  two  of  TSA’s  efforts  to  enhance  security  by  putting  in  place 
initiatives in advance of the checkpoint to detect, disrupt and deter terrorist activi-
ties. 

Technology.  The  Request  reflects  TSA’s  plan  to  strategically  deploy  technology  to 
improve  security  for  passengers,  generate  additional  staffing  efficiencies,  and  im-
prove  the  passenger’s  travel  experience.  The  Request  includes  $91.7  million  to  pro-
cure and deploy AT X-ray machines at checkpoints in the busiest airports. TSA will 
devote  $1.2  billion  to  recapitalize  checked  baggage  screening  devices  and  accelerate 
deployment  of  inline  EDS  systems  to  increase  baggage  throughput  up  to  300  per-
cent.  The  Request  anticipates  an  additional  $426  million  annually  in  mandatory 
funds  generated  by  a  four-year  $0.50  surcharge  on  the  passenger  security  fee  (Sur-
charge) with a maximum increase of $1.00 per one-way trip. This proposal does not 
lower TSA’s appropriation through offsetting collections, but rather total funding for 
these systems would increase to $1.2 billion. The increase in spending would be en-
tirely offset by fees. The temporary Surcharge would be deposited into the Aviation 
Security Capital Fund (ASCF) for the specific purpose of purchasing, installing and 
recapitalizing inline EDS. The Surcharge authority is being requested together with 
a  proposal  to  allow  for  the  use  of  other  transaction  agreements  for  the  funding  of 
inline  EDS,  the  discretionary  use  of  letters  of  intent,  and  innovative  use  of  cost- 
sharing with our airport partners. We look forward to your support and quick enact-
ment of this important initiative that will accelerate the funding to support deploy-
ment of optimal checked baggage screening solutions by 2012. 

Air  Cargo.  TSA  is  requesting  $104.1  million  for  the  Air  Cargo  program  in  FY 
2009,  which  will  be  the  first  full  year  the  workforce  will  be  operating  at  the  ex-
panded staffing level of 460 inspectors and 170 deployed explosives detection canine 
teams  to  screen  air  cargo  at  high  volume  airports.  TSA  anticipates  deployment  of 
the Certified Cargo Screening Program (CCSP) in FY 2009, which will establish full 
supply  chain  security  of  air  cargo  and  continue  the  progress  toward  meeting  the 
deadline  of  screening  100  percent  of  air  cargo  by  August  2010,  as  required  by  the 
9/11  Act.  We  are  beginning  pilot  projects  in  San  Francisco,  Chicago,  and  Philadel-
phia to test the phased rollout of the certified cargo shipper program. Our first class 
of  TSA  canine  teams  dedicated  to  air  cargo  has  ‘‘graduated’’  and  the  teams  will 
begin operations this month. TSA will continue our incremental progress of increas-
ing the percentage of screened cargo per fiscal quarter during FY 2008. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

Law Enforcement/FAMS. The PPA realignment proposes a new PPA for Law En-
forcement and a new PPA for the FAMS in the Aviation Security appropriation. The 
FAMS PPA includes a request of $786 million for FY 2009, an increase of $16.5 mil-
lion  over  the  FY  2008  FAMS  appropriation.  TSA  is  requesting  $242.2  million  for 
Law  Enforcement,  which  includes  $79.1M  for  Airport  Law  Enforcement  &  Assess-
ments  and  the  funding  for  approximately  343  airports  through  Cooperative  Agree-
ments  to  provide  local  law  enforcement  support  for  TSA  activities.  This  program 
was  significantly  expanded  from  271  participating  airports  in  FY  2007  to  343  air-
ports in FY 2008. TSA has instituted more effective program management and over-
sight as a more efficient means of distributing the funds for appropriate law enforce-
ment activities. The Request includes $54.5 million for the National Explosives De-
tection  Canine  Team  Program,  which  reflects  the  expansion  of  the  total  TSA  K–9 
program to over 750 teams as a result of the FY07 Supplemental Act and the FY08 
Consolidated  Act.  The  Law  Enforcement  PPA  incorporates  other  appropriate  func-
tions  such  as  the  Federal  Flight  Deck  Officer  Program,  TSA’s  Freedom  Center  (the 
Transportation  Security  Operations  Center),  Physical  and  Personnel  Security,  and 
the Joint Coordination Center. 
The Checkpoint Is Evolving 

An  effective  security  system  must  constantly  be  evolving.  TSA  is  in  the  process 
of  evaluating  a  fundamental  shift  in  strategy  for  the  security  checkpoint  which  en-
compasses  people,  process,  and  technology.  This  is  the  most  significant  change  oc-
curring  in  passenger  screening  since  9/11  and  even  since  the  checkpoint  was  first 
established  in  the  1970s.  Through  an  initial  pilot  program,  TSA  is  taking  a  fresh 
look at our checkpoint operations to see how we can improve security. We took what 
we know from the intelligence and security communities, we listened to our employ-
ees,  we  learned  from  passengers,  we  evaluated  readily  deployable  technology,  and 
have come up with changes that we are piloting. 

People.  People  are  our  most  important  asset  and  the  human  element  is  critical 
to achieving a high standard of security. TSA is relying more on personal interaction 
to detect irregular behavior. TSA’s introduction of behavior detection and assuming 
the position of travel document checker have proven to be valuable methods of iden-
tifying  people  who  are  exhibiting  unusual  signs  of  stress,  fear,  and/or  deception  at 
the checkpoint. Behavior detection draws a contrast between average levels of travel 
stress and those intending to do harm. Training all security officers to increase pas-
senger interaction on a one-on-one basis will achieve a calmer, quieter environment 
that will result in heightened security. 

Process.  The  current  checkpoint  during  a  peak  travel  period  is  often  noisy  and 
congested.  A  chaotic,  noisy  congested  checkpoint  is  a  security  nightmare  because  it 
has  the  potential  to  conceal  someone  with  hostile  intent.  The  Checkpoint  Evolution 
prototype  at  Thurgood  Marshall  Baltimore-Washington  International  Airport  (BWI) 
gives  security  officers  wireless  whisper  radio  headsets  which  will  enable  them  to 
perform their duties in a low-key demeanor and communicate more effectively with 
others  on  their  team.  Further,  the  prototype  strives  to  provide  a  more  convenient 
layout  for  passengers  with  more  information  explaining  the  screening  process  to-
gether with light and sound elements designed to have a calming effect. 

Another simple yet effective program that improves the checkpoint process is the 
Diamond Self-Select program currently running in Salt Lake City, Orlando, Denver, 
Spokane,  Boston,  Cincinnati,  Raleigh-Durham,  Milwaukee,  Pittsburgh,  and  Dallas 
Love  Field  with  more  planned  in  the  near  future.  Self-Select  lanes  are  comprised 
of  a  series  of  lanes  designated  by  signage  that  directs  passengers  based  on  their 
travel needs and knowledge—Expert, for the business traveler who travels often and 
is  familiar  with  the  rules  and  is  prepared  when  they  reach  the  checkpoint;  Casual, 
for passengers that travel less frequently, but are familiar with the security process; 
and  Family/Special  Assistance,  for  passengers  traveling  with  small  children  or 
strollers,  elderly  passengers,  and  passengers  who  may  need  special  assistance. 
These  lanes  give  passengers  some  control  over  the  checkpoint  process  and  have  re-
duced  the  number  of  alarms  and  prohibited  items  and  increased  through-put  times 
at the Expert lane. 

Technology.  New  technology  does  not  currently  exist  to  adequately  address  the 
threat  alone  so  TSA,  working  closely  with  the  Science  and  Technology  Directorate, 
is  investing  in  the  development  and  deployment  of  proven  technology,  including 
multi-view  X-ray  and  whole  body  imaging.  These  are  the  first  significant  additions 
to  checkpoint  technology  since  walk  through  metal  detectors  and  standard  X-ray 
machines were introduced in the 1970s. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

Surface Transportation Security 

TSA  continues  to  make  progress  in  addressing  major  system-wide  security  risks 
in  surface  transportation.  We  continue  to  work  closely  with  the  Department  of 
Transportation,  its  various  modal  administrations,  and  the  many  surface  transpor-
tation stakeholders to enhance security through partnerships, proposed regulations, 
and  the  Federal  Emergency  Management  Agency  with  grant  planning,  evaluation 
and awards. 

The  surface  transportation  systems  present  much  different  security  challenges 
than commercial aviation due to the inherent openness and mobility of each system 
network.  Our  personnel  are  engaged  in  a  proactive  manner  with  the  stakeholders 
in  the  Pipeline,  Maritime,  Mass  Transit,  Rail,  Highway  and  Motor  Carrier  modes 
of  transportation.  Our  Surface  TSIs  assess  security  vulnerabilities,  assist  with  the 
development of security plans, and help establish best practices and national stand-
ards. The proposed PPA realignment shifts certain funding and FTE to other PPAs 
in  other  appropriations;  thus,  the  net  result  of  the  request  for  $37  million  for  Sur-
face Transportation Security is an overall enhancement of surface transportation se-
curity  initiatives.  Our  efforts  in  this  area  are  complemented  by  funds  in  Aviation 
Security,  such  as  75  FTE  to  support  VIPR  team  operations  and  the  deployment  of 
over  92  explosives  detection  canine  teams  to  the  largest  Mass  Transit  systems. 
These programs work in tandem with existing surface transportation security initia-
tives enacted in the FY 2008 budget. 
Transportation Threat Assessment and Credentialing 

TSA’s Office of Transportation Threat Assessment and Credentialing (TTAC) con-
solidates the management of all vetting and credentialing programs. The mission for 
these programs is to identify known or suspected terrorist threats working or seek-
ing  access  to  transportation  systems  through  terrorist-related  threat  assessment 
procedures. 

Secure  Flight.  The  Request  includes  a  program  increase  of  $32  million  to  accel-
erate the implementation of the Secure Flight program, an automated prescreening 
process  to  compare  specific  passenger  reservation  information  against  records  con-
tained in the Terrorist Screening Center Database. The Request provides for a total 
funding  amount  of  $82  million.  With  this  Committee’s  strong  past  and  continued 
support, TSA anticipates the beginning of the transition of passenger vetting to Se-
cure  Flight  in  early  2009  and  full  assumption  of  the  function  by  late  2009  or  early 
2010. 

Other  Vetting.  The  second  program  increase  in  the  Request  is  for  $30  million  to 
stabilize  and  enhance  the  infrastructure  of  TSA’s  existing  vetting  systems,  for  a 
total  amount  of  $50.8  million  for  FY  2009.  The  increase  will  enhance  TSA’s  efforts 
to  consolidate  the  various  systems  and  to  provide  a  more  reliable  platform  for  the 
increasing  populations  being  vetted  through  the  multiple  programs  required  under 
the  9/11  Act,  including  frontline  employees  in  mass  transit,  passenger  rail  and 
freight rail systems. 

Transportation  Worker  Identification  Credential  (TWIC).  The  TWIC  program  pro-
vides  a  tamper-resistant  biometric  credential  to  maritime  workers  requiring 
unescorted  access  to  secure  areas  of  port  facilities  and  vessels  regulated  under  the 
Maritime Transportation Security Act of 2002, (P.L. 107–295). In October 2007, TSA 
began the enrollment process for TWIC cards in Wilmington, Delaware and has en-
rolled  more  than  250,000  port  workers  to  date  at  more  than  100  fixed  enrollment 
centers. TSA expects to complete roll-out of 147 fixed enrollment centers and enroll 
nearly  one  million  workers  in  FY  2008.  TSA  is  expecting  to  spend  approximately 
$9 million for the fee-based program in FY 2009. 

In  cooperation  with  the  United  States  Coast  Guard  (USCG)  we  have  initiated 
pilot  programs  with  six  partners  across  the  country  to  test  card  readers.  The  pilots 
will test access control technologies in real world marine environments. Our current 
list  of  participants  includes  the  Port  Authorities  of  Los  Angeles,  Long  Beach, 
Brownsville,  and  New  York/New  Jersey,  in  addition  to  Watermark  Cruises  in  An-
napolis,  Maryland  and  Magnolia  Marine  in  Vicksburg,  Mississippi.  We  are  in  the 
process  of  finalizing  the  test  approach  for  the  pilots.  We  are  working  with  DHS’s 
Science  and  Technology  Directorate  and  the  National  Institute  of  Standards  and 
Technology  (NIST)  to  establish  a  test  plan  that  will  evaluate  the  card-reader  inter-
face  under  a  variety  of  conditions  and  assess  its  impact  on  operations.  As  the  pro-
gram  proceeds,  the  pilots  will  inform  the  USCG’s  TWIC  reader  rulemaking  process 
and  ultimately  result  in  final  regulations  that  require  the  deployment  of  transpor-
tation security card readers consistent with the findings of the pilot program. 

Earlier  this  month,  DHS  announced  that  the  final  compliance  date  for  the  TWIC 
program  will  be  April  15,  2009,  which  reflects  a  realignment  of  the  Sept.  25,  2008 
compliance  date  set  in  the  final  rule.  The  7-month  extension  is  a  direct  result  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

collaboration  with  port  officials  and  industry,  and  realigns  the  enrollment  period 
with the original intent of the TWIC final rule. The program is on track to complete 
enrollment for a substantial number of jurisdictions by the end of 2008, and several 
ports will be required to comply with TWIC regulations this year. 

Alien  Flight  Student  Program.  When  the  function  of  screening  alien  flight  stu-
dents  who  are  applying  for  flight  training  was  transferred  from  the  Attorney  Gen-
eral  to  the  Secretary  of  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security,  and  subsequently 
delegated  to  TSA,  the  authority  to  require  fees  to  offset  such  costs  excluded  recur-
rent  training.  Through  the  implementation  of  this  program,  TSA  has  determined 
that  over  52  percent  of  all  applicants  are  for  recurrent  training.  TSA  has  been  ab-
sorbing  approximately  $1.5  million  to  perform  background  checks  on  recurrent 
training  applicants  without  the  ability  to  charge  a  fee  to  the  applicant.  TSA  is  re-
questing  a  revision  to  amend  section  44939  of  title  49,  United  States  Code,  to  pro-
vide  authority  to  assess  a  fee  to  cover  the  costs  associated  with  foreign  students 
seeking recurrent flight training. The Request anticipates that TSA will be provided 
the authority to impose fees for recurrent training applications. We look forward to 
your  support  for  this  modest  but  important  proposal  to  allow  this  program  to  con-
tinue operating as a fee-based program. 
Transportation Security Support 

TSA  is  an  organization  with  over  50,000  personnel  and  hundreds  of  field  oper-
ations  locations  across  the  Nation  and  around  the  world.  Our  primary  activities  in 
the  Transportation  Security  Support  category  involve  Intelligence,  Human  Capital 
Services,  Headquarters  Administration,  and  Information  Technology.  The  proposed 
PPA realignment transferred many functions from the Headquarters Administration 
PPA  to  the  appropriate  program  they  support  to  provide  greater  clarity  to  the  re-
sources dedicated to each program and increase accountability of TSA’s senior lead-
ership.  We  created  a  new  PPA,  Human  Capital  Services,  which  combines  funding 
that  previously  supported  Human  Resources  (HR)  Services  from  the  Aviation  Secu-
rity appropriation and HR activities and FTE from within the Headquarters Admin-
istration  PPA.  Similarly,  Information  Technology  (IT)  activities  previously  funded 
under separate PPAs involving Airport Management, IT, and Support are now com-
bined in this appropriation. TSA is requesting $926 million in FY 2009. 
Implementation of the 9/11 Act 

On  August  3,  2007,  the  President  signed  into  law  the  9/11  Act,  which  imple-
mented  important  recommendations  from  the  9/11  Commission  and  provided  TSA 
much needed tools to improve transportation security. In particular, we are pleased 
to  now  have  the  authority  to  establish  an  administrative  process  for  civil  enforce-
ment  of  surface  transportation  regulations  and  orders  and  the  flexibility  to  develop 
a  robust  air  cargo  screening  program  that  maintains  the  flow  of  commerce.  Among 
the  many  key  provisions  of  the  Act,  TSA  was  given  clear  authority  for  VIPR  teams 
to  operate  in  all  modes  of  transportation.  Overall,  the  Act  authorized  33  programs 
and  20  rulemaking  actions  for  TSA,  many  of  which  were  already  initiated  by  TSA. 
FY  2009  will  be  the  first  full  year  of  TSA’s  expanded  inspector  workforce  and  K– 
9 team deployment, both strongly supported in the 9/11 Act. 

I want to thank the Members of this Committee for your support in providing $30 
million  to  TSA  in  FY  2008  to  implement  new  regulations  and  activities  authorized 
by the 9/11 Act. TSA has developed and provided to the Appropriations Committees 
a  spend  plan  required  by  the  FY08  Consolidated  Act  that  effectively  uses  these 
funds  to  advance  implementation  of  many  key  provisions  in  the  9/11  Act.  TSA  is 
now  proceeding  with  implementing  the  plan,  which  focuses  on:  developing  regula-
tions  to  enhance  surface  transportation  security;  expand  the  infrastructure  to  sup-
port  background  checks;  support  a  national  exercise  program  for  surface  transpor-
tation  security;  support  security  audits  of  foreign  repair  stations;  and  inspection  of 
critical pipeline facilities. We will fund the 9/11 Act initiatives across TSA’s separate 
appropriations  and  through  the  applicable  PPAs,  such  as  combining  the  air  cargo 
program into the Aviation Regulation PPA, a separate PPA for VIPR, and consolida-
tion  of  K–9  funding  into  the  National  Explosives  Detection  Canine  Team  Program 
PPA  component.  Through  our  ongoing  efforts,  including  efficient  use  of  our  re-
sources  within  our  base  funding,  and  your  support,  we  are  confident  we  will  con-
tinue to enhance security across all modes of transportation. 
Conclusion 

Mr. Chairman, thank you again for this opportunity to discuss the President’s Re-
quest for TSA. I look forward to our continued work together and would be pleased 
to respond to your questions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much, Mr. Hawley. 
May I recognize Director Berrick? 

STATEMENT OF CATHLEEN A. BERRICK, DIRECTOR, 

HOMELAND SECURITY AND JUSTICE ISSUES, 
U.S. GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE 

Ms.  BERRICK.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Inouye  and  Vice  Chairman 
Stevens,  for  inviting  me  here  to  discuss  GAO’s  work  reviewing 
TSA’s efforts in guiding key investments in transportation security. 
My testimony focuses on TSA’s efforts in the following four areas, 
which  represents  about  $4.5  billion  of  the  President’s  budget  re-
quest for TSA—screening operations, including TSO allocations and 
checkpoint  technologies;  air  cargo;  passenger  watch  list  matching; 
and surface transportation security. 

Overall, we found that TSA has more systematically planned for 
and  guided  investments  in  these  areas  and  has  taken  or  plans  to 
take  action  to  address  many  of  the  issues  we  previously  reported. 
However,  we  found  that  TSA  can  further  strengthen  its  efforts  to 
help  ensure  that  these  programs  achieve  their  desired  outcomes 
and that resources are appropriately targeted. 

With  respect  to  progress,  we  found  that  TSA  has  made  signifi-
cant achievements in the following three key areas, among others— 
deploying,  training,  and  measuring  the  performance  of  its  aviation 
security  workforce;  refining  and  testing  procedures  for  screening 
passengers  and  their  baggage;  and  conducting  risk  assessments, 
partnering with stakeholders and administering grant programs for 
surface transportation systems. 

For  example,  we  reported  that  TSA  has  developed  robust  train-
ing  programs  for  TSOs,  including  enhanced  explosives  detection 
training. TSA has also issued strategies for securing surface trans-
portation  modes  and  is  pursuing  a  rulemaking  to  guide  its  efforts 
to secure passengers and freight rail. 

We  also  reported  that  TSA  generally  used  sound  methods  to  de-
termine TSO allocations among airports through their staffing allo-
cation  model  and  implemented  or  expanded  several  workforce  ini-
tiatives  involving  TSOs  to  further  strengthen  security,  including 
the  Travel  Document  Checker,  Behavior  Detection  Officer,  and 
Bomb Appraisal Officer initiatives, among others. 

However,  we  found  that  other  key  areas  need  continued  atten-
tion,  both  in  the  short  and  long  term.  First,  it  is  important  that 
TSA  move  forward  on  initiatives  to  secure  airport  perimeters  and 
access  to  restricted  airport  areas.  Although  TSA  has  completed 
technology  pilots  and  issued  guidelines  for  biometric  identification 
systems, it has not yet determined how or when it will require the 
implementation of these systems nationwide. 

In addition, TSA is making progress in determining how to miti-
gate  the  risk  posed  by  airport  workers  through  an  ongoing  pilot, 
among  other  efforts.  However,  the  agency  has  not  yet  made  final 
decisions  regarding  how  it  will  fully  address  this  area  of  security. 
Second,  with  respect  to  checkpoint  technologies,  DHS  and  TSA 
have  researched,  developed,  tested,  and  initiated  procurements  of 
various  technologies  to  detect  explosives  and  plan  to  deploy  new 
enhanced  technologies  this  year.  However,  to  date,  TSA  has  made 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

limited  progress  in  fielding  emerging  technologies  due  to  perform-
ance, maintenance, and planning issues. 

Third,  although  TSA  has  made  significant  progress  in  strength-
ening the development of Secure Flight, a government-run program 
to  match  passenger  information  against  the  terrorist  watch  list, 
some  challenges  remain,  including  the  need  for  more  sound  pro-
gram  cost  and  schedule  estimates,  better  management  of  program 
risks,  and  test  plans  that  reflect  comprehensive  systems  testing. 
TSA  agreed  with  our  recommendations  in  this  area  and  has  re-
ported taking corrective action. 

Fourth,  TSA  has  made  progress  on  a  number  of  fronts  in  secur-
ing  air  cargo  and  is  pursuing  a  plan  to  meet  the  Congressional 
mandate to screen 100 percent of cargo on passenger aircraft. How-
ever,  TSA  has  placed  less  attention  on  cargo  transported  into  the 
United States from foreign locations, and DHS and TSA have made 
limited progress in deploying technologies to screen cargo. 

Finally,  TSA  will  need  to  continue  to  define  its  regulatory  or 
other  role  with  respect  to  all  surface  transportation  modes,  more 
clearly  define  the  mission  and  capabilities  of  its  inspection  work-
force.  For  example,  it  is  unclear  whether  TSA  surface  inspectors 
will  be  able  to  support  the  increased  workload  expected  in  imple-
menting requirements of the 9/11 Act and new security regulations. 
In  conducting  our  work,  we  found  that  a  variety  of  cross-cutting 
issues  have  hindered  both  DHS  and  TSA’s  progress.  These  include 
developing  results-oriented  goals  and  measures  to  assess  perform-
ance,  integrating  a  risk-based  approach  to  guide  investments,  and 
establishing  effective  frameworks  for  coordinating  with  stake-
holders.  TSA  has  placed  attention  on  and  continues  to  make 
progress in all of these issues. 

We  are  currently  reviewing  TSA’s  efforts  in  many  of  these  key 
areas for your and other committees and will continue to report to 
the Congress and public on the results of our work. 

This  concludes  my  opening  statement.  I  look  forward  to  your 

questions. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Berrick follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CATHLEEN A. BERRICK, DIRECTOR, HOMELAND SECURITY 

AND JUSTICE ISSUES, U.S. GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE 

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee: 
I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  participate  in  today’s  hearing  to  discuss  the  secu-
rity of our Nation’s transportation system. The Transportation Security Administra-
tion  (TSA)  was  established  in  2001  with  the  mission  to  protect  the  transportation 
network  while  also  ensuring  the  free  movement  of  people  and  commerce.  Since  its 
inception,  TSA  has  focused  much  of  its  efforts  on  aviation  security,  and  has  devel-
oped  and  implemented  a  variety  of  programs  and  procedures  to  secure  commercial 
aviation.  To  implement  these  efforts,  TSA  funding  for  aviation  security  has  totaled 
about  $26  billion  since  Fiscal  Year  2004.  Other  parties  also  play  a  role  in  securing 
commercial  aviation,  including  air  carriers  that  are  responsible  for  screening  air 
cargo,  among  other  things,  and  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security’s  (DHS) 
Science and Technology Directorate (S&T), which is responsible for the research and 
development  of  aviation  security  technologies.  TSA  is  also  responsible  for  securing 
surface  modes  of  transportation,  including  passenger  and  freight  rail,  mass  transit, 
highways, commercial vehicles, and pipelines, in partnership with other Federal en-
tities, state and local governments, and the private sector. In carrying out its broad-
er  homeland  security  responsibilities,  DHS  faces  the  daunting  challenge  of  deter-
mining  how  to  allocate  its  finite  resources  within  the  transportation  system  and 
across all sectors to address threats and strengthen security. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

My testimony today focuses on TSA’s efforts to ensure the security of the following 
key  areas  of  commercial  aviation,  which  represents  about  $4.5  billion  of  the  Presi-
dent’s budget request for TSA for Fiscal Year 2009: (1) screening operations, includ-
ing transportation security officer (TSO) and private screener allocations, and check-
point  screening  technologies;  (2)  air  cargo;  and  (3)  passenger  watch-list  matching. 
My testimony also addresses TSA’s efforts to ensure the security of the Nation’s sur-
face  transportation  systems.  In  particular,  I  will  address  the  numerous  efforts  TSA 
has taken or plans to take to strengthen security in these areas and the challenges 
that remain. 

My  comments  are  based  on  GAO  reports  and  testimonies  issued  from  February 
2004 through April 2008 addressing the security of the Nation’s commercial aviation 
and  surface  transportation  systems,  including  the  status  of  TSA’s  development  of 
the  Secure  Flight  program 1 conducted  in  response  to  the  Implementing  Rec-
ommendations  of  the  9/11  Commission  Act  of  2007.2 Selected  updates  to  this  work 
were  conducted  in  February  through  April  2008.  We  conducted  these  performance 
audits in accordance with generally accepted government auditing standards. Those 
standards  require  that  we  plan  and  perform  the  audit  to  obtain  sufficient,  appro-
priate evidence to provide a reasonable basis for our findings and conclusions based 
on our audit objectives. We believe that the evidence obtained provides a reasonable 
basis for our findings and conclusions based on our audit objectives. 
Summary 

DHS  and  TSA  have  undertaken  numerous  initiatives  to  strengthen  the  security 
of  the  Nation’s  commercial  aviation  system  and  surface  transportation  modes  as 
well as to more effectively guide program investments, including taking steps to ad-
dress  many  of  our  prior  recommendations.  Specifically,  DHS  and  TSA  have,  among 
other  things,  developed  and  implemented  a  Staffing  Allocation  Model  to  determine 
TSO  staffing  levels  at  airports  that  reflect  current  operating  conditions,  and  pro-
vided  TSOs  (formerly  known  as  screeners)  with  additional  training  intended  to  en-
hance the detection of threat objects, particularly improvised explosive devices. TSA 
also proposed and implemented modifications to passenger checkpoint screening pro-
cedures based on risk (threat and vulnerability) information, while considering effi-
ciency  and  customer  service  needs.  TSA  also  explored  new  passenger  checkpoint 
screening technologies to enhance the detection of explosives and other threats. Fur-
ther,  TSA  took  steps  to  strengthen  air  cargo  security,  such  as  conducting  vulner-
ability  assessments  at  several  domestic  airports,  revising  screening  exemptions  for 
domestic  air  cargo,  and  conducting  inspections  of  air  carriers  to  ensure  that  they 
are  complying  with  existing  security  requirements.  Finally,  TSA  has  instilled  more 
discipline and rigor into Secure Flight’s development and implementation, including 
preparing  key  systems  development  documentation  and  strengthening  privacy  pro-
tections. With regard to surface transportation security, TSA has taken steps to de-
velop  a  strategic  approach  for  securing  mass  transit,  passenger  and  freight  rail, 
commercial  vehicles,  and  highways;  establish  security  standards  for  certain  trans-
portation  modes;  and  conduct  threat,  criticality,  and  vulnerability  assessments  of 
surface transportation assets, particularly passenger and freight rail. TSA also hired 
and  deployed  compliance  inspectors  and  conducted  inspections  of  passenger  and 
freight  rail  systems,  and  DHS  developed  and  administered  grant  programs  for  var-
ious surface transportation modes. 

While  these  efforts  should  be  commended,  we  have  reported  on  several  areas  in 
which TSA could do more to strengthen transportation security. For example, in our 
previous work, we reported that some assumptions used in TSA’s Staffing Allocation 
Model did not accurately reflect airport operating conditions. We recommended that 
TSA establish a formal, documented plan for reviewing all of the model assumptions 
on  a  periodic  basis.  TSA  agreed  with  our  recommendation  and,  in  December  2007, 
developed  a  Staffing  Allocation  Model  Rates  and  Assumption  Validation  Plan  that 
the  agency  will  use  to  review  and  validate  model  assumptions.  In  addition,  we  re-
ported  that  TSA  could  improve  its  process  for  evaluating  the  effectiveness  of  pro-
posed changes to passenger screening procedures before implementing them nation-
wide.  DHS  generally  agreed  with  our  findings  and  recommendations,  and  TSA  has 
taken  some  steps  to  implement  them.  We  also  testified  that  limited  progress  has 
been made in developing and deploying checkpoint technologies due to planning and 
management  challenges.  With  respect  to  air  cargo,  we  reported  that  TSA  has  not 
yet  developed  an  inspection  plan  that  includes  performance  goals  and  measures  to 

1 GAO, Aviation Security: Transportation Security Administration Has Strengthened Planning 
to  Guide  Investments  in  Key  Aviation  Security  Programs,  but  More  Work  Remains,  GAO–08– 
456T (Washington, D.C.: February 28, 2008). 

2 Pub. L. No. 110–53, § 1605(b), 121 Stat. 266, 481–82 (2007). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

determine the extent to which air carriers transporting cargo into the United States 
are complying with security requirements. Moreover, while TSA has made consider-
able  progress  in  the  development  and  implementation  of  Secure  Flight,  it  has  not 
fully addressed program management issues related to developing cost and schedule 
estimates  consistent  with  best  practices,  fully  implementing  its  risk  management 
plan,  developing  a  comprehensive  testing  strategy,  and  ensuring  that  information 
security requirements are fully implemented. With regard to surface transportation 
security,  TSA  has  initiated  efforts  to  develop  security  standards  for  passenger  and 
freight rail, but has not yet determined its regulatory role with respect to other sur-
face  modes  of  transportation.  Moreover,  although  TSA  has  made  progress  in  con-
ducting  compliance  inspections  of  some  surface  transportation  systems,  inspectors’ 
roles and missions have not been fully defined. 

In  addition  to  the  recommendations  discussed  above,  we  have  made  other  rec-
ommendations to strengthen passenger screening operations, air cargo security, and 
the  implementation  of  the  Secure  Flight  program.  DHS  and  TSA  generally  agreed 
with  our  recommendations  and  have  taken  action  to  implement  a  number  of  them. 
Background 

The Aviation and Transportation Security Act (ATSA), enacted in November 2001, 
created TSA and gave it responsibility for securing all modes of transportation.3 As 
part  of  this  responsibility,  TSA  oversees  security  operations  at  the  Nation’s  more 
than  400  commercial  airports,  including  establishing  requirements  for  passenger 
and  checked  baggage  screening  and  ensuring  the  security  of  air  cargo  transported 
to,  from,  and  within  the  United  States.  TSA  has  operational  responsibility  for  con-
ducting  passenger  and  checked  baggage  screening  at  most  airports,  and  has  regu-
latory,  or  oversight,  responsibility,  for  air  carriers  who  conduct  air  cargo  screening. 
While TSA took over responsibility for passenger checkpoint and baggage screening, 
air  carriers  have  continued  to  conduct  passenger  watch-list  matching  in  accordance 
with TSA requirements, which includes the process of matching passenger informa-
tion  against  Federal  watch-list  data  before  flights  depart.  TSA  is  currently  devel-
oping a program to take over this responsibility from air carriers for passengers on 
domestic flights, and plans to assume from the U.S. Customs and Border Protection 
(CBP)  the  pre-departure  name-matching  function  for  passengers  on  international 
flights traveling to or from the United States. 

According to DHS’s budget execution reports and TSA’s Congressional budget jus-
tifications,  TSA  received  appropriations  for  aviation  security  that  total  about  $26 
billion  since  Fiscal  Year  2004.4 During  Fiscal  Year  2004—the  first  year  for  which 
data were available—TSA received about $3.9 billion for aviation security programs, 
and during Fiscal Year 2008, received about $6.1 billion. The President’s budget re-
quest for Fiscal Year 2009 includes about $6.0 billion to continue TSA’s aviation se-
curity  activities.  This  total  includes  about  $5.3  billion  specifically  designated  for 
aviation security and about $0.76 billion for aviation-security related programs, such 
as Secure Flight, and mandatory fee accounts, such as the Aviation Security Capital 
Fund.  Figure  1  identifies  reported  aviation  security  funding  for  Fiscal  Years  2004 
through 2008. 

3 See Pub. L. No. 107–71, 115 Stat. 597 (2001). 
4 DHS’s budget execution reports are monthly statements that reflect the department’s finan-
cial  activity.  In  our  analysis  of  DHS’s  budget  execution  reports  and  TSA  Congressional  Budget 
Justification,  we  included  funding  that  we  determined  to  be  specifically  designated  for  aviation 
security and funding for all programs, projects, and activities related to aviation security, to the 
extent  they  were  identifiable,  in  order  to  present  consistent  total  funding  amounts  across  fiscal 
years.  In  addition,  these  aviation  security  totals  do  not  reflect  funding  for  activities  that  may 
support TSA’s aviation security programs and projects, such as intelligence and administration, 
because  DHS’s  documentation  does  not  identify  the  proportion  of  funding  dedicated  to  support 
aviation security. During this time period, a number of aviation security related activities were 
transferred in or out of TSA’s jurisdiction, which affects TSA funding levels for the affected fis-
cal years. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

Source:  GAO  analysis  of  TSA  budget  execution  reports  for  Fiscal  Years  2004  to  2007  and 

TSA’s Congressional Budget Justification for Fiscal Year 2009. 

Note:  We  used  the  September  30th  budget  execution  reports  for  our  analysis  of  TSA  funding 
for Fiscal Years 2004 through 2006. For Fiscal Years 2007 and 2008, we used TSA’s Fiscal Year 
2009  congressional  budget  justification.  According  to  the  budget  execution  reports  and  congres-
sional  budget  justification,  figures  presented  include  all  rescissions  and  supplemental  funding 
for the fiscal years. 

a Fiscal years 2004 and 2005 include approximately $330 million in research and development 
funding for aviation security. Beginning in Fiscal Year 2006, research and development funding 
was  consolidated  within  DHS  S&T.  Therefore,  this  funding,  as  reflected  in  TSA’s  budget  docu-
mentation, is not included as part of TSA’s appropriation from Fiscal Year 2006 forward. 

b Fiscal  years  2006,  2007,  and  2008  include  approximately  $680  million,  $720  million,  and 
$770  million  respectively,  in  funding  for  the  Federal  Air  Marshals  Service,  which  was  trans-
ferred  back  to  TSA  from  U.S.  Immigration  and  Customs  Enforcement  in  October  2005.  Federal 
Air  Marshal  Service  funding  is  included  within  totals  for  related  aviation  security  programs, 
projects, and activities for Fiscal Years 2006, 2007, and 2008. 

c Funding for aviation security-related programs, projects, and activities is reported separately. 
However,  TSA  designated  funds  from  other  programs,  projects,  and  activities  to  aviation  secu-
rity as well, which represents the unshaded areas. 

TSA  is  also  responsible  for  securing  surface  modes  of  transportation,  including 
passenger  and  freight  rail,  mass  transit,  highways,  commercial  vehicles,  and  pipe-
lines,  in  partnership  with  other  Federal  entities,  state  and  local  governments,  and 
the  private  sector.  According  to  TSA  congressional  budget  justifications,  TSA  re-
ceived  appropriations  for  surface  transportation  security  that  totaled  about  $175 
million  since  Fiscal  Year  2005.  During  Fiscal  Year  2005—the  first  year  for  which 
data  were  available—TSA  received  about  $36  million  for  surface  transportation  se-
curity programs. TSA further received $52 million during Fiscal Year 2006, $41 mil-
lion  during  Fiscal  Year  2007,  and  $47  million  during  Fiscal  Year  2008  for  securing 
surface modes of transportation. The President’s budget request for Fiscal Year 2009 
includes about $37 million, about $10 million less than last year’s appropriation, to 
continue  TSA’s  surface  transportation  security  activities,  including  conducting  com-
pliance  inspections,  developing  best  practices  and  standards,  assessing  security 
vulnerabilities, establishing baseline data against which to evaluate minimum-secu-
rity standards, and providing domain awareness training. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e

.
1
r
r
e
b
3
1
5

Airline Passenger and Checked Baggage Screening 

16 

One  of  the  most  significant  changes  mandated  by  ATSA  was  the  shift  from  the 
use of private-sector screeners to perform airport screening operations to the use of 
Federal screeners (now referred to as TSOs). Prior to ATSA, passenger and checked 
baggage  screening  had  been  performed  by  private  screening  companies  under  con-
tract  to  airlines.  ATSA  established  TSA  and  required  it  to  create  a  Federal  work-
force  to  assume  the  job  of  conducting  passenger  and  checked  baggage  screening  at 
commercial airports. The Federal screener workforce was put into place, as required, 
by November 2002.5 

Passenger  screening  is  a  process  by  which  personnel  authorized  by  TSA  inspect 
individuals  and  property  to  deter  and  prevent  the  carriage  of  any  unauthorized  ex-
plosive,  incendiary,  weapon,  or  other  dangerous  item  into  a  sterile  area  or  onboard 
an  aircraft.6 Passenger  screening  personnel  must  inspect  individuals  for  prohibited 
items at designated screening locations. The four passenger screening functions are 
X-ray  screening  of  property,  walk-through  metal  detector  screening  of  individuals, 
hand-wand  or  pat-down  screening  of  individuals,  and  physical  search  of  property 
and trace detection for explosives. Typically, passengers are only subjected to X-ray 
screening of their carry-on items and screening by the walk-through metal detector. 
Passengers whose carry-on baggage alarms the X-ray machine, who alarm the walk- 
through  metal  detector,  or  who  are  designated  as  selectees—that  is,  passengers  se-
lected by the Computer Assisted Passenger Pre-Screening System (CAPPS) or other 
TSA-approved  processes  to  designate  passengers  for  additional  screening—are 
screened  by  hand-wand  or  pat-down  and  have  their  carry-on  items  either  screened 
for explosives traces or physically searched.7 

Checked  baggage  screening  is  a  process  by  which  authorized  security  screening 
personnel inspect checked baggage to deter, detect, and prevent the carriage of any 
unauthorized explosive, incendiary, or weapon onboard an aircraft. Checked baggage 
screening is accomplished through the use of explosive detection systems 8 or explo-
sive  trace  detection  systems,9 and  through  the  use  of  approved  alternative  means, 
such  as  manual  searches  and  canine  teams  when  the  explosive  detection  or  explo-
sive trace detection systems are unavailable. 

The passenger and checked baggage screening systems are composed of three ele-
ments:  the  people  (TSOs)  responsible  for  conducting  the  screening  of  airline  pas-
sengers  and  their  carry-on  items  and  checked  baggage,  the  technology  used  during 
the  screening  process,  and  the  procedures  TSOs  are  to  follow  to  conduct  screening. 
Collectively, these elements help to determine the effectiveness and efficiency of pas-
senger and checked baggage screening operations. 
Air Cargo Security 

Air cargo ranges in size from one pound to several tons, and in type from perish-
ables to machinery, and can include items such as electronic equipment, automobile 
parts,  clothing,  medical  supplies,  other  dry  goods,  fresh  cut  flowers,  fresh  seafood, 
fresh  produce,  tropical  fish,  and  human  remains.  Cargo  can  be  shipped  in  various 
forms,  including  large  containers  known  as  unit  loading  devices  that  allow  many 
packages  to  be  consolidated  into  one  container  that  can  be  loaded  onto  an  aircraft, 
wooden  crates,  assembled  pallets,  or  individually  wrapped/boxed  pieces,  known  as 
break bulk cargo. 

TSA’s  responsibilities  for  securing  air  cargo  include,  among  other  things,  estab-
lishing security rules and regulations governing domestic and foreign passenger air 
carriers  that  transport  cargo,  domestic  and  foreign  all-cargo  carriers  that  transport 

5 ATSA  further  required  TSA  to  allow  airports  to  apply  to  opt-out  of  Federal  screening  and 
to  use  private  screeners  under  contract  with  TSA.  See  49  U.S.C.  § 44920.  Ten  airports  and  1 
heliport  currently  have  screening  operations  conducted  by  private  screening  contractors  under 
TSA’s Screening Partnership Program. 

6 Sterile areas are located within the terminal where passengers are provided access to board-
ing aircraft. Access to these areas is controlled by TSOs (or by non-Federal screeners at airports 
participating in the Screener Partnership Program) at checkpoints where they conduct physical 
screening of individuals and their carry-on baggage for weapons and explosives. 

7 CAPPS  identifies  passengers  for  secondary  screening  based  on  certain  travel  behaviors  re-
flected in their reservation information that are associated with threats to aviation security, as 
well  as  through  a  random  selection  of  passengers.  At  some  airports,  some  passengers  may  also 
be  screened  by  walking  through  an  explosives  trace  portal—a  machine  that  detects  trace 
amounts of explosives on persons. 

8 Explosive detection systems use computer-aided tomography X-rays to examine objects inside 
baggage and identify the characteristic signatures of threat explosives. This equipment operates 
in an automated mode. 

9 Explosive trace detection works by detecting vapors and residues of explosives. Human oper-
ators collect samples by rubbing bags with swabs, which are chemically analyzed to identify any 
traces of explosive materials. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

cargo,  and  domestic  indirect  air  carriers.  TSA  is  also  responsible  for  overseeing  the 
implementation  of  air  cargo  security  requirements  by  air  carriers  and  indirect  air 
carriers  through  compliance  inspections,  and,  in  coordination  with  DHS’s  S&T  Di-
rector,  for  conducting  research  and  development  of  air  cargo  security  technologies. 
Air carriers (passenger and all-cargo) are responsible for implementing TSA security 
requirements,  predominantly  through  a  TSA-approved  security  program  that  de-
scribes the security policies, procedures, and systems the air carrier will implement 
and maintain in order to comply with TSA security requirements. Air carriers must 
also  abide  by  security  requirements  issued  by  TSA  through  security  directives  or 
emergency amendments to air carrier security programs. 

Air carriers use several methods and technologies to screen domestic and inbound 
air  cargo.10 These  include  manual  physical  searches  and  comparisons  between  air-
way  bills  and  cargo  contents  to  ensure  that  the  contents  of  the  cargo  shipment 
matches the cargo identified in documents filed by the shipper, as well as using ap-
proved technology, such as X-ray systems, explosive trace detection systems, decom-
pression chambers, explosive detection systems, and certified explosive detection ca-
nine  teams.11 Under  TSA’s  security  requirements  for  domestic  and  inbound  air 
cargo,  passenger  air  carriers  are  currently  required  to  randomly  screen  a  specific 
percentage  of  non  exempt  air  cargo  pieces  listed  on  each  airway  bill.  All-cargo  car-
riers  are  required  to  screen  100  percent  of  air  cargo  that  exceeds  a  specific  weight 
threshold. As of October 2006, domestic indirect air carriers are also required, under 
certain  conditions,  to  screen  a  certain  percentage  of  air  cargo  prior  to  its  consolida-
tion.  TSA,  however,  does  not  regulate  foreign  freight  forwarders,  or  individuals  or 
businesses that have their cargo shipped by air to the United States. Under the Im-
plementing Recommendations of the 9/11 Commission Act of 2007, DHS is required 
to  implement  a  system  to  screen  50  percent  of  air  cargo  transported  on  passenger 
aircraft by February 2009, and 100 percent of such cargo by August 2010.12 
Airline Passenger Watch List Matching 

The  prescreening  of  airline  passengers  who  may  pose  a  security  risk  before  they 
board  an  aircraft  is  one  of  many  layers  of  security  intended  to  strengthen  commer-
cial  aviation.  One  component  of  prescreening  is  passenger  watch-list  matching—or 
the process of matching passenger information against the No-Fly and Selectee lists 
to  identify  passengers  who  should  be  denied  boarding  or  who  should  undergo  addi-
tional security scrutiny.13 

Aircraft  operators  are  currently  responsible  for  checking  passenger  information 
against  the  No-Fly  and  Selectee  lists  to  identify  passengers  who  should  be  denied 
boarding  or  who  should  undergo  additional  security  scrutiny.  To  further  enhance 
commercial  aviation  security  and  in  accordance  with  the  Intelligence  Reform  and 
Terrorism Prevention Act of 2004 (IRTPA), TSA is developing a program to assume 
from  air  carriers  the  function  of  matching  passenger  information  against  govern-
ment-supplied  terrorist  watch-lists  for  domestic  flights.14 Secure  Flight  is  the  pro-
gram through which TSA plans to meet this requirement. Following domestic imple-
mentation, TSA, through Secure Flight, plans to assume responsibility from CBP for 
watch-list  matching  of  passengers  on  international  flights  bound  to  and  from  the 
United  States.  Secure  Flight’s  mission  is  to  enhance  the  security  of  commercial  air 
travel by: 

• eliminating  inconsistencies  in  current  air  carrier  watch-list  matching  proce-

dures, 

10 The  Implementing  Recommendations  of  the  9/11  Commission  Act  of  2007  defines  the  term 
‘screening’  for  purposes  of  air  cargo  to  mean  a  physical  examination  or  non-intrusive  methods 
of assessing whether cargo poses a threat to transportation security. See 49 U.S.C. § 44901(g)(5). 
Such methods of screening include X-ray systems, explosives detection systems, explosives trace 
detection, explosives detection canine teams certified by TSA, or a physical search together with 
manifest  verification.  While  additional  methods  may  be  approved  to  ensure  that  cargo  does  not 
pose  a  threat  to  transportation  security,  these  additional  methods  cannot  include  solely  per-
forming a review of information about the contents of cargo or verifying the identity of a shipper 
of  the  cargo  if  not  performed  in  conjunction  with  other  authorized  security  methods,  including 
whether a shipper is registered in the known shipper database. 

11 Certified explosive detection canine teams have been evaluated by TSA and shown to effec-
tively  detect  explosive  devices.  Decompression  chambers  simulate  the  pressures  acting  on  air-
craft  by  simulating  flight  conditions,  which  cause  explosives  that  are  attached  to  barometric 
fuses to detonate. 

12 See  Pub.  L.  No.  110–53,  § 1602(a),  121  Stat.  266,  477–480  (2007)  (codified  at  49  U.S.C. 

§ 44901(g)). 

13 The  No  Fly  and  Selectee  lists  contain  the  names  of  individuals  with  known  or  suspected 
links  to  terrorism.  These  lists  are  subsets  of  the  consolidated  terrorist  watch-list  that  is  main-
tained by the Federal Bureau of Investigation’s Terrorist Screening Center. 

14 See 49 U.S.C. § 44903(j)(2)(C). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

• reducing  the  number  of  individuals  who  are  misidentified  as  being  on  the  No 

• reducing the risk of unauthorized disclosure of sensitive watch-list information, 

Fly or Selectee list, 

and 

• integrating the redress process so that individuals are less likely to be improp-

erly or unfairly delayed or prohibited from boarding an aircraft. 

TSA  plans  to  implement  Secure  Flight  in  three  releases.  During  Release  One, 
completed in March 2008, TSA developed and tested the Secure Flight system. Dur-
ing  Release  Two,  scheduled  to  be  conducted  from  April  2008  through  August  2008, 
TSA  plans  to  begin  parallel  testing  with  air  carriers  during  which  both  Secure 
Flight  and  air  carriers  will  perform  watch-list  matching.  Finally,  during  Release 
Three,  TSA  is  to  develop  the  capability  for  ‘‘airline  cutovers’’  during  which  Secure 
Flight plans to begin conducting all watch-list matching for domestic air passengers. 
Release  Three  is  scheduled  to  begin  in  September  2008.  Domestic  cutovers  are  ex-
pected  to  begin  in  January  2009  and  be  completed  in  July  2009.  TSA  plans  to  as-
sume  from  CBP  watch-list  matching  for  flights  departing  from  and  to  the  United 
States some time after domestic cutovers are completed. 

Over  the  last  5  years,  we  have  reported  that  the  Secure  Flight  program  (and  its 
predecessor CAPPS II) had not met key milestones or finalized its goals, objectives, 
and  requirements,  and  faced  significant  development  and  implementation  chal-
lenges.15 Acknowledging  the  challenges  it  faced  with  the  program,  TSA  suspended 
the  development  of  Secure  Flight  and  initiated  a  reassessment,  or  re-baselining,  of 
the  program  in  February  2006,  which  was  completed  in  January  2007.  We  were 
mandated  by  the  Implementing  Recommendations  of  the  9/11  Commission  Act  of 
2007 to assess various aspects of Secure Flight’s development and implementation.16 
In  accordance  with  the  Act,  we  reviewed  (1)  TSA’s  efforts  to  develop  reliable  cost 
and  schedule  estimates  for  Secure  Flight;  (2)  progress  made  by  TSA  in  developing 
and  implementing  the  Secure  Flight  system,  including  the  implementation  of  secu-
rity  controls;  (3)  TSA’s  efforts  to  coordinate  with  CBP  to  integrate  Secure  Flight 
with CBP’s watch-list matching function for international flights; (4) TSA’s plans to 
protect private passenger information under Secure Flight; and (5) DHS’s efforts to 
assess  the  effectiveness  of  the  current  redress  process  for  passengers  misidentified 
as being on or wrongly assigned to the No Fly or Selectee list.17 

TSA’s  available  funding  for  the  Secure  Flight  program  during  Fiscal  Year  2007 
was  $32.5  million.18 In  Fiscal  Year  2008,  TSA  received  $50  million  and  requested 
a  transfer  of  an  additional  $24  million  to  the  program  under  statutory  authority, 
making as much as $74 million available for the program in Fiscal Year 2008.19 For 
Fiscal  Year  2009,  TSA  has  requested  $82  million  in  funding  to  allow  the  agency  to 
continue development and implementation of the Secure Flight program and the full 
assumption of the watch-list matching function in Fiscal Year 2010. 
Surface Transportation Security 

TSA shares responsibility for securing surface transportation modes with Federal, 
state, and local governments and the private sector. TSA’s security mission includes 
establishing  security  standards  and  conducting  assessments  and  inspections  of  sur-
face transportation modes, including passenger and freight rail; mass transit; high-
ways  and  commercial  vehicles;  and  pipelines.  The  Federal  Emergency  Management 
Agency’s  Grant  Programs  Directorate  provides  grant  funding  to  surface  transpor-
tation  operators  and  state  and  local  governments,  and  the  National  Protection  and 
Programs Directorate, in conjunction with the grant allocation process, conducts risk 
assessments of surface transportation facilities. Within the Department of Transpor-
tation  (DOT),  the  Federal  Transit  Administration  (FTA)  and  Federal  Railroad  Ad-
ministration  (FRA)  have  responsibilities  for  establishing  standards  for  passenger 
rail safety and security. In addition, public and private sector transportation opera-
tors are responsible for implementing security measures for their systems. 

15 GAO, Aviation Security: Progress Made in Systematic Planning to Guide Key Investment De-

cisions, but More Work Remains, GAO–07–448T (Washington, D.C.: February 13, 2007). 

16 See Pub. L. No. 110–53, § 1605(b), 121 Stat. 266, at 481–82. 
17 GAO  is  also  mandated  to  review  DHS’s  certification  of  10  conditions  outlined  in  section 
522(a) of the DHS Appropriations Act, 2005, related to the development and implementation of 
the Secure Flight program. See Pub. L. No. 110–161, § 513, 121 Stat. 1844 (2007). 

18 Fifteen  million  was  appropriated  during  Fiscal  Year  2007  and  $17.5  million  was  carried 

over from the prior fiscal year, for a total of $32.5 million. 

19 As mandated by law, GAO is currently reviewing TSA’s request for transfer of an additional 
$24  million  to  the  Secure  Flight  program  in  Fiscal  Year  2008.  See  Pub.  L.  No.  110–161,  § 550, 
121 Stat. 1844. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

TSA  Has  Made  Significant  Enhancements  to  Its  Passenger  Screening 

Operations, but Can Further Strengthen Its Efforts 

TSA  has  taken  significant  steps  to  strengthen  the  three  key  elements  of  the 
screening  system—people  (TSOs  and  private  screeners),  screening  procedures,  and 
technology—but  has  faced  management,  planning,  and  funding  challenges.  For  ex-
ample,  TSA  developed  a  Staffing  Allocation  Model  to  determine  TSO  staffing  levels 
at airports that reflect current operating conditions, and implemented several initia-
tives intended to enhance the detection of threat objects, particularly improvised ex-
plosives. We reported that TSA also proposed modifications to passenger checkpoint 
screening  procedures  based  on  risk  (threat  and  vulnerability  information),  among 
other  factors,  but  could  do  more  evaluation  of  proposed  procedures  before  they  are 
implemented  to  help  ensure  that  they  achieve  their  intended  results.  Finally,  TSA 
is  exploring  new  technologies  to  enhance  the  detection  of  explosives  and  other 
threats,  but  continues  to  face  management  and  funding  challenges  in  developing 
and fielding technologies at airport checkpoints. 

Of the approximately $6.0 billion requested for aviation security in the President’s 
Fiscal  Year  2009  budget  request,  about  $4.0  billion,  or  approximately  66  percent, 
is  for  passenger  and  checked  baggage  screening.  This  includes  approximately  $3.9 
billion to support passenger and checked baggage screening operations, such as TSO 
salaries  and  training,  and  about  $154  million  for  the  procurement  and  installation 
of checked baggage explosive detection systems.20 
TSA Has Efforts Under Way to Strengthen the Allocation of Its TSO Workforce 

TSA  has  implemented  several  efforts  intended  to  strengthen  the  allocation  of  its 
TSO  workforce.  We  reported  in  February  2004  that  staffing  shortages  and  TSA’s 
hiring  process  had  hindered  the  ability  of  some  Federal  Security  Directors  (FSD)— 
the ranking TSA authorities responsible for leading and coordinating security activi-
ties  at  airports—to  provide  sufficient  resources  to  staff  screening  checkpoints  and 
oversee screening operations at their checkpoints without using additional measures 
such as overtime.21 Since that time, TSA has developed a Staffing Allocation Model 
to determine TSO staffing levels at airports.22 In August 2005, TSA determined that 
the  Staffing  Allocation  Model  contained  complete  and  accurate  information  on  each 
airport  from  which  to  estimate  staffing  needs,  and  the  agency  used  the  model  to 
identify TSO allocations for each airport. 

FSDs  we  interviewed  during  2006  as  part  of  our  review  of  TSA’s  staffing  model 
generally reported that the model is a more accurate predictor of staffing needs than 
TSA’s  prior  staffing  model.  However,  FSDs  expressed  the  following  concerns  about 
assumptions used in the Fiscal Year 2006 model: 

level, even though it was difficult for airports to achieve this; 

• the  model  assumed  that  airports  could  achieve  a  20  percent  part-time  TSO 
• the model did not specifically account for the recurrent training requirement for 
• the model did not account for TSO’s time away from screening to perform oper-

TSOs of 3 hours per week averaged over a fiscal year quarter; and 

ational support duties. 

To  help  ensure  that  TSOs  are  effectively  utilized,  we  recommended  that  TSA  es-
tablish  a  policy  for  when  TSOs  can  be  used  to  provide  operational  support.  Con-
sistent  with  our  recommendation,  in  March  2007,  TSA  issued  a  management  direc-
tive  that  provides  guidance  on  assigning  TSOs,  through  detail  or  permanent  pro-
motion,  to  duties  of  another  position  for  a  specified  period  of  time.  Further,  in  re-
sponse  to  FSDs’  input  and  the  various  mechanisms  TSA  had  implemented  to  mon-
itor the sufficiency of the model’s allocation outputs, TSA made changes to some as-
sumptions in the Staffing Allocation Model for Fiscal Year 2007, including assump-
tions  related  to  part-time  TSOs,  training,  and  operational  support  to  address  the 
issues identified above. In our February 2007 report, we recommended that TSA es-
tablish  a  formal,  documented  plan  for  reviewing  all  of  the  model  assumptions  on  a 

20 According to TSA’s Congressional Justification, the $154 million requested for procurement 
and  installation  of  checked  baggage  explosive  detection  systems  is  in  addition  to  the  $676  in 
mandatory  fees  requested  for  the  Aviation  Security  Capital  Fund,  which  would  provide  $830 
million in total funding for the procurement and installation of such systems. 

21 GAO, Aviation Security: Challenges Exist in Stabilizing and Enhancing Passenger and Bag-

gage Screening Operations, GAO–04–440T (Washington, D.C.: Feb. 12, 2004). 

22 As part of TSA’s Screening Partnership Program, 10 airports and 1 heliport use private con-
tract screeners in lieu of Federal TSOs. Although these airports and heliport do not use Federal 
screeners, TSA uses the Staffing Allocation Model to determine the full-time equivalent screen-
ing  staff  at  each  of  these  airports.  These  staffing  levels,  as  determined  by  the  model,  serve  as 
a limit on the number of private screeners that the private screening contractors could employ. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

periodic basis to ensure that the assumptions result in TSO staffing allocations that 
accurately reflect operating conditions that may change over time. TSA agreed with 
our  recommendation  and,  in  December  2007,  developed  a  Staffing  Allocation  Model 
Rates  and  Assumptions  Validation  Plan.  The  plan  identifies  the  process  TSA  will 
use to review and validate the model’s assumptions on a periodic basis. 

Although  we  did  not  independently  review  TSA’s  staffing  allocation  for  Fiscal 
Year 2008, the TSA Fiscal Year 2009 budget justification identified that the agency 
has achieved operational and efficiency gains that enabled them to implement or ex-
pand  several  workforce  initiatives  involving  TSOs,  which  are  summarized  in  table 
1. For example, TSA reported making several changes to the Fiscal Year 2008 Staff-
ing Allocation Model, such as decreasing the allocation for time paid not worked (an-
nual, sick, and military leave; compensatory time; and injury time off) based on past 
performance  data.  TSA  also  reported  revising  the  exit  lane  staffing  based  on  each 
checkpoint’s unique operating hours rather than staffing all exit lanes based on the 
maximum open hours for any checkpoint at an airport. 

Table 1.—TSA Workforce Initiatives Involving Transportation Security Officers (TSOs) 

Workforce Initiative 

Description of Initiative 

Travel document checker 

Behavior detection officers 

Bomb appraisal officers 

Visible  Intermodal  Protection  and  Response 

Teams 

Aviation Direct Access Screening Program 

TSA implemented the travel document checker initiative at 
over 250 smaller airports during Fiscal Year 2007. According 
to the TSA Fiscal Year 2009 budget justification, through sav-
ings realized through adjustments in the Fiscal Year 2008 
Staffing Allocation Model, TSA was able to fund 1,033 addi-
tional full-time-equivalent TSOs for the travel document check-
er initiative. This program is intended to ensure that only pas-
sengers with authentic travel documents access the sterile 
areas of airports and board aircraft. TSA’s budget justification 
identifies that in Fiscal Year 2007 the agency implemented 
this program at over 340 of the 450 airports with Federal 
TSOs. 

TSA completed its planned deployment of the behavior detec-
tion officer program. These officers screen passengers by obser-
vation technique (also known as SPOT) to identify potentially 
high-risk passengers based on involuntary physical and physio-
logical reactions. During Fiscal Year 2007, 643 behavior detec-
tion officers were deployed at 42 airports. 

TSA completed the planned deployment of the Bomb Appraisal 
Officer program. These officers, who have undergone training 
in the disposal of explosives, provide formal training to TSOs 
to increase their ability to recognize potential improvised ex-
plosive devices and components. The Bomb Appraisal Officer 
Program was formally implemented at 107 airports during Fis-
cal Year 2007. 

According to TSA, the agency deployed Visible Intermodal Pro-
tection and Response Teams to airports around the country. 
These teams—comprised of TSOs, behavior detection officers 
and other aviation security employees—are responsible for 
screening passengers, looking for suspicious behavior, and act-
ing as a visible deterrent in multiple transportation sectors, in-
cluding buses, mass transit stations, and airports. TSA’s budg-
et justification identified that as of February 2008, TSA had 
deployed over 100 Visible Intermodal Protection and Response 
Teams to airports and mass transit systems around the coun-
try. 

The Aviation Direct Access Screening Program is intended to 
provide uniform procedures and standards for TSOs to screen 
individuals, their accessible property, and vehicles upon enter-
ing secure airport areas, and conduct visual inspections of air-
craft. Under this program, TSOs are to screen aviation work-
ers and inspect for the presence of explosives, incendiaries, 
weapons, and other prohibited items, improper airport identi-
fication media, and items identified through specific intel-
ligence. In March 2007, TSA required Federal Security Direc-
tors to implement the Aviation Direct Screening Program at 
each of their assigned airports. 

Source:  TSA  Fiscal  Year  2009  budget  justification. 
TSA’s  Fiscal  Year  2009  budget  justification  includes  $2.7  billion  for  the  Federal 
TSO  workforce,  and  represents  an  increase  of  about  $80  million  over  Fiscal  Year 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

2008 funding. Of the $80 million increase, about $38 million is for cost of living ad-
justments, and about $42 million is for the annualization of the full-year cost of the 
Behavior Detection Officer and Aviation Direct Access Screening Program positions. 
According  to  DHS’  budget  justification,  the  $2.7  billion  includes  funding  for  com-
pensation  and  benefits  of  45,643  full-time  equivalent  personnel—approximately 
46,909 TSOs and about 1,100 screening managers.23 Table 2 identifies the total TSO 
and screening manager full-time equivalents and the funding levels for Fiscal Years 
2005 through 2008, as reported by TSA. 

Table 2.—Passenger and Checked Baggage TSO and Screening Manager Full-time Equivalents and Actual 
Spending for TSO Personnel, Compensation, and Benefits, by Fiscal Year 

Fiscal Year 

FY 2005 

FY 2006 

FY 2007 

FY 2008 a 

Total TSOs and screening managers at airports 

nationwide 

45,690 

42,187 

42,592 

45,438 

Actual spending (dollars in thousands) 

$2,291,572 

$2,251,503 

$2,444,455 

$2,636,104 

Source:  TSA. 
a Fiscal  year  2008  figures  represent  TSA’s  budget  in  accordance  with  funds  appropriated  through  Division  E  of  the  Consolidated 

Appropriations  Act,  2008. 
TSA  Has  Taken  Steps  to  Strengthen  Passenger  Screening  Procedures,  but  Could 

Improve Its Evaluation and Documentation of Proposed Procedures 

In addition to TSA’s efforts to strengthen the allocation of its TSO workforce, TSA 
has taken steps to strengthen passenger checkpoint screening procedures to enhance 
the  detection  of  prohibited  items.  However,  we  have  identified  areas  where  TSA 
could  improve  its  evaluation  and  documentation  of  proposed  procedures.  In  April 
2007,  we  reported  that  TSA  officials  considered  modifications  to  its  standard  oper-
ating procedures (SOP) based on risk information (threat and vulnerability informa-
tion),  daily  experiences  of  staff  working  at  airports,  and  complaints  and  concerns 
raised by the traveling public.24 

We further reported that for more significant SOP modifications, TSA first tested 
the  proposed  modifications  at  selected  airports  to  help  determine  whether  the 
changes  would  achieve  their  intended  purpose,  as  well  as  to  assess  its  impact  on 
screening operations. However, we reported that TSA’s data collection and analyses 
could  be  improved  to  help  TSA  determine  whether  proposed  procedures  that  are 
operationally tested would achieve their intended purpose. We also found that TSA’s 
documentation on proposed modifications to screening procedures was not complete. 
We recommended that TSA develop sound evaluation methods, when possible, to as-
sess whether proposed screening changes would achieve their intended purpose and 
generate  and  maintain  documentation  on  proposed  screening  changes  that  are 
deemed  significant.  DHS  generally  agreed  with  our  recommendations  and  TSA  has 
taken steps to implement them. For example, for several proposed SOP changes con-
sidered  during  the  fall  of  2007,  TSA  provided  documentation  that  identified  the 
sources  of  the  proposed  changes  and  the  reasons  why  the  agency  decided  to  accept 
or reject the proposed changes. 

Once  proposed  SOP  changes  have  been  implemented,  it  is  important  that  TSA 
have a mechanism in place to ensure that TSOs are complying with established pro-
cedures. In our April 2007 report, we identified that TSA monitors TSO compliance 
with  passenger  checkpoint  screening  SOPs  through  its  performance  accountability 
and  standards  system—which  was  implemented  in  response  to  a  recommendation 
by  us  in  2003 25 and  in  response  to  airport  staff  concerns—and  through  local  and 
national covert testing. We further reported that some TSA airport officials have ex-
perienced  resource  challenges  in  implementing  these  compliance  monitoring  efforts. 
TSA  headquarters  officials  stated  that  they  were  taking  steps,  such  as  automating 
the  performance  accountability  and  standards  system  data  entry  functions,  to  ad-
dress this challenge. Since then, TSA has also implemented a new local covert test-
ing  program  nationwide,  known  as  the  Aviation  Screening  Assessment  Program. 
This program is intended to measure TSO performance using realistic and standard-
ized  test  scenarios  to  achieve  a  national  TSO  assessment  measurement.  TSA  plans 
to  use  these  test  results  to  identify  vulnerabilities  across  screening  operations  and 

23 The TSA Fiscal Year 2009 budget justification includes about $151 million for the Screening 

Partnership Program. 

24 GAO, Aviation Security: Risk, Experience, and Customer Concerns Drive Changes to Airline 
Passenger Screening Procedures, but Evaluation and Documentation of Proposed Changes Could 
Be Improved, GAO–07–634 (Washington, D.C.: April 16, 2007). 

25 GAO,  Transportation  Security  Administration:  Actions  and  Plans  to  Build  a  Results  Ori-

ented Culture, GAO–03–190 (Washington, D.C.: January 2003). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

to  provide  recommendations  for  addressing  the  vulnerabilities  to  various  stake-
holders within TSA. 
DHS  and  TSA  Are  Pursuing  New  Checkpoint  Technologies  to  Enhance  the 
Detection  of  Explosives  and  Other  Threats,  but  Continue  to  Face 
Challenges 

We  reported  in  February  2007 26 that  S&T  and  TSA 27 were  exploring  new  pas-
senger checkpoint screening technologies to enhance the detection of explosives and 
other  threats.  However,  we  found  that  limited  progress  had  been  made  in  fielding 
explosives  detection  technology  at  passenger  screening  checkpoints,  in  part  due  to 
challenges  S&T  and  TSA  faced  in  coordinating  research  and  development  efforts. 
TSA requested $103.2 million in its Fiscal Year 2009 budget request for checkpoint 
technology  and  checkpoint  reconfiguration.  Among  other  things,  TSA  plans  to  pro-
cure and deploy Advanced Technology Systems to further extend explosives and pro-
hibited  item  detection  coverage  at  category  X  and  I  checkpoints.  The  President’s 
budget request also identifies that TSA may purchase Whole Body Imagers, Bottled 
Liquids  Scanners,  Cast  and  Prosthesis  Imagers,  shoe  scanner  systems,  technology 
integration  solutions,  and  additional  units  or  upgrades  to  legacy  equipment,  among 
other technologies. TSA further requested $11.5 million to support the optimization 
and  reconfiguration  of  additional  checkpoint  lanes  to  accommodate  anticipated  air-
port growth and maintain throughput at the busiest airport checkpoints. 

Of  the  various  emerging  checkpoint  screening  projects  funded  by  TSA  and  S&T, 
the  explosive  trace  portal  and  the  bottled  liquids  scanning  device  have  been  de-
ployed  to  airport  checkpoints,  and  a  number  of  additional  projects  have  initiated 
procurements  or  are  being  researched  and  developed.28 Table  3  provides  a  descrip-
tion of passenger checkpoint screening technologies that have been deployed as well 
as  technologies  that  have  initiated  procurements  or  are  in  research  and  develop-
ment. This list of technologies is limited to those for which TSA could provide docu-
mentation.  TSA  is  planning  to  develop  and  deploy  additional  technologies.  We  are 
continuing  to  assess  TSA’s  deployment  of  new  checkpoint  screening  technologies  in 
our  ongoing  work  and  expect  to  report  on  the  results  of  this  work  later  this  year. 

Table 3.—Description of Passenger Checkpoint Screening Technologies Deployed, Procured, or in Research 
and Development as of January 2008 

Technology 

Description 

Status 

Explosives trace portals 

Detects trace amounts of explo-
sives on persons (will reduce the 
size of the current explosives trace 
portals at checkpoints). 

Bottled liquids scanners 

Screens for liquid explosives. 

TSA initiated deployment of 95 portals to 
airports. However, in June 2006, TSA 
halted the acquisition and deployment of 
the portals due to performance and main-
tenance issues. Currently, 114 portals are 
in storage, which were purchased at a 
total cost of over $20 million. 

During Fiscal Year 2007, TSA procured 
200 units. One hundred and forty three 
units have been deployed to airports. For 
Fiscal Year 2008, TSA plans to procure 
700 units. 

26 GAO, Aviation Security: Progress Made in Systematic Planning to Guide Key Investment De-

cisions, but More Work Remains, GAO–07–448T (Washington, D.C.: February 13, 2007). 

27 DHS  S&T  is  responsible  for  research  and  development  of  checkpoint  technologies  related 
to  aviation  security,  managing  the  activities  conducted  at  the  Transportation  Security  Labora-
tory,  and  coordinating  these  efforts  with  TSA.  TSA’s  Passenger  Screening  Program  is  respon-
sible  for  evaluating  and  deploying  systems  to  detect  explosives  and  weapons  concealed  on  per-
sons  or  in  carry-on  items,  while  strengthening  access  control,  improving  screener  performance, 
and reducing staffing requirements. 

28 Research  and  development  projects  generally  fall  within  the  following  phases:  (1)  basic  re-
search includes all scientific efforts and experimentation directed to increase knowledge and un-
derstanding in the fields of science related to long-term national needs; (2) applied research in-
cludes  efforts  directed  toward  solving  specific  problems  with  a  focus  on  developing  and  evalu-
ating the feasibility of proposed solutions; (3) advanced development includes efforts directed to-
ward  the  development  of  hardware  for  field  experiments;  and  (4)  operational  testing  includes 
evaluation of technologies in a realistic operating environment to assess the performance or cost 
reduction potential of advanced technology. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

Table 3.—Description of Passenger Checkpoint Screening Technologies Deployed, Procured, or in Research 
and Development as of January 2008—Continued 

Technology 

Description 

Status 

Cast and prosthesis scanners  Provides a 2-dimensional image of 
the area beneath a cast or inside a 
prosthetic device. 

Advanced Technology 
Systems 

Checkpoint explosives 
detection systems 

Whole body imagers 

TSA plans to replace the Threat 
Image Projection Ready X-ray ma-
chines currently used at category X 
airports with Advanced Technology 
Systems that are intended to im-
prove detection capability and per-
formance. 

Creates a three dimensional image 
of bags to detect explosives and 
other nonmetallic items. 

Provides two-dimensional, full-body 
images of all items on a pas-
senger’s body, including plastic ex-
plosives and concealed metallic, 
non-metallic, and ceramic or plas-
tic objects. 

TSA procured 34 units during Fiscal Year 
2007 and expects delivery of the first unit 
in February 2008. TSA plans to deploy 
this technology to airports during 2008. 

During 2007, testing was conducted on 
this technology, including operational test-
ing at four airports. TSA procured 250 
units during Fiscal Year 2007, and plans 
to procure 677 units and deploy 429 units 
during Fiscal Year 2008. 

This technology is currently undergoing 
various types of testing, including oper-
ational testing. During Fiscal Year 2007, 
TSA procured 20 units to be deployed 
starting in 2008. 

TSA is conducting operational pilot test-
ing of the whole body imager at one air-
port. If the testing is successful, TSA 
plans to procure and deploy the first units 
to airports during 2008. 

Source:  TSA. 
Despite  TSA’s  efforts  to  develop  passenger  checkpoint  screening  technologies,  we 
reported  that  limited  progress  has  been  made  in  fielding  explosives  detection  tech-
nology  at  airport  checkpoints.  For  example,  we  reported  that  TSA  had  anticipated 
that the explosives trace portals would be in operation throughout the country dur-
ing  Fiscal  Year  2007.  However,  due  to  performance  and  maintenance  issues,  TSA 
halted the acquisition and deployment of the portals in June 2006. As a result, TSA 
has  fielded  less  than  25  percent  of  the  434  portals  it  projected  it  would  deploy  by 
Fiscal  Year  2007.  TSA  officials  are  considering  what  to  do  with  the  portals  that 
were procured and are currently in storage. In addition to the portals, TSA has fall-
en  behind  in  its  projected  acquisition  of  other  emerging  screening  technologies.  For 
example, we reported that the acquisition of 91 Whole Body Imagers was previously 
delayed  in  part  because  TSA  needed  to  develop  a  means  to  protect  the  privacy  of 
passengers screened by this technology. 

While  TSA  and  DHS  have  taken  steps  to  coordinate  the  research,  development, 
and deployment of checkpoint technologies, we reported in February 2007 that chal-
lenges  remained.  For  example,  TSA  and  S&T  officials  stated  that  they  encountered 
difficulties  in  coordinating  research  and  development  efforts  due  to  reorganizations 
within  TSA  and  S&T.  A  senior  TSA  official  further  stated  at  the  time  that,  while 
TSA  and  the  DHS  S&T  have  executed  a  Memorandum  of  Understanding  to  estab-
lish  the  services  that  the  Transportation  Security  Laboratory  is  to  provide  to  TSA, 
coordination with S&T remained a challenge because the organizations had not fully 
implemented  the  terms  of  the  agreement.  Since  our  February  2007  testimony,  ac-
cording to TSA and S&T, coordination between them has improved. 

We  also  reported  that  TSA  did  not  have  a  strategic  plan  to  guide  its  efforts  to 
acquire and deploy screening technologies, and that a lack of a strategic plan or ap-
proach could limit TSA’s ability to deploy emerging technologies at those airport lo-
cations deemed at highest risk. The Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2008, provides 
that,  of  TSA’s  appropriated  funds  for  Transportation  Security  Support,  $10,000,000 
may not be obligated until the Secretary of Homeland Security submits to the House 
and Senate Committees on Appropriations detailed expenditure plans for checkpoint 
support  and  explosive  detection  systems  refurbishment,  procurement,  and  installa-
tion  on  an  airport-by-airport  basis  for  Fiscal  Year  2008,  along  with  the  strategic 
plan  for  checkpoint  technologies  previously  requested  by  the  committees  no  later 
than  60  days  after  the  date  of  enactment  of  the  Act  (enacted  December  26,  2007). 
According  to  TSA  officials,  they  currently  plan  to  submit  the  strategic  plan  to  Con-
gress  by  June  2008.  We  will  continue  to  evaluate  S&T’s  and  TSA’s  efforts  to  re-
search, develop and deploy checkpoint screening technologies as part of our ongoing 
review. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

TSA  Has  Taken  Action  to  Strengthen  Air  Cargo  Security,  but  Additional 

Efforts Are Needed 

TSA  has  taken  steps  to  enhance  domestic  and  inbound  air  cargo  security,  but 
more  work  remains  to  strengthen  this  area  of  aviation  security.  For  example,  TSA 
has  issued  an  Air  Cargo  Strategic  Plan  that  focused  on  securing  the  domestic  air 
cargo  supply  chain.  However,  in  April  2007,  we  reported  that  this  plan  did  not  in-
clude goals and objectives for addressing the security of inbound air cargo, or cargo 
transported into the United States from a foreign location, which presents different 
security  challenges  than  cargo  transported  domestically.29 We  also  reported  that 
TSA  had  not  conducted  vulnerability  assessments  to  identify  the  range  of  security 
weaknesses  that  could  be  exploited  by  terrorists  related  to  air  cargo  operations.  In 
addition,  we  also  reported  that  TSA  had  established  requirements  for  air  carriers 
to  randomly  screen  air  cargo,  but  had  exempted  some  domestic  and  inbound  cargo 
from  screening.  With  respect  to  inbound  air  cargo,  we  reported  that  TSA  lacked  an 
inspection  plan  with  performance  goals  and  measures  for  its  inspection  efforts,  and 
recommended that TSA develop such a plan. Finally, TSA is taking steps to compile 
and analyze information on air cargo security practices used abroad to identify those 
that may strengthen DHS’s overall air cargo security program, as we recommended. 
For  Fiscal  Year  2009,  the  President’s  budget  includes  a  request  of  about  $104  mil-
lion for TSA’s air cargo security program. Specifically; TSA is requesting $52 million 
for  460  air  cargo  inspectors,  $33.5  million  for  170  canine  teams,  and  $2.8  million 
for  the  Certified  Cargo  Screening  Program.30 We  issued  two  reports  that  examined 
TSA’s efforts to secure domestic air cargo and inbound air cargo.31 Table 4 summa-
rizes our key findings, recommendations, and TSA’s response. 

Table 4.—Key GAO Recommendations Related to Air Cargo Security and TSA’s Response 32 

Identified Issue 

Recommendation 

Status 

Air Cargo Strategic Plan did 
not include goals and objec-
tives for addressing the secu-
rity of air cargo transported 
into the United States from 
another country. 

DHS develop a risk-based strategy 
to address inbound air cargo secu-
rity that should define TSA’s and 
CBP’s responsibilities for ensuring 
the security of inbound air cargo. 

TSA had not conducted vul-
nerability assessments to 
identify the range of security 
weaknesses that could be ex-
ploited by terrorists related 
to air cargo operations. 

TSA develop a methodology and 
schedule for completing these as-
sessments. 

CBP issued its International Air Cargo 
Security Strategic Plan in June 2007. Ac-
cording to TSA officials, the agency plans 
to revise its Air Cargo Strategic Plan dur-
ing the third quarter of Fiscal Year 2008, 
and will incorporate a strategy for ad-
dressing inbound air cargo security, in-
cluding how the agency will partner with 
CBP. TSA reported that the updated stra-
tegic plan will also incorporate the re-
quirement that TSA develop a system to 
screen 100 percent of air cargo prior to its 
transport on passenger aircraft as re-
quired by the Implementing Recommenda-
tions of the 9/11 Commission Act of 2007. 

TSA implemented an Air Cargo Vulner-
ability Assessment program in November 
2006 and, as of April 2008, had completed 
vulnerability assessments at five domestic 
airports. TSA plans to complete assess-
ments of all Category X airports by 2009. 
Officials stated that the results of these 
assessments will assist the agency with 
its efforts to collaborate with foreign gov-
ernments to conduct joint assessments at 
foreign airports that will include a review 
of air cargo vulnerabilities. 

Stages and Could Be Strengthened, GAO–07–660 (Washington, D.C.: April 2007). 

30 According  to  TSA,  the  funding  requested  for  the  Certified  Cargo  Screening  Program  could 

29 GAO,  Aviation  Security:  Federal  Efforts  to  Secure  U.S.-Bound  Air  Cargo  Are  in  the  Early 

change if the agency has any contract activity in Fiscal Year 2008 for this program. 

31 GAO,  Aviation  Security:  Federal  Action  Needed  to  Strengthen  Domestic  Air  Cargo  Security, 
GAO–06–76  (Washington,  D.C.:  October  2005)  and  GAO–07–660;  GAO,  Aviation  Security:  Fed-
eral Efforts to Secure U.S.-Bound Air Cargo Are in the Early Stages and Could Be Strengthened, 
GAO–07–660 (Washington, D.C.: April 2007). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Table 4.—Key GAO Recommendations Related to Air Cargo Security and TSA’s Response 32—Continued 

Identified Issue 

Recommendation 

Status 

25 

TSA established require-
ments for air carriers to ran-
domly screen air cargo, but 
exempted some domestic and 
inbound cargo from screen-
ing. 

TSA examine the rationale for ex-
isting domestic and inbound air 
cargo screening exemptions and de-
termine whether such exemptions 
left the air cargo system unaccept-
ably vulnerable. 

TSA systematically analyze compli-
ance inspection results and use the 
results to target future inspections. 

TSA develop such a plan. 

TSA compile and analyze informa-
tion on air cargo security practices 
used abroad to identify those that 
may strengthen DHS’s overall air 
cargo security program. 

TSA had not developed meas-
ures to assess the adequacy 
of air carrier compliance with 
air cargo security require-
ments, or assessed the results 
of its domestic compliance in-
spections to target higher- 
risk air carriers or indirect 
air carriers for future re-
views. 

TSA lacked an inbound air 
cargo compliance inspection 
plan with performance goals 
and measures for its inspec-
tion efforts. 

GAO identified foreign secu-
rity practices that are cur-
rently not used by TSA but 
that potentially could help 
strengthen the security of in-
bound and domestic air cargo 
supply chains. TSA did not 
systematically collect infor-
mation on such practices. 

Source:  GAO  Analysis. 

TSA issued a security directive and emer-
gency amendment in July 2007 to domes-
tic and foreign air carriers operating with-
in and from the United States that lim-
ited the screening exemptions; however, 
these did not apply to inbound air cargo. 
The Implementing Recommendations of 
the 9/11 Commission Act of 2007 requires 
DHS to conduct an assessment of screen-
ing exemptions granted under 49 U.S.C. 
§ 44901(i)(1) for cargo transported on pas-
senger aircraft and an analysis to assess 
the risk of maintaining such exemptions. 
TSA’s assessment, issued in February 
2008, includes the agency’s plans to main-
tain, revise, or eliminate screening exemp-
tions for particular cargo types trans-
ported on passenger aircraft departing 
from both domestic and foreign locations. 
GAO is required to review the method-
ology used in this assessment and report 
back to Congress by June 24, 2008, 120 
after its issuance. 

TSA has increased the number of inspec-
tors dedicated to conducting domestic air 
cargo compliance inspections, and has 
begun analyzing the results of these in-
spections to prioritize their inspections on 
those entities that have the highest rates 
of noncompliance, as well as newly ap-
proved entities that have yet to be in-
spected. 

TSA officials stated that the agency 
formed an International Cargo Working 
Group to develop inspection prompts to 
guide inspectors in their examinations of 
foreign and U.S. air cargo operators de-
parting from foreign locations to the 
United States. 

TSA is taking steps to compile and ana-
lyze this information. According to TSA 
officials, the agency reviewed foreign 
countries’ models for screening air cargo, 
which is performed early in the supply 
chain by government certified shippers 
and freight forwarders, when designing 
their Certified Cargo Screening Program. 
TSA officials believe this program will as-
sist the agency in meeting the require-
ment to screen 100 percent of air cargo 
transported on passenger aircraft by Au-
gust 2010, as mandated by the Imple-
menting Recommendations of the 9/11 
Commission Act of 2007.33 We have not 
independently assessed TSA’s Certified 
Cargo Screening Program. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

TSA Has Made Progress in Developing and Implementing the Secure Flight 

Program, but Can Further Strengthen Its Efforts 

In February 2008, we reported that TSA has made substantial progress in instill-
ing more discipline and rigor into Secure Flight’s development and implementation, 
but  challenges  remain  that  may  hinder  the  program’s  progress  moving  forward.34 
For example, TSA developed a detailed concept of operations, established a cost and 
schedule  baseline,  and  drafted  key  management  and  systems  development  docu-
ments, among other efforts. However, while TSA developed a life-cycle cost estimate 
and an integrated master schedule for Secure Flight, the program has not fully fol-
lowed  best  practices  that  would  help  to  ensure  reliable  and  valid  cost  and  schedule 
estimates.  We  also  reported  that  TSA  can  strengthen  its  systems  development  ef-
forts by demonstrating that it has fully implemented its risk management plan, in-
corporated end-to-end testing 35 as part of the program’s testing strategy, and more 
fully  addressed  system  security  requirements  and  vulnerabilities.  We  further  re-
ported  that  DHS  and  TSA  can  strengthen  their  assessment  of  the  current  redress 
process for passengers who believe they were inappropriately inconvenienced during 
the  watch-list  matching  process.  TSA  officials  stated  that  they  have  considerably 
strengthened  Secure  Flight’s  systems  development  efforts,  and  have  already  taken 
or  plan  to  take  action  to  address  the  issues  we  identified.  We  made  a  number  of 
recommendations  to  strengthen  TSA’s  development  and  implementation  of  Secure 
Flight  to  address  the  issues  discussed  below,  which  officials  generally  agreed  with. 
TSA  Has  Made  Progress  in  Strengthening  Secure  Flight’s  Development  and 

Implementation 

TSA  has  taken  numerous  steps  to  address  previous  GAO  recommendations  re-
lated  to  strengthening  Secure  Flight’s  development  and  implementation,  as  well  as 
additional  steps  designed  to  strengthen  the  program.36 TSA  has,  among  other 
things, developed a detailed, conceptual description of how the system is to operate, 
commonly  referred  to  as  a  concept  of  operations;  established  a  cost  and  schedule 
baseline; developed security requirements; developed test plans; conducted outreach 
with  key  stakeholders;  published  a  notice  of  proposed  rulemaking  on  how  Secure 
Flight  is  to  operate;  and  issued  a  guide  to  key  stakeholders  (e.g.,  air  carriers  and 
CBP)  that  defines,  among  other  things,  system  data  requirements.  Collectively, 
these  efforts  have  enabled  TSA  to  more  effectively  manage  the  program’s  develop-
ment and implementation. 

TSA  has  also  taken  steps  to  integrate  the  domestic  watch-list  matching  function 
with  the  international  watch-list  matching  function  currently  operated  by  CBP.  We 
previously  reported  that  TSA  and  CBP  experienced  coordination  challenges  which, 
among  other  things,  could  result  in  a  duplication  of  effort  and  conflicting  results 
from domestic and international watch-list matching.37 We recommended that DHS 
take  additional  steps  and  make  key  policy  and  technical  decisions  that  were  nec-
essary  to  more  fully  coordinate  these  programs.  TSA  and  CBP  have  since  worked 
with DHS to develop a strategy called the One DHS Solution, which is to align the 
two agencies’ domestic and international watch-list matching processes, information 
technology  systems,  and  regulatory  procedures  to  provide  a  seamless  interface  be-
tween  DHS  and  the  airline  industry.  TSA  and  CBP  also  agreed  that  TSA  will  take 
over the screening of passengers against the watch list for international flights from 
CBP,  though  CBP  will  continue  to  match  passenger  information  to  the  watch  list 
in  fulfillment  of  its  border-related  functions.  Full  implementation  of  an  integrated 
system is not planned to take place until after Secure Flight acquires the watch list 
matching function for domestic flights. 

TSA has also taken steps to address key privacy principles in plans to protect pri-
vate  passenger  information  for  the  Secure  Flight  program.  We  previously  reported 

32 The table represents the key recommendations GAO made regarding air cargo, but does not 
encompass all of them. See GAO–06–76 and GAO–07–660 for the complete list of recommenda-
tions. 

33 In  fulfilling  this  mandate,  DHS  must  provide  for  the  screening  of  50  percent  of  all  cargo 
transported on passenger aircraft by February 2009, 18 months after enactment of the Act. See 
49 U.S.C. § 44901(g). 

34 See GAO–08–456T. 
35 End-to-end testing is conducted to verify that the entire system, including any external sys-

tems with which it interfaces, functions as intended in an operational environment. 

36 GAO,  Aviation  Security:  Secure  Flight  Development  and  Testing  Under  Way,  but  Risks 
Should  Be  Managed  as  System  is  Further  Developed,  GAO–05–356  (Washington,  D.C.:  March 
28, 2005); and GAO, Aviation Security: Significant Management Challenges May Adversely Affect 
Implementation  of  the  Transportation  Security  Administration’s  Secure  Flight  Program,  GAO– 
06–374T (Washington, D.C.: February 9, 2006). 

37 See GAO–07–448T. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

that TSA, as part of its requirements development process, had not clearly identified 
the privacy impacts of the Secure Flight system or the full actions it planned to take 
to  mitigate  them.  We  also  reported  that  TSA  violated  provisions  of  the  Privacy  Act 
by  not  fully  disclosing  its  use  of  personal  information  during  systems  testing.38 In 
March 2005, we recommended that TSA specify how Secure Flight will protect per-
sonal  privacy.39 In  August  2007,  TSA  published,  for  public  comment,  the  required 
privacy  impact  assessment 40 and  system  of  records  notice 41 that  address  key  pri-
vacy protection principles.42 TSA also developed a Program Privacy Architecture de-
scribing key aspects of TSA’s plans to protect private passenger information. We will 
continue to monitor TSA’s efforts as part of our ongoing work to ensure that privacy 
protections continue to be appropriately considered. 
TSA  Has  Not  Fully  Followed  Best  Practices  for  Developing  Reliable  and  Valid  Cost 

and Schedule Estimates for Secure Flight 

Although  TSA  has  developed  a  life-cycle  cost  estimate  and  maintains  an  inte-
grated  master  schedule  for  Secure  Flight,  the  program  has  not  fully  followed  best 
practices  for  developing  reliable  and  valid  cost  and  schedule  estimates,  and  several 
program  milestones  have  been  missed  or  have  slipped.  The  Office  of  Management 
and  Budget  (OMB)  endorsed  the  use 43 of  GAO’s  Cost  Assessment  Guide  in  the  de-
velopment  of  life-cycle  cost  and  program  schedule  estimates.44 Without  adhering  to 
these  best  practices  in  the  development  of  its  cost  and  schedule  estimates,  TSA  is 
at  risk  of  the  Secure  Flight  program  experiencing  cost  overruns,  missed  deadlines, 
and performance shortfalls. 

Life-cycle cost estimate. We reported that TSA has not fully followed best practices 
for  developing  a  reliable  and  valid  life-cycle  cost  estimate.  Using  our  Cost  Assess-
ment  Guide’s  12-step  process  for  creating  cost  estimates,  we  assessed  the  Secure 
Flight  cost  estimate  against  these  best  practices.45 DHS’s  Cost-Benefit  Analysis 
Guidebook,  which  TSA  program  officials  stated  that  TSA  used  to  develop  the  life- 
cycle  cost  estimate  for  Secure  Flight,  contains  most  of  the  best  practices  outlined 
in  our  Guide.  TSA  followed  some  of  these  practices  in  developing  its  cost  estimate, 
including  defining  the  purpose  of  the  program  and  estimate  purpose;  identifying 
many  program  cost  elements,  including  expenditures  for  facilities,  hardware,  and 
software; and identifying the numbers of staff, their pay, and associated travel and 
training  costs,  among  other  elements.  However,  it  is  unclear  whether  TSA  followed 
other  best  practices  or  did  not  address  the  practices  in  developing  its  estimate.  For 
example, it is unclear whether the cost estimate had been updated to reflect the cur-
rent  program  because  the  detailed  support  for  the  estimate  was  produced  between 
2004 and 2006, and does not reflect the current program plan. In addition, the cost 
estimate does not capture all key costs. For example, the estimate does not capture 
costs beyond 2012 even though the system is expected to be operational beyond that 
date. TSA officials stated that the program’s cost figures were updated in 2007 and 

38 See GAO, Aviation Security: Transportation Security Administration Did Not Fully Disclose 
Uses  of  Personal  Information  during  Secure  Flight  Program  Testing  in  Initial  Privacy  Notices, 
but  Has  Recently  Taken  Steps  to  More  Fully  Inform  the  Public,  GAO–05–864R  (Washington, 
D.C.: July 22, 2005). 

39 See GAO–05–356. 
40 The  E-Government  Act  of  2002  requires  agencies  to  conduct  privacy  impact  assessments 
(PIA).  Pub.  L.  No.  107–347,  § 208,  116  Stat.  2899,  2921–23  (2002).  A  PIA  is  an  analysis  of  how 
personal  information  is  collected,  stored,  shared,  and  managed  in  a  Federal  system.  Agencies 
are required to make their PIAs publicly available. 

41 The  Privacy  Act  places  limitations  on  agencies’  collection,  disclosure,  and  use  of  personal 
information  maintained  in  systems  of  records  and  requires  agencies  to  publish  a  public  notice, 
known as a System of Records Notice (SORN), in the Federal Register. See 5 U.S.C. § 552a. 

42 TSA  will  not  issue  final  notices  until  it  completes  its  evaluation  of  public  comments  on  no-
tice  of  proposed  rulemaking.  The  comment  period  for  the  Secure  Flight  rulemaking  closed  on 
November 21, 2007. 

43 OMB’s Capital Programming Guide (Supplement to Office of Management and Budget Cir-
cular A–11, Part 7: Planning, Budgeting, and Acquisition of Capital Assets) identifies that there 
are certain key criteria that OMB will look for in the justification of spending for proposed new 
capital assets including credible cost estimates. Appendix 9 of the guide identifies that following 
the  guidelines  in  GAO’s  Cost  Assessment  Guide  will  help  agencies  meet  most  cost  estimating 
requirements. 

44 See  GAO,  Cost  Assessment  Guide:  Best  Practices  for  Estimating  and  Managing  Program 

Costs, Exposure Draft, GAO–07–1134SP (Washington, D.C.: July 2007). 

45 The  12  steps  involved  in  developing  a  high-quality  cost  estimating  process  are  (1)  define 
the  estimate’s  purpose,  (2)  develop  the  estimating  plan,  (3)  define  the  program,  (4)  determine 
the estimating structure, (5) identify ground rules and assumptions, (6) obtain the data, (7) de-
velop the point estimate and compare it to an independent cost estimate, (8) conduct sensitivity 
analysis, (9) conduct risk and uncertainty analysis, (10) document the estimate, (11) present es-
timate to management, and 12) update the estimate to reflect actual costs and changes. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

continue  to  be  updated  as  changes  warrant.  Officials  further  stated  that  their  esti-
mates  were  prepared  in  accordance  with  DHS  and  OMB  guidance  and  were  re-
viewed  and  approved  by  DHS  and  OMB.  However,  without  adhering  to  the  best 
practices  discussed  above,  as  recommended  by  OMB,  TSA’s  cost  estimate  may  not 
provide a meaningful baseline from which to track progress, and effectively support 
investment decisionmaking. 

Schedule  estimate.  We  reported  that  TSA  also  did  not  fully  follow  best  practices 
for developing a reliable and valid schedule estimate. GAO’s Cost Assessment Guide 
includes  9  best  practices,  which  if  followed  correctly,  should  result  in  high  quality, 
reliable, and valid schedule estimates.46 

Without  a  reliable  schedule  baseline  and  careful  monitoring  of  its  status,  a  pro-
gram  may  not  be  able  to  determine  when  forecasted  completion  dates  differ  from 
planned  dates.  TSA  has  made  progress  in  developing  a  reliable  and  valid  schedule 
estimate,  including  capturing  key  activities  and  accounting  for  the  development  of 
program  requirements  and  testing.  However,  TSA  officials  could  not  provide  evi-
dence  that  their  scheduling  software  can  produce  a  critical  path  (i.e.,  the  longest 
path of sequential activities in a schedule) driven by discrete lower level tasks. Best 
practices  call  for  the  critical  path  to  be  generated  using  scheduling  software.  We 
also  reported  that  the  schedule  is  not  fully  integrated  because  several  lower  level 
activities were not connected in a logical manner, as called for by best practices. As 
a  result,  the  Secure  Flight  schedule  estimate  may  not  provide  a  meaningful  bench-
mark  from  which  to  gauge  progress,  identify  and  address  potential  problems,  and 
make  informed  decisions.  For  example,  the  inability  to  institute  a  reliable  schedule 
could  affect  TSA’s  ability  to  effectively  measure  contractor  performance  in  meeting 
deliverables. TSA officials stated that their scheduling software can create a critical 
path,  and  that  lower  level  tasks  in  their  schedule  were  logically  linked  together; 
however, they did not provide evidence that supported this. 

In  February  2008,  we  reported  that  since  TSA  completed  a  re-baselining  of  the 
Secure  Flight  program,  and  began  using  its  current  schedule,  the  program  has 
missed milestones and experienced schedule slippages.47 For example, while TSA re-
ported that it had met most of its March 2007 schedule milestones to date, the Au-
gust 2007 milestone for developing Memoranda of Understanding and other written 
agreements (e.g., service level agreements) with key Secure Flight stakeholders (e.g., 
CBP)  was  missed  and  had  not  yet  been  met.  TSA  officials  attributed  schedule  slip-
pages in part to an extension in the Secure Flight rulemaking comment period and 
underestimating the time needed to complete key activities. 

In February 2008, we recommended that TSA fully incorporate best practices into 
the  development  of  Secure  Flight  life-cycle  cost  and  schedule  estimates.  TSA  gen-
erally agreed with these recommendations. We will continue to assess TSA’s efforts 
to  develop  life-cycle  cost  and  schedule  estimates  as  part  of  our  ongoing  review  of 
the Secure Flight Program. 
TSA  Has  Made  Progress  in  Strengthening  Secure  Flight’s  Development,  but  Can 

Further Strengthen Efforts 

While  TSA  has  taken  numerous  steps  to  strengthen  the  development  of  Secure 
Flight, additional challenges remain. These challenges include: (1) implementing the 
program’s risk management plan, (2) planning and conducting end-to-end testing as 
part  of  their  overall  parallel  testing  strategy,  and  (3)  addressing  information  secu-
rity requirements and vulnerabilities. 

Risk management. In October 2006, TSA issued a risk management plan for iden-
tifying,  managing,  and  mitigating  Secure  Flight  program  risks  that  was  consistent 
with  relevant  guidance  and  best  practices.  TSA  also  acquired  an  electronic  tool  to 
guide its risk management efforts. However, TSA has not yet provided us with evi-
dence  that  it  has  implemented  all  aspects  of  the  plan,  including  developing  an  in-
ventory  of  risks  and  related  information  to  demonstrate  that  its  risk  management 
tool has been populated and is being used to identify, prioritize, mitigate, and mon-
itor  risk.  In  November  2007,  TSA  hired  a  risk  management  coordinator,  a  position 
that  had  been  vacant  since  June  2007.  According  to  program  officials,  the  coordi-
nator has been tasked with supporting the risk management board in implementing 
the  risk  management  plan  and  has  provided  related  training  for  its  members.  We 

46 The 9 best practices are (1) capturing key activities, (2) sequencing key activities, (3) estab-
lishing  the  duration  of  key  activities,  (4)  establishing  the  critical  path  for  key  activities,  (5)  as-
signing resources to key activities, (6) identifying ‘‘float time’’ between key activities, (7) distrib-
uting  reserves  to  high  risk  activities  (including  conducting  an  independent  cost  estimate),  (8) 
integrating  key  activities  horizontally—to  link  products  and  outcomes  associated  with  already 
sequenced  activities—and  vertically—to  ensure  that  traceability  exists  among  varying  levels  of 
activities and supporting tasks, and (9) completing schedule risk analysis. 

47 See GAO–08–456T. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

will  continue  to  assess  TSA’s  efforts  to  mange  risk  as  part  of  our  ongoing  review 
of Secure Flight. 

End-to-end test planning. Secure Flight does not fully outline plans for end-to-end 
testing in its overall test and evaluation plan, or other test plans. Federal guidance 
and  related  best  practices  recommend  end-to-end  testing  to  verify  that  the  systems 
that  collectively  support  a  program  like  Secure  Flight  will  interoperate  as  intended 
in  an  operational  environment,  either  actual  or  simulated.48 We  reported  in  March 
2005  on  the  importance  of  Secure  Flight  end-to-end  testing  and  recommended  that 
TSA  perform  such  testing.49 TSA  agreed  with  this  recommendation.  However,  Se-
cure Flight’s current test and evaluation master plan only outlines plans for partner 
organizational  entities  (e.g.,  CBP  for  integration  of  international  watch-list  func-
tions)  to  test  their  respective  parts  of  the  system  on  their  own—rather  than  a  co-
ordinated  end-to-end  test  involving  all  parties.  TSA  developed  a  preliminary  work-
ing draft of an end-to-end testing strategy,called the parallel testing strategy. How-
ever,  the  plan  does  not  contain  provisions  for  (1)  testing  that  ensures  that  sup-
porting  systems  will  operate  as  intended  in  an  operational  environment,  (2)  defini-
tions  and  dates  for  key  milestone  activities  and  parties  responsible  for  completing 
them, or (3) the revision of other test plans, such as the test and evaluation master 
plan,  to  reflect  the  performance  of  end-to-end  tests.  In  February  2008,  we  reported 
that  Secure  Flight  officials  stated  that  they  plan  to  conduct  full  end-to-end  testing 
of  the  program,  beginning  in  the  spring  of  2008,  and  that  they  planned  to  reflect 
this  testing  in  test  plans  that  were  still  under  development.  While  we  commend 
TSA’s plans to conduct end-to-end testing, the draft of TSA’s test plan that discusses 
end-to-end testing does not define a scope that extends to all aspects of the program. 
Until  TSA  has  well-defined  and  approved  end-to-end  test  plans  and  procedures,  it 
will  be  challenged  in  its  ability  to  demonstrate  that  Secure  Flight  will  perform  in 
a way that will allow it to achieve intended program outcomes and results. We will 
continue  to  assess  TSA’s  testing  strategy,  to  include  end-to-end  testing,  as  part  of 
our ongoing review of the program. 

Information security. While the Secure Flight program office has completed impor-
tant  steps  to  incorporate  security  into  the  system’s  development,  it  has  not  fully 
completed other steps to ensure security is effectively addressed. Federal standards 
and  guidance  identify  the  need  to  address  information  security  throughout  the  life- 
cycle  of  information  systems,  and  specifies  a  minimum  set  of  security  steps  needed 
to  effectively  incorporate  security  into  a  system  during  its  development.50 The  Se-
cure  Flight  program  has  performed  several  steps  that  incorporate  security  into  the 
system’s  development,  including  performing  a  security  risk  assessment,  identifying 
and documenting recommended security control requirements, and testing and eval-
uating  security  controls  for  the  system  and  incorporating  identified  weaknesses  in 
remedial action plans. However, other steps pertaining to ensuring that security re-
quirements  are  tested,  preparing  security  documentation,  and  conducting  certifi-
cation  and  accreditation  activities  were  not  adequately  completed.51 For  example, 
security requirements planned for Release One did not always trace to test activities 
for this release.52 Program officials stated that some security requirements were de-
ferred until future releases due to delays in funding for acquiring specific hardware 
and  other  requirements  require  coordination  with  the  information  system  security 
official  to  verify  whether  they  were  tested  as  part  of  security  test  and  evaluation. 
In  addition,  security  documentation  contained  incorrect  or  incomplete  information. 
To  illustrate,  the  systems  security  plan  did  not  identify  all  interconnecting  systems 
that  Secure  Flight  will  interface  with,  such  as  those  operated  by  the  DHS  Watch 
List Service, the organization that will transmit the watch-list to Secure Flight. Pro-
gram officials stated that security documentation was outdated or incorrect because 

48 Risks  of  testing  in  the  production  environment  must  be  thoroughly  analyzed  and  pre-
cautions taken to preclude damage to systems and data. See GAO, Year 2000 Computing Crisis: 
A Testing Guide, GAO/AIMD–10.1.21 (Washington. D.C.: November 1998). 

49 See GAO–05–356. 
50 National  Institute  of  Standards  and  Technology  (NIST),  Technology  Administration,  U.S. 
Department of Commerce, Security Considerations in the Information System Development Life- 
Cycle, NIST Special Publication 800–64 (Gaithersburg, MD: June 2004). 

51 OMB  requires  that  agency  management  officials  formally  authorize  their  information  sys-
tems  to  process  information  and  accept  the  risk  associated  with  their  operation.  This  manage-
ment  authorization  (accreditation)  is  to  be  supported  by  a  formal  technical  evaluation  (certifi-
cation)  of  the  management,  operational,  and  technical  controls  established  in  an  information 
system’s  security  plan.  See  GAO,  Information  Security:  Although  Progress  Reported,  Federal 
Agencies  Need  to  Resolve  Significant  Deficiencies,  GAO–08–496T,  (Washington,  D.C.:  February 
14, 2008). 

52 These  activities  include  (1)  system  testing  performed  as  part  of  software  development,  and 

(2) security test and evaluation performed as part of certification and accreditation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

there  was  insufficient  time  to  update  the  documentation  for  changes  in  the  com-
puting environment and security requirements. 

Furthermore,  program  officials  granted  an  authorization  to  operate—one  of  three 
possible accreditation decisions made in the certification and accreditation process— 
although  the  system  had  46  known  vulnerabilities,  including  11  high-risk  and  27 
moderate-risk  vulnerabilities  and  the  controls  had  not  yet  been  implemented.  53 
Federal guidance as well as DHS policy provide for an interim authority to operate 
accreditation  when  significant  restrictions  or  limitations  exist  and  certain  defi-
ciencies  and  corrective  actions  need  to  be  addressed  within  a  specified  period.  Al-
though security officials identified plans of actions and milestones for addressing the 
vulnerabilities within 60 and 90 days for the high and moderate risks, respectively, 
given  their  significance,  an  interim  authorization  to  operate  would  be  the  more  ap-
propriate  determination.  In  addition,  hardware  components  used  to  implement  con-
trols  over  user  identity  and  account  management  (i.e.,  authentication,  logins  and 
passwords,  and  user  roles  and  privileges),  as  well  as  the  alternate  processing  site 
had  not  yet  been  implemented.  Once  implemented,  the  security  controls  over  these 
components  could  have  an  impact  on  the  information  security  and,  therefore,  may 
require a re-accreditation. Program officials chose the authority to operate accredita-
tion because they asserted that the DHS Chief Information Security Officer does not 
allow  interim  authorizations.  If  these  security  activities  are  not  completed,  there  is 
an  increased  risk  that  key  security  controls  and  requirements  may  not  be  fully  de-
veloped,  tested,  implemented  or  documented.  In  February  2008,  we  recommended 
that TSA fully implement the Secure Flight risk management plan; finalize and ap-
prove  Secure  Flight’s  end-to-end  testing  strategy;  and  strengthen  information  secu-
rity documentation and controls. TSA generally agreed with these recommendations. 
DHS and TSA Lack Performance Measures to Fully Evaluate the Effectiveness of the 

Redress Process, but Plan Additional Measures Under Secure Flight 

DHS and TSA have not developed a complete set of performance measures to as-
sess  the  effectiveness  of  the  redress  process  for  passengers  inconvenienced  as  a  re-
sult  of  watch-list  matching.54 Measuring  performance  allows  organizations  to  track 
the  progress  they  are  making  toward  their  goals  and  gives  managers  critical  infor-
mation on which to base decisions for improving their programs. DHS and TSA are 
developing additional measures for the redress process that they plan to implement 
when Secure Flight becomes operational. 

TSA,  supported  by  the  Terrorist  Screening  Center,  provides  opportunities  for  air-
line passengers to seek redress in cases where they experienced inconveniences dur-
ing  the  check-in  and  screening  processes  due  to  the  possibility  they  have  been 
misidentified  as  being  on  or  wrongly  assigned  to  the  terrorist  watch-list.55 The  re-
dress process enables these individuals to file an inquiry to have erroneous informa-
tion  corrected  in  DHS  systems  that  may  prevent  future  delays  and  inconveniences 
at  the  airport.  In  February  2007,  DHS  established  the  Traveler  Redress  Inquiry 
Program  (TRIP)  to  serve  as  the  central  processing  point  within  the  department  for 
redress inquiries. TSA’s Office of Transportation Security Redress (OTSR) is respon-
sible for reviewing redress inquiries submitted by air passengers through TRIP. 

TRIP  and  OTSR’s  redress  program  goals  are  to  process  redress  applications  as 
quickly  and  as  accurately  as  possible.  However,  to  measure  program  performance 
against  these  goals,  TRIP  and  OTSR  currently  track  only  one  measure  for  redress 
related  to  the  timeliness  of  case  completion,  and  do  not  track  any  performance 
measures related to program accuracy. Previous GAO work identified that agencies 
successful in evaluating performance had measures that used attributes from GAO’s 
best  practices.56 Specifically,  our  previous  work  identified  that  agencies  successful 
in  evaluating  performance  had  measures  that  demonstrated  results,  covered  mul-
tiple priorities, provided useful information for decisionmaking, and successfully ad-
dressed important and varied aspects of program performance. TRIP and OTSR offi-

53 TSA  defines  high-risk  vulnerabilities  as  those  where  there  is  a  strong  need  for  corrective 
measures, the probability of serious incident is likely and risks are not normally acceptable, cor-
rective action plans must be in place as soon as possible, and the authorization to operate may 
be receded or not granted. Moderate-risk vulnerabilities are those where the probability of inci-
dent  is  elevated,  with  increased  probability  of  unauthorized  disclosure  or  disruption  of  oper-
ations, and risks are probably not acceptable. 

54 In  general,  performance  measures  are  indicators,  statistics,  or  metrics  used  to  gauge  pro-

gram performance. 

55 The  term  ‘‘misidentified’’  refers  to  a  person  initially  matched  by  a  screening  entity  to  a 
name  on  the  watch-list,  but  upon  closer  examination,  the  person  is  found  to  not  match  any 
watch-list record. 

56 GAO,  Tax  Administration:  IRS  Needs  to  Further  Refine  Its  Tax  Filing  Season  Performance 

Measures, GAO–03–143, (Washington, D.C.: November 22, 2002). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

cials stated that they do not plan to develop additional performance measures, such 
as measures related to accuracy of the redress process, but rather are awaiting the 
implementation  of  Secure  Flight  to  determine  the  program’s  impact  on  the  redress 
process before creating additional measures. Secure Flight is intended to reduce the 
inconveniences  experienced  by  air  passengers  by  taking  over  from  air  carriers  the 
responsibility for prescreening passengers in order to ensure consistent and effective 
use  of  the  cleared  list,57 which  should  impact  the  effectiveness  of  the  redress  proc-
ess.58 

In  addition  to  TRIP  and  OTSR’s  performance  measures  for  the  redress  process, 
the Secure Flight program office is working with OTSR to develop redress perform-
ance  measures  for  the  Secure  Flight  Program.  Secure  Flight  plans  to  use  the  TSA 
redress process that is currently available for individuals affected by the air carrier 
identity-matching  processes.  Secure  Flight  is  coordinating  with  OTSR  to  determine 
how  this  process  will  be  integrated  with  other  Secure  Flight  requirements.  Secure 
Flight  and  OTSR  are  jointly  developing  a  set  of  performance  measures  and  targets 
covering  multiple  priorities  for  redress  that  are  to  be  implemented  when  Secure 
Flight  becomes  operational,  and  officials  told  us  that  they  will  follow  best  practices 
in the development of these measures. 

While we commend TSA for developing redress performance measures for the Se-
cure  Flight  Program,  since  the  program  is  not  scheduled  to  be  implemented  until 
January  2009,  DHS  and  OTSR’s  current  redress  process  lacks  a  complete  set  of 
measures  with  which  they  can  assess  performance  and  make  program  improve-
ments.  Since  measures  are  often  the  key  motivators  of  performance  and  goal 
achievement,  the  program’s  overall  success  is  at  risk  if  all  priorities  are  not  ad-
dressed  and  information  is  not  obtained  to  make  future  adjustments  and  improve-
ments  to  the  program.  Moreover,  such  performance  data  would  provide  a  baseline 
against which to benchmark Secure Flight’s progress and planned improvements to 
the  redress  process.  In  February  2008,  we  recommended  that  DHS  and  TSA  re-
evaluate redress performance measures and consider creating and implementing ad-
ditional  measures  that,  consistent  with  best  practices,  demonstrate  results,  cover 
multiple  priorities,  and  provide  useful  information  for  decisionmaking.  TSA  gen-
erally agreed with this recommendation. 
TSA  Has  Taken  Steps  to  Secure  the  Nation’s  Surface  Transportation 

Systems, but More Work Remains 

DHS, primarily through the efforts of TSA, has undertaken initiatives to strength-
en  the  security  of  the  Nation’s  surface  transportation  systems.  While  TSA  has  de-
voted the vast majority of its resources to securing commercial aviation and to meet-
ing  related  statutory  requirements,  it  has  more  recently  increased  its  focus  on  the 
security  of  surface  modes  of  transportation.  However,  these  efforts  are  still  largely 
in  the  early  stages.  International  events  such  as  the  March  2004  bombing  of  com-
muter trains in Madrid, Spain, and the July 2005 bombings and attempted attacks 
against  public  transit  in  London,  England,  have,  in  part,  contributed  to  this  in-
creased focus. TSA and other DHS components have developed a strategic approach 
for  securing  surface  modes  of  transportation,  have  taken  steps  to  conduct  risk  as-
sessments of surface transportation assets and have administered related grant pro-
grams. TSA also issued a proposed rule in December 2006 which, if finalized as pro-
posed, will require freight and passenger rail operators to implement additional se-
curity  requirements,  and  will  increase  TSA’s  oversight  of  operators’  security  ef-
forts.59 However,  TSA  has  not  issued  standards  for  securing  all  surface  transpor-
tation  modes  or  determined  whether  it  will  issue  standards  for  all  modes,  and  is 
still defining what its regulatory role will be for these modes. We have ongoing work 
assessing the security of surface modes of transportation, and will report on our re-
sults later this year. 
Strategic Approach for Implementing Security Functions 

In  September  2005,  DHS  completed  the  National  Strategy  for  Transportation  Se-
curity.  This  strategy  identified  and  evaluated  transportation  assets  in  the  United 
States that could be at risk of a terrorist attack and addressed transportation sector 

57 The  cleared  list  contains  the  names  and  other  personal  identifying  information  of  individ-
uals  who  have  gone  through  the  redress  process  and  have  been  checked  and  cleared  as  being 
persons not on the No Fly or Selectee lists. 

58 Under  Secure  Flight,  as  described  by  TSA’s  notice  of  proposed  rulemaking,  TSA  plans  to 
introduce  a  unique  redress  number  that  would  enable  Secure  Flight  to  ‘‘pre-clear’’  individuals 
who have previously been misidentified, have gone through the redress process, and who provide 
additional  identifying  information  when  making  a  reservation.  TSA  expects  this  to  reduce  the 
likelihood of travel delays at check-in for those passengers. 

59 See 71 Fed Reg. 76,852 (Dec. 21, 2006). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

security  needs.  Further,  in  May  2007,  DHS  issued  a  strategic  plan  for  securing  the 
transportation sector and supporting annexes for each of the surface transportation 
modes,  and  reported  taking  actions  to  adopt  the  strategic  approach  outlined  by  the 
plan. The Transportation Systems Sector-Specific Plan describes the security frame-
work  that  is  intended  to  enable  sector  stakeholders  to  make  effective  and  appro-
priate  risk-based  security  and  resource  allocation  decisions  within  the  transpor-
tation  network.  TSA  has  begun  to  implement  some  of  the  security  initiatives  out-
lined  in  the  sector-specific  plan  and  supporting  modal  plans.  Additionally,  the  Im-
plementing  Recommendations  of  the  9/11  Commission  Act  imposes  a  deadline  of 
May  2008,  for  the  Secretary  of  DHS  to  develop  and  implement  the  National  Strat-
egy  for  Public  Transportation  Security.  Our  work  assessing  DHS’s  efforts  in  imple-
menting  its  strategy  for  securing  surface  transportation  modes  is  being  conducted 
as part of our ongoing reviews of mass transit, passenger and freight rail, commer-
cial  vehicle,  and  highway  infrastructure  security.  We  will  report  on  the  results  of 
this work later this year. 
Threat, Vulnerability, and Criticality Assessments 

TSA has taken actions to assess risk by conducting threat, criticality, and vulner-
ability  assessments  of  surface  transportation  assets,  particularly  for  mass  transit, 
passenger  rail,  and  freight  rail,  but  its  efforts  related  to  commercial  vehicles  and 
highway  infrastructure  are  in  the  early  stages.  For  example,  TSA  had  conducted 
threat  assessments  of  all  surface  modes  of  transportation.  TSA  has  also  conducted 
assessments  of  the  vulnerabilities  associated  with  some  surface  transportation  as-
sets.  For  example,  regarding  freight  rail,  TSA  has  conducted  vulnerability  assess-
ments  of  rail  corridors  in  eight  High  Threat  Urban  Areas  where  toxic-inhalation- 
hazard shipments are transported. With respect to commercial vehicles and highway 
infrastructure,  TSA’s  vulnerability  assessment  efforts  are  ongoing.  According  to 
TSA,  the  agency  performed  113  corporate  security  reviews  on  highway  transpor-
tation  organizations  through  Fiscal  Year  2007,  such  as  trucking  companies,  state 
Departments  of  Transportation,  and  motor  coach  companies.60 However,  TSA  does 
not have a plan or a time-frame for conducting these reviews on a nationwide basis. 
Furthermore, DHS’s National Protection and Programs Directorate’s Office of Infra-
structure  Protection  conducts  vulnerability  assessments  of  surface  transportation 
assets to identify protective measures to reduce or mitigate asset vulnerability. With 
regard  to  criticality  assessments,  TSA  reported  in  April  2008  that  the  agency  had 
conducted  1,345  assessments  of  passenger  rail  stations.61 Additionally,  the  Imple-
menting  Recommendations  of  the  9/11  Commission  Act  has  several  provisions  re-
lated to security assessments. For instance, the Act requires DHS to review existing 
security assessments for public transportation systems as well as conduct additional 
assessments as necessary to ensure that all high-risk public transportation agencies 
have security assessments. Moreover, the Act also requires DHS to establish a Fed-
eral task force to complete a nationwide risk assessment of a terrorist attack on rail 
carriers. We will continue to review threat, vulnerability, and criticality assessments 
conducted  by  TSA  related  to  securing  surface  modes  of  transportation  during  our 
ongoing work.62 
Issuance of Security Standards 

TSA  has  taken  actions  to  develop  and  issue  security  standards  for  mass  transit, 
passenger rail, and freight rail transportation modes. However, TSA has not yet de-
veloped  or  issued  security  standards  for  all  surface  transportation  modes,  such  as 
commercial  vehicle  and  highway  infrastructure,  or  determined  whether  standards 
are necessary for these modes of transportation. Specifically, TSA has developed and 
issued  both  mandatory  rail  security  directives  and  recommended  voluntary  best 
practices—known  as  Security  Action  Items—for  transit  agencies  and  passenger  rail 
operators  to  implement  as  part  of  their  security  programs  to  enhance  both  security 
and  emergency-management  preparedness.  TSA  also  issued  a  notice  of  proposed 
rulemaking  in  December  2006,  which  if  finalized  as  proposed,  would  include  addi-
tional  security  requirements  for  passenger  and  freight  rail  transportation  opera-

60 TSA  conducts  corporate  security  reviews  in  multiple  modes  of  transportation  to  establish 
baseline data against which to evaluate minimum-security standards and identify coverage gaps 
in reviewed systems. 

61 According to TSA, the agency completed 945 criticality assessments in Fiscal Year 2007 and 
400  assessments  in  Fiscal  Year  2008.  TSA  officials  stated  that  some  of  these  assessments  may 
have been conducted to update previously completed ones. 

62 For  more  information,  see  GAO,  Passenger  Rail  Security:  Enhanced  Federal  Leadership 
Needed  to  Prioritize  and  Guide  Security  Efforts,  GAO–07–225T  (Washington,  D.C.:  Jan.  18, 
2007). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

tors.63 For  example,  the  rule  would  include  additional  security  requirements  de-
signed  to  ensure  that  freight  railroads  have  protocols  for  the  secure  custody  trans-
fers of toxic-inhalation-hazard rail cars in High Threat Urban Areas. DHS and other 
Federal  partners  have  also  been  collaborating  with  the  American  Public  Transpor-
tation  Association  (APTA)  and  public  and  private  security  professionals  to  develop 
industry-wide  security  standards  for  mass  transit  systems.  APTA  officials  reported 
that they expect several of the voluntary standards to be released in mid-2008. Ad-
ditionally, the Implementing Recommendations of the 9/11 Commission Act requires 
DHS  to  issue  regulations  establishing  standards  and  guidelines  for  developing  and 
implementing  vulnerability  assessments  and  security  plans  for  high-risk  railroad 
carriers and over-the-road bus operators.64 The deadlines for the regulations are Au-
gust  2008  and  February  2009,  respectively.  With  respect  to  freight  rail,  TSA  is  de-
veloping  a  notice  of  proposed  rulemaking  proposing  that  high-risk  rail  carriers  con-
duct  vulnerability  assessments  and  develop  and  implement  security  plans.  We  will 
continue  to  assess  TSA’s  efforts  to  issue  security  standards  for  other  surface  trans-
portation modes during our ongoing reviews. 
Compliance Inspections 

TSA  has  hired  and  deployed  surface  transportation  security  inspectors  who  con-
duct  compliance  inspections  for  both  passenger  and  freight  rail  modes  of  transpor-
tation;  however,  questions  exist  regarding  how  TSA  will  employ  the  inspectors  to 
enforce  new  regulations  proposed  in  its  December  2006  Notice  of  Proposed  Rule-
making  and  regulations  to  be  developed  in  accordance  with  the  Implementing  Rec-
ommendations of the 9/11 Commission Act.65 TSA officials reported having 100 sur-
face  transportation  inspectors  during  Fiscal  Year  2005  and,  as  of  December  2007, 
were  maintaining  an  inspector  workforce  of  about  the  same  number.  The  agency’s 
budget  request  for  Fiscal  Year  2009  includes  $11.6  million  to  fund  100  surface 
transportation  security  inspectors—which  would  maintain  its  current  staffing  level. 
Inspectors’ responsibilities include conducting on-site inspections of key facilities for 
freight  rail,  passenger  rail,  and  transit  systems;  assessing  transit  systems’  imple-
mentation  of  core  transit  security  fundamentals  and  comprehensive  security  action 
items; conducting examinations of stakeholder operations, including compliance with 
security  directives;  identifying  security  gaps;  and  developing  effective  practices.  To 
meet  these  compliance  responsibilities,  TSA  reported  in  December  2007  that  it  had 
conducted voluntary assessments of 50 of the 100 largest transit agencies, including 
34 passenger rail and 16 bus-only agencies, and has plans to continue these assess-
ments  with  the  next  50  largest  transit  agencies  during  Fiscal  Year  2008.  With  re-
spect  to  freight  rail,  TSA  reported  visiting,  during  2007,  almost  300  railroad  facili-
ties  including  terminal  and  railroad  yards  to  assess  the  railroads’  implementation 
of  17  DHS-recommended  Security  Action  Items  associated  with  the  transportation 
of toxic-inhalation-hazard materials. 

TSA has raised concerns about the agency’s ability to continue to meet anticipated 
inspection responsibilities given the new regulations proposed in its December 2006 
Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  and  requirements  of  the  Implementing  Rec-
ommendations  of  the  9/11  Commission  Act.  For  example,  the  Act  mandates  that 
high-risk  over-the-road  bus  operators,  railroad  carriers,  and  public  transportation 
agencies develop and implement security plans which must include, among other re-
quirements,  procedures  to  be  implemented  in  response  to  a  terrorist  attack.66 The 
Act  further  requires  the  Secretary  of  DHS  to  review  each  plan  within  6  months  of 
receiving  it.  TSA  officials  stated  that  they  believe  TSA  inspectors  will  likely  be 
tasked  to  conduct  these  reviews.  The  Act  also  requires  that  the  Secretary  of  DHS 
develop and issue interim final regulations by November 2007, for a public transpor-
tation security training program.67 As of April 2008, these interim regulations have 
not  been  issued.  According  to  TSA  officials,  TSA  inspectors  will  likely  be  involved 
in  ensuring  compliance  with  these  regulations  as  well.  To  help  address  these  addi-
tional  requirements,  the  Implementing  Recommendations  of  the  9/11  Commission 
Act authorizes funds to be appropriated for TSA to employ additional surface trans-
portation  inspectors,  and  requires  that  surface  transportation  inspectors  have  rel-
evant  transportation  experience  and  appropriate  security  and  inspection  qualifica-

63 See 71 Fed. Reg. 76,852 (Dec. 21, 2006). 
64 See Pub. L. No. 110–53, § 1512, 1531, 121 Stat. at 429–33, 454–57. 
65 See, e.g., Pub. L. No. 110–53, § 1534, 121 Stat at 461–62. 
66 See Pub. L. No. 110–53, § 1405, 1512, 1531, 121 Stat. at 402–05, 429–33, 454–57. 
67 See  Pub.  L.  No.  110–53,  § 1408,  121  Stat.  at  409–11  (requiring  that  the  Secretary  develop 

and issue final regulations for the training program by August 2008). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

tions.68 However,  it  is  not  clear  how  TSA  will  meet  these  new  requirements  since 
the  agency  has  not  requested  funding  for  additional  surface  transportation  security 
inspectors  for  Fiscal  Year  2009.  We  will  continue  to  assess  TSA’s  inspection  efforts 
during our ongoing work.69 
Grant Programs 

DHS  has  developed  and  administered  grant  programs  for  various  surface  trans-
portation  modes,  although  stakeholders  have  raised  concerns  regarding  the  current 
grant process. For example, the DHS Office of Grants and Training, now called the 
Grant Programs Directorate, has used various programs to fund passenger rail secu-
rity  since  2003.  Through  the  Urban  Areas  Security  Initiative  grant  program,  the 
Grant  Programs  Directorate  has  provided  grants  to  urban  areas  to  help  enhance 
their  overall  security  and  preparedness  level  to  prevent,  respond  to,  and  recover 
from  acts  of  terrorism.  The  Grant  Programs  Directorate  used  Fiscal  Year  2005, 
2006,  and  2007  appropriations  to  build  on  the  work  under  way  through  the  Urban 
Areas Security Initiative program, and create and administer new programs focused 
specifically  on  transportation  security,  including  the  Transit  Security  Grant  Pro-
gram, Intercity Passenger Rail Security Grant Program, and the Freight Rail Secu-
rity  Grant  Program.  However,  some  industry  stakeholders  have  raised  concerns  re-
garding DHS’s current grant process, including the shifting of funding priorities, the 
lack of program flexibility, and other barriers to the provision of grant funding. For 
example,  transit  agencies  have  reported  that  the  lack  of  predictability  in  how  TSA 
will  assess  grant  projects  against  funding  priorities  makes  it  difficult  to  engage  in 
long-term  planning  of  security  initiatives.  Specifically,  transit  agencies  have  re-
ported  receiving  funding  to  begin  projects—such  as  retrofitting  their  transit  fleet 
with  security  cameras  or  installing  digital  video  recording  systems—but  not  being 
able to finish these projects in subsequent years because TSA had changed its fund-
ing priorities. The Implementing Recommendations of the 9/11 Commission Act codi-
fies  surface  transportation  grant  programs  and  imposes  statutory  requirements  on 
the  administration  of  the  programs.70 For  example,  the  Act  lists  authorized  uses  of 
these  grant  funds  and  requires  DHS  to  award  the  grants  based  on  risk.71 It  also 
requires  that  DHS  and  DOT  determine  the  most  effective  and  efficient  way  to  dis-
tribute  grant  funds,  authorizing  DHS  to  transfer  funds  to  DOT  for  the  purpose  of 
disbursement.72 According  to  the  TSA  Fiscal  Year  2009  budget  justification,  to  en-
sure  that  the  selected  projects  are  focused  on  increasing  security,  DHS  grants  are 
to  be  awarded  based  on  risk.  We  will  continue  assessing  surface  transportation  re-
lated grant programs as part of our ongoing work.73 
Conclusions 

DHS  and  TSA  have  undertaken  numerous  initiatives  to  strengthen  the  security 
of  the  Nation’s  transportation  system,  and  should  be  commended  for  these  efforts. 
Regarding  commercial  aviation,  TSA  has  developed  processes  to  more  efficiently  al-
locate and deploy the TSO workforce, strengthened screening procedures, is working 
to  develop  and  deploy  more  effective  screening  technologies,  strengthened  the  secu-
rity  of  air  cargo,  and  improved  the  development  of  a  program  to  prescreen  pas-
sengers  against  terrorist  watch-lists.  Further,  TSA  has  more  recently  taken  actions 
in  a  number  of  areas  to  help  secure  surface  modes  of  transportation.  More  work, 
however,  remains.  For  example,  TSA’s  surface  transportation  security  efforts  are 
still largely in the early stage, and the nature of its regulatory role, and relationship 
with transportation operators, is still being defined. Opportunities therefore exist to 
further strengthen these efforts, in particular in the areas of risk management and 
program planning and monitoring. Our work has shown—in homeland security and 
in  other  areas—that  a  comprehensive  risk  management  approach  can  help  inform 
decisionmakers in the allocation of finite resources to the areas of greatest need. We 
are encouraged that risk management has been a cornerstone of DHS and TSA pol-
icy, and that TSA has implemented risk-based decisionmaking into a number of its 
efforts.  Despite  this  commitment,  however,  TSA  will  continue  to  face  difficult  deci-
sions  and  trade-offs—particularly  as  threats  to  transportation  systems  evolve—re-
garding  acceptable  levels  of  risk  and  the  need  to  balance  security  and  its  invest-
ments among all transportation modes. We recognize that doing so will not be easy. 

68 See Pub. L. No. 110–53, § 1304, 121 Stat. at 393–94. 
69 For  more  information,  see  GAO,  Passenger  Rail  Security:  Enhanced  Federal  Leadership 
Needed  to  Prioritize  and  Guide  Security  Efforts,  GAO–06–181T  (Washington,  D.C.:  Oct.  20, 
2005). 

70 See Pub. L. No. 110–53, § 1406, 1513, 1532, 121 Stat. 405–08, 433–35, 457–60. 
71 See, e.g., Pub. L. No. 110–53, § 1406(b), (c)(2), 121 Stat. at 405–07. 
72 See Pub. L. No. 110–53, § 1406(d), 1532(e), 121 Stat. at 407, 459. 
73 For more information see GAO–06–181T. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Mr.  Chairman  this  concludes  my  statement.  I  would  be  pleased  to  answer  any 

questions that you or other members of the Committee may have at this time. 

35 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, Director Berrick. 
If I may ask the Administrator, Mr. Secretary, why is the Admin-
istration  proposing  an  increase  in  fees  just  after  Congress  consid-
ered  a  similar  request  and  rejected  it?  And  how  much  funding  do 
you  have  at  the  current  time  for  the  EDS  program,  which  has  not 
been expended? 

Mr. HAWLEY. For the issue of the fee financing, it is significantly 
different  from  the  previous  request  in  that  it  is  limited  by  time.  It 
is  a  four  year  surcharge  to  get  through  the  in-line  baggage  system 
process,  and  we  have  that  in  for  over  $400  million  in  2009  and 
about $1.7 billion or so for the 4 years, which would complete with-
in  that  time-frame  all  of  the  EDS  restructuring  that  now  is  going 
to take more than a decade. 

So  that  is—the  reason  is  to  accelerate  the  deployment,  and  we 
thought this was a better way to do it than being able to get addi-
tional appropriated dollars, increases to get that done as well. 

And  then  for  the  unobligated,  I  can  provide  that  for  the  Com-
mittee.  But  I  would  like  to  raise  one  other  issue  that  is  important 
here,  and  that  is  that  we  are  looking  with  the  National  Labora-
tories—Sandia  National  Labs,  Lawrence  Livermore,  Los  Alamos— 
at  what  the  standards  are  for  checked  baggage  screening  in  view 
of additional technology, both in the airframe security to make the 
airframe  stronger  as  well  as  improvements  in  detection  capability 
that  might  open  up  more  cost-effective  routes  for  us  to  do  checked 
baggage screening that would have that effect by lowering the cost 
of accelerating the deployment. 

So  we  are  expecting  to  get  further  word  from  the  National  Labs 
here in the next month or so, and that will better inform us on the 
best  deployments.  But  we  have  also  set  up  the  strategic  plan—I 
think we did that last week—that projects all of the 2008 proposed 
funding. 

The CHAIRMAN. So you do have leftover, but you don’t know how 

to spend that yet? 

Mr. HAWLEY. No, no. We know how to spend it. In fact, we have 
sent  up  to  the  Congress  the  deployment  plan  for  2008.  And  what 
it  says  is  we  have  this  much  money,  and  here  is  how  we  would 
spend it. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  The  Committee  has  been  advised  that  airports 
need more money at this time to improve their infrastructure, and 
they are not prepared at the present time for the installation of the 
EDS. Is there any truth to that? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  The  reconstruction  of  airports  is  extremely  expen-
sive,  and  in  the  9/11  bill  that  you  and  the  Vice  Chairman  men-
tioned  in  your  comments,  the  requirement  of  using  the  first  $250 
million  that  drops  in  from  the  user  fees  gets  spent  on  these  sys-
tems. So the reason it would take another decade or so is that the 
needs are so great and so expensive. 

And  so,  we  either  have  to  find  a  way  to  do  it  much  cheaper, 
using  a  different  technology,  or  a  financing  mechanism  like  a  sur-
charge that would allow us to speed it up. Those are the two levers 
that  we  can  play  with  to  accelerate  the  deployment.  Other  than 
that, it is on a longer term that doesn’t make me comfortable. And 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

I  think  the  clear  message  from  this  Committee  and  ATSA  was  get 
these machines deployed system-wide as soon as possible. 

The CHAIRMAN. I will be back again. But I would like to ask Ms. 
Berrick, do you believe that the TSA plan to meet the requirement 
to  inspect  100  percent  of  the  cargo  transported  on  passenger  air-
craft is being carried out or can be carried out? 

Ms.  BERRICK.  They  do  have  plans  that  we  are  aware  of,  and  I 
know  that  they  are  kicking  off  a  pilot  to  begin  this  effort.  And  it 
involves  moving  the  screening  further  down  the  supply  chain.  We 
have  done  work  on  air  cargo  security  before  and  did  identify  that 
this method is being used in some other countries successfully, and 
the United Kingdom is one place where it is being used. 

So  the  idea  and  the  concept  of  this  has  proven  effective  in  other 
countries.  We  haven’t  yet  seen  the  specific  details  and  plans  on 
how TSA plans to implement it here, but that is something we will 
be  looking  at,  that  we  have  been  asked  by  Congress  to  do  follow 
up work on. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  So  you  haven’t  had  the  opportunity  to  study  the 

TSA plan? 

Ms. BERRICK. Not in detail, no. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  What  primary  actions  do  you  believe  that  TSA 

should take to strengthen the security of air cargo? 

Ms.  BERRICK.  I  think  one  is  developing  detailed  plans  for  their 
strategy  for  securing  100  percent  of  cargo  and  screening  100  per-
cent of cargo on passenger aircraft. That is one area. 

Another  area  is  cargo  coming  into  the  United  States.  TSA  has 
done  a  lot  of  security  efforts  to  strengthen  cargo  transported  do-
mestically.  There  has  been  less  of  a  focus  by  CBP  and  TSA  on 
cargo coming into the United States from foreign countries. For ex-
ample, there is a lot of cargo that is exempted from screening that 
is  coming  into  the  United  States  from  foreign  countries.  Also,  TSA 
and CBP’s inspection program is less rigorous for cargo coming into 
the United States from foreign countries. 

So I think developing the plan for 100 percent screening and also 
putting  an  increased  focus  on  cargo  coming  into  the  United  States 
should be two priorities. 

The CHAIRMAN. Do you believe that the technology being planned 

for use by TSA would meet the requirements? 

Ms.  BERRICK.  We  have  reported  that  DHS’s  Science  and  Tech-
nology  Office,  which  is  spearheading  the  technology  effort  in  part-
nership with TSA, has been slow. There are a lot of technology pi-
lots  underway.  I  think  about  10.  There  is  one  that  we  have  been 
able to identify where there are specific time-frames on when they 
expect  it  to  be  deployed,  and  that  is  EDS-type  screening.  But  the 
rest, it has been unclear when the completion dates for those have 
been expected. 

So, to answer your question, there are a lot of technologies in the 
works.  It  is  unclear  when  they  are  going  to  be  available  for  cargo. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator Stevens? 
Senator STEVENS. Thank you very much. 
First,  Mr.  Hawley,  I  have  said  many  times  when  you  are  here 
before us that in our state 70 percent of our cities are reached only 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

by air. We fly probably 10, 15 times the amount of any Americans, 
and yet I find that there is no recognition of this in this plan. 

Alaskans  are  dependent  upon  air  travel  as  their  primary  means 
of  transportation,  are  forced  to  pay  the  surcharge  every  time  they 
take  off.  Air  travelers,  per  se,  are  the  only  ones  that  pay  for  secu-
rity in this country. 

Now,  why  should  we  continue  to  increase  the  surcharge  on  peo-
ple  who  fly  every  day  in  our  state  when,  in  any  other  State,  they 
would  be  getting  on  a  commuter  train  or  they  would  be  getting  on 
a  bus  or  getting  in  a  taxi  and  paying  no  cost  at  all  for  their  secu-
rity? Why do you continue this? 

Mr. HAWLEY. I appreciate the point. The reason is to try to accel-

erate the deployment of these systems and—— 

Senator  STEVENS.  But  why  don’t  you  exempt  some  of  the  small 
areas?  The  small  hub  airports  are  very  busy  little  airports,  but 
they  are  primarily  serving  just  the  local  area,  commuters  in  from 
various  places  into  a  place  like  Bethel.  And  then  once  you  get  to 
Bethel,  you  wait  until  the  next  day  to  get  on  a  plane  to  go  to  An-
chorage.  And  then  you  wait  in  Anchorage  until  the  next  day  for  a 
plane to go to Seattle. 

Now  I  don’t  know  any  other  state  that  really  uses  air  transpor-
tation the way we do, but your regulations don’t recognize that dif-
ference for Alaska. Why? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  It  is  a  large-scale  fee  tool,  and  I  suppose  that  in 
the  drafting  of  the  legislation  to  enact  it,  it  would  be  possible  to 
reflect some of the things that you are talking about. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  I  looked  at  that,  and  the  idea  we  gave 
you provided discretion on where you charge them. You don’t have 
to  charge  the  same  thing  at  hub  airports  you  charge  at  large  air-
ports.  You  don’t  have  to  charge  the  same  thing  for  intrastate  as 
you do interstate passengers. 

At  least  intrastate  versus  interstate  would  make  a  great  deal  of 
difference  to  us.  But  why  do  you  insist  that  intrastate  passengers 
pay the same costs? As I said, some of our people fly two and three 
times in a day to just get to either Anchorage or Fairbanks. 

I don’t know why we have to pay intrastate surcharges for things 
we are not going to get at all. As a matter of fact, you do not even 
plan for this. There is no solution for the small airports at all. 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Yes,  so  we  would  be  happy  to  work  with  the  Com-
mittee  staff.  Frankly,  as  we  looked  at  it,  it  was  trying  to  fill  the 
budget hole of how can we, with simplicity and certainty, raise the 
money  that  we  need  to  fill  it,  and  that  kind  of  fine-tuning,  we 
would be happy to work with the Committee on. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  I  hope  you  would  because  you  probably 
have  10,000,  15,000  people  in  my  state  that  are  flying  more  than 
any other Americans, but they are flying within our own state. And 
I  don’t  see  any  reason  why  we  should  pay  for  security  for  Chicago 
and  New  York  and  Los  Angeles.  And  that  is  what  we  are  doing. 
We  are  paying  more  per  capita  than  anyone,  and  yet  there  are 
fewer of us paying in. 

I  would  hope  you  would  take  a  good  look  at  it.  The  intrastate 
thing just makes no sense to me in terms of this. I will get to you, 
and you may disagree with me at the GAO. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

But  let  me  go  on  to  air  cargo,  and  that  has  been  mentioned  by 
GAO.  The  concept  of  this,  the  requirements  of  the  9/11  bill  man-
dates  inspection  of  100  percent  of  cargo  within  3  years.  Now  our 
Anchorage  airport  is  number  one  in  the  U.S.  for  landed  weight 
cargo  aircraft,  number  three  in  the  world  for  cargo  throughput. 
How do you plan to catch up with the requirements of the 9/11 bill 
if you haven’t started at all with regard to our airport? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  We  are  looking  only  at  air  cargo  carried  on  pas-
senger  aircraft  for  that  particular  provision.  There  are  two  provi-
sions.  One  is  directed  primarily  on  the  maritime  sector,  and  then 
this  one  is  aimed  at  the  passenger  jets  that  have  cargo  on  them. 
And so, it is an approach very much similar to what the GAO rec-
ommended  in  the  study  they  did,  and  it  gets  to  the  issue  that  Ms. 
Berrick raised about international partnership. 

So  we  are  using  a  system  that  is  used  in  other  countries.  And 
that  by  having  a  system  that  can  align  with  these  other  nations, 
we  think  that  addresses  the  issue  that  Ms.  Berrick  raised  about 
screening of incoming. But—— 

Senator STEVENS. Aren’t we included in the 100 percent require-

ment for air cargo within 3 years? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.—it  is  50  percent  by  February  2009  and  then,  18 
months  later,  100  percent  of  cargo  carried  on  passenger  aircraft. 
And so, that is—— 

Senator  STEVENS.  You  are  not  inspecting  cargo  airplanes  at  all? 
Mr. HAWLEY.—not a part of this program. There is a separate se-
curity  plan  for  all  cargo  aircraft  that  does  not  contemplate  screen-
ing every individual package on it. So the view from a risk perspec-
tive is that the passenger aircraft represent a bigger risk. 

Senator  STEVENS.  I  would  question  that.  All  right,  let  me  go  on 
then to TWIC. As you know, TWIC enrollment in Alaska began on 
April  30th,  and  it  is  planned  for  Anchorage,  Nikiski,  and  Valdez. 
I am told you plan to have mobile enrollment sites at Kodiak, Cor-
dova, Dutch Harbor, Ketchikan, Craig, Haines, Skagway, Sitka, Pe-
tersburg, and Wrangell. 

Now the problem is for people who have to travel long distances, 
Alaskan  new  hires  have  to  fly  to  Anchorage  or  other  central  loca-
tions to enroll in these plans at their cost. And when you are talk-
ing  about  Dutch  Harbor,  you  are  talking  about  flying  about  1,200 
miles. Or if you are up in Barrow, it is a good 2,000. 

Why?  Why  do  these  people  have  to  fly,  and  why  can’t  you  take 
people  out  to  these  areas  on  a  scheduled  basis  and  have  them  get 
enrolled? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Well,  the  ports  in  Alaska  are,  as  you  know,  a  big 

logistical challenge. So we are looking at that. 

And  what  we  are  hoping  is  that  we  can  get  over  the  next  year, 
as people travel into the sites where we do have the mobile screen-
ing  locations,  that  we  can  get  the  majority  of  them.  And,  then  at 
some point, to then make a decision based on where we have popu-
lations  that  need  to  be  credentialed  and  to  then  deploy  other  mo-
bile screening to folks we need to cover. 

And  that  is  another  reason  why  we  extended  the  compliance 

deadline until next April, to account for some of the logistics. 

Senator STEVENS. You have extended the compliance time? I did 

not realize that. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

Mr. HAWLEY. Until April 15, 2009. And that was done in conjunc-
tion  with  industry  to  accommodate  many  of  the  concerns  that  you 
are articulating. 

Senator  STEVENS.  OK,  that  means  that  these  people  are  coming 
onboard  now  before  2009  don’t  have  to  be—have  TWIC  at  all, 
right? 

Mr. HAWLEY. There will not be the access control compliance en-
forcement  until  then.  They  are  getting  the  threat  assessments. 
They  have  them.  They  are  subject  to  spot  checks.  But  the  date  by 
which everybody has to have it is moved to April 15. 

There  will  be  some  enforcement  in  October  in  the  New  England 
area,  and  that  is  worked  out  with  the  captain  of  the  port  and  the 
industry there. 

Senator  STEVENS.  We  do  have  half  the  coastline  in  the  United 

States. Have you ever been to Dutch Harbor? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Not  to  Dutch  Harbor,  no,  sir.  I  have  been  to  Alas-

ka, but not Dutch Harbor. 

Senator  STEVENS.  But  I  really  think—have  you  ever  been  to 

southeastern Alaska—Juneau, Ketchikan? 

Mr. HAWLEY. Well, Kodiak. 
Senator  STEVENS.  You  have  a  good  fishing  knowledge,  I  can  see. 
Mr. HAWLEY. Not a great deal. Not success anyway. 
Senator  STEVENS.  OK.  Well,  I  am  worried  about  the  fact  that 
these regulations, again, are imposed upon us when we are spread 
out  so  thin  around  an  area  one-fifth  the  size  of  the  U.S.,  and  this 
puts  the  burden  on  our  workers  to  travel  long  distances  to  meet 
your  people.  And  I  think  you  have—there  is  enough  so  that  your 
people could travel the long distances and have a schedule to enroll 
our prospective workers, and I don’t quite understand how you are 
going to get there with what you have got planned. 

Mr. HAWLEY. Well, we start in Nikiski, as you know, next week, 
and that is another population that we will be serving. And I think 
a  lot  of  it  has  to  do  with  the  communication  with  the  industry  to 
get  the  word  out  so  that  folks  who  are  traveling  into  the  areas 
where  we  do  have  the  stations  will  have  a  chance  to  enroll.  But, 
it is our responsibility and that with our partner, Lockheed Martin, 
who  provides  these,  to  service  the  community  and  whatever  it 
takes to get people enrolled. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Have  you  ever  thought  of  letting  the  Post  Of-
fices  do  this?  So  many  other  things,  like  getting  passports  and 
what  not,  you  go  to  the  Post  Office  and  you  can  fill  out  the  form 
and get it and do it right and mail it in. 

Why  can’t  you  use  the  facilities  that  are  already  available,  sup-
ported  by  the  economy,  and  have  them  be  able  to  identify  them-
selves  and  get  the  application?  The  Postmaster  in  all  these  places 
can  verify  a  passport  or  identification  just  as  well  as  your  TWIC 
guys  can.  I  don’t  understand  why  the  expense  of  the  system  the 
way you have designed it in areas like mine. 

Mr. HAWLEY. I think that is a common sense suggestion, and we 

will pursue it. 

Senator STEVENS. Thank you. 
Let me go to you, Ms. Berrick. This burden is placed on air trav-
elers  where  this  temporary  surcharge  is  leveraging  Government 
contributions for long-term funding from the bond markets. Do you 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

support  the  Administration’s  preference  for  the  short-term  ap-
proach rather than a long-term solution to the 9/11 bill? 

Ms.  BERRICK.  Well,  we  haven’t  looked  specifically  at  the  fee  and 
the surcharge and assessed that. We have reported that in-line sys-
tems  can  significantly  increase  security  and  create  efficiencies  in 
terms  of  TSA  needing  less  TSOs  to  screen  baggage,  and  we  said 
that  it  doesn’t  make  sense  for  all  airports,  but  it  is  one  good  solu-
tion for a lot of airports. 

But in terms of time-frames, we recommended that TSA come up 
with  a  strategy  for  how  they  are  going  to  address  this.  They  have 
issued  the  strategy.  We  didn’t  make  a  comment  on  at  what  point 
this  should  be  implemented,  but  we  did  identify  that  this  can  pro-
vide significant benefits, and it is important to pursue it. 

Senator STEVENS. Do you agree that this surcharge is an unnec-
essary  burden  on  air  travelers  in  terms  of  the  concept  involved?  I 
don’t know why we should have a temporary surcharge to deal with 
a  problem  like  this.  Why  shouldn’t  we  have  a  percentage  increase 
in the surcharge, per se, and not have this be temporary? 

It  seems  to  me  there  is  a  temporary,  right,  and  then  theoreti-
cally, it has got to end? I don’t remember many surcharges ending 
when  they  are  supposed  to  end.  But  it  does  seem  to  me  that  this 
places an unnecessary burden on those who are very frequent trav-
elers  on  airplanes.  Have  you  looked  at  the  impact  of  this  on  fre-
quent  travelers  as  opposed  to  those  who  just  fly  maybe  once  or 
twice a year? 

Ms. BERRICK. No, we have not, sir. 
Senator STEVENS. Do you think it would be worthwhile to do? 
Ms. BERRICK. We could certainly talk to your staff about your in-

terest and maybe a way to possibly do that, if you would like. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  I  hope  you  will  because  it  does  seem  to 
me that a temporary surcharge and this concept—I can understand 
where it might be necessary in these areas where you are going to 
make  changes.  We  are  going  to  pay—our  people  are  going  to  pay 
this  surcharge,  and  no  changes  are  contemplated  for  our  area  at 
all. 

So we will have this surcharge for how many years, Mr. Hawley? 

Three years? 

Mr. HAWLEY. Four years. 
Senator  STEVENS.  Four  years.  We  pay  the  surcharge  more  than 
anybody  else,  and  there  are  no  changes  contemplated  by  the  plan 
in  our  state.  I  really—I  think  you  both  should  understand  our  an-
tipathy for this concept of a surcharge that is never going to benefit 
us. 

Now does the GAO believe that TSA can meet its deadline for Se-

cure Flight by 2010, Ms. Berrick? 

Ms. BERRICK. We are looking at Secure Flight right now. We re-
ported  a  couple  of  months  ago  that  TSA  has  made  significant 
progress in developing the program. They have instilled a lot more 
discipline and rigor into the development. 

We did cite some concerns, and one relates to program costs and 
schedule estimates. We looked at the estimates TSA developed. We 
thought  that  they  could  be  improved.  So  we  cited  some  concerns 
with that. And obviously, that could impact their time-frames. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

So we made recommendations for TSA to strengthen their sched-
ule  and  cost  estimates,  among  some  other  areas.  TSA  agreed  with 
that.  We  are  going  back  in  now  to  look  at  TSA’s  current  efforts. 
And  as  you  know,  we  are  mandated  by  legislation  to  review  TSA’s 
development  of  Secure  Flight  after  DHS  certifies  the  program, 
which is expected in August of this summer. 

So  before  they  roll  this  out  nationwide,  GAO  does  have  to  do  a 
review  and  report  to  the  Congress  on  the  development  of  the  pro-
gram, which we will do. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Would  it  be  a  burden  to  find  out  for  us  how 
much  of  this  surcharge  will  come  from  intrastate  as  opposed  to 
interstate passengers? 

Ms.  BERRICK.  I  would  have  to—we  would  have  to  look  into  that. 

I don’t know off the top of my head. We could research that. 

Senator  STEVENS.  It  does  apply,  Mr.  Hawley,  to  commuters  as 
well  to  mainline  air  flights,  right?  Anyone  who  has  a  commercial 
flight—— 

Mr. HAWLEY. Yes, sir, as proposed. 
Senator STEVENS.—ticket is going to pay the surcharge. 
Mr. HAWLEY. That is the proposal. 
Senator  STEVENS.  Even  if  you  are  just  going  from  Sitka  to  Ju-
neau  or  from  Ketchikan  to  Wrangell  in  southeast  Alaska,  you  are 
going  to  pay  the  surcharge.  When  you  go  from  Sitka  to  Ketchikan 
to Wrangell to Petersburg to Sitka to Juneau, you are going to pay 
it five times, right? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  No,  just  twice.  It  is  capped  at  $1  per  trip.  It  is  50 

cents per leg. 

Senator  STEVENS.  But  that  is  per  day,  isn’t  it?  I  mean,  if  I  have 
a  schedule  to  go  to  all  those  places,  I  spend  a  day  in  each  place 
to catch the next plane, how—— 
Mr. HAWLEY. So it is per day. 
Senator STEVENS.—it is per day, right? 
Mr.  HAWLEY.  I  believe—well,  that  is  the  intent.  And  I  guess  in 
the  legislation  it  would  be  a  little  bit  clearer,  but  that  is—I  think 
the intent is that it would be for—— 

Senator  STEVENS.  Again,  I  would  urge  you  to  take  a  look  at  the 
impact  of  deciding  it  would  only  apply  to  interstate  passengers 
rather than apply the surcharge to intrastate passengers. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator McCaskill? 

STATEMENT OF HON. CLAIRE MCCASKILL, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MISSOURI 

Senator MCCASKILL. Senator Stevens, I think the temporary sur-
charge  is  temporary  only  in  imagination,  and  I  think  us  directing 
rules doesn’t do much good either in terms of Congressional prerog-
ative. That is what I want to talk about today. 

I  know,  Mr.  Hawley,  that  you  and  I  have  talked  about  this,  and 
I  have  pounded  on  it  a  number  of  times  about  foreign  repair  sta-
tions.  In  2003,  Congress  said  to  TSA  you  must  develop  a  rule  for 
security at foreign repair stations. And GAO in 2003 found a mem-
ber of Al Qaeda working on an airplane in a foreign repair station. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

That  was  in  February  2003.  It  was  supposed  to  be  done  by  Au-
gust  2004.  Once  again,  last  year,  Congress  said  we  must  have  a 
rule  about  foreign  repair  stations.  And  so,  now  you  have  been  told 
by  Congress  twice  to  complete  the  rule,  and  the  rule  is  now  5 
years—well, 4 years overdue. 

I understand you say it hasn’t been a priority, even though Con-
gress  has  told  you  twice  to  make  it  a  priority.  This  is  frustrating 
for those of us who get elected and believe we are trying to exercise 
the  best  judgment  on  behalf  of  the  people  we  represent,  that  Con-
gress  says  it  is  a  priority  and  yet  agencies  of  Government  ignore 
what Congress says. 

When  is  this  rule  going  to  be  finalized,  and  will  you  make  the 

new deadline of August 2008? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Well,  we  certainly  don’t  ignore  the  wishes  of  Con-
gress. And on the issue of priority, I would say as a technical mat-
ter of threat and intelligence that it does not rise to the top of the 
charts of things that we have an obligation to stop in terms of stop-
ping attacks. 

It  clearly  is  an  important  area  to  be  covered.  We  take  the  point 
that  you  make  and  in  the  9/11  bill  is  very  clear.  We  will  have  our 
proposed  rule  out,  I  believe,  by  the  deadline  in  August.  And  the 
way  the  process  works  in  terms  of  notice  and  comment,  it  takes 
considerably longer than the time allotted in the 9/11 bill. 

However,  I  do  want  to  assure  you  that  we  have  staffed  up  the 
office  and  are  beginning  to  put  in  place  security  assessments  and 
threat  assessments,  so  that  when  we  have  the  legal  authority,  we 
will  have  already  done  a  number  of  the  actual  foreign  repair  sta-
tions  inspections  and  analysis  such  that  we  will  be  able  to  begin 
applying  the  security  now.  And  then,  whenever  the  final  rule  be-
comes  effective,  that  will  then  seal  the  deal  in  terms  of  having  all 
of the authorities in place. 

Senator MCCASKILL. I understand that you have substituted your 
judgment as it relates to priorities, which, of course, is your prerog-
ative  as  the  head  of  the  agency.  But  when  you  have  a  directive 
from  Congress,  I  don’t  think  that  it  is  appropriate  to  substitute 
your judgment. It is the law. 

Mr. HAWLEY. Yes, so we are progressing as fast as one can write 
these rules. I am saying, just as a technical matter, my job is stop 
attacks  against  Americans,  and  that  is  the  priority.  And  there  are 
a number of live threats, and I believe the Director of National In-
telligence  called  a  clear  and  present  danger  and  a  number  of  the 
folks  in  the  intelligence  community  have  been  quite  clear  of  the 
threat environment in which we work. 

So  I  know  that  you  and  the  other  members  of  the  Committee 
hold  me  accountable  to  do  whatever  it  takes  to  stop  attacks,  and 
that  is—in  terms  of  my  priority,  it  is  that.  And  I  believe  the  Con-
gress  recognized  in  creating  TSA  that  that  has  to  be—the  person 
in my job has to put those priorities first and clearly follow the in-
structions of Congress on foreign repair stations, and we are. 

We  have  already  had  14  foreign  assessments  that  we  had  folks 

out and doing, including—— 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  But  isn’t  it  true,  Mr.  Hawley,  that  the  only 
foreign  assessments  that  you  are  doing  are  the  ones  where  you 
have been invited? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

Mr. HAWLEY. We don’t go in—well, we don’t have legal authority 

to go in uninvited. What we have found—— 

Senator MCCASKILL. Because there is no rule. 
Mr.  HAWLEY.  Exactly.  But  what  we  have  found  is  cooperation 
that every single one that we have been to has opened the door and 
wants to have us look at it to ensure the security because they are 
under  competitive  pressure  as  well.  So  you  are  correct  in  terms 
that the rule does close—so there is no wiggle room. But all of the 
places that we have been six countries, 14 repair stations—have let 
us have unfettered access. 

And we have the FAA inspectors, who also have access to it, and 
we  have  communicated  with  all  of  the  FAA  inspectors  and  have 
asked their support in their ongoing inspections for safety. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Have  you  been  to  any  of  the  foreign  repair 

stations unannounced? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  I  expect  not  in  that  we  would  make  arrangements 
to go. So I think we probably—I am certain that we have made ar-
rangements before showing up. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  And  have  you  done  any  of  these  assess-
ments  in  any  of  the  five  nations  that  have  foreign  repair  stations 
that  are  currently  classified  as  terrorist  Portuguese  (Brazil)  safe 
havens—Argentina,  Brazil,  Colombia,  Indonesia,  or  the  Phil-
ippines? 

Mr. HAWLEY. Yes. 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  And  which  one  of  those  countries  have  you 

been to? 

Mr. HAWLEY. Colombia. 
Senator MCCASKILL. And was it in the border region? 
Mr. HAWLEY. I am not familiar with where the foreign repair sta-

tion specifically visited was, but I can get back to you on that. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  But  it  was  not  unannounced?  In  other 

words, they knew you were coming? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  I  frankly  don’t  know  the  answer  to  the  question, 

but I expect it was arranged in advance. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Well,  it  is  my  understanding  that  you  have 
been doing some of these classified assessments as audits, but they 
are  on  invitation.  And  with  some  background  as  an  auditor,  I  will 
tell  you  that  someone  inviting  you  to  audit  is  generally  a  pretty 
good sign that you don’t need to, whereas when you go in and audit 
regardless  of  whether  they  want  you  there  or  not,  is  generally 
when  you  find  the  problems  that  need  to  be  addressed.  I  don’t 
think being able to go in by invitation only is an assessment. 

Now  tell  me  what  is  going  to  happen  in  August  when  they  can 
no  longer  certify  any  more  foreign  repair  stations,  even  though  we 
have  several  in  the  process  of  being  certified?  These  airlines  are 
really  in  a  bind  now  because  they  cannot  certify  any  after  August 
of  this  year,  and  there  are  97  foreign  repair  stations  waiting  to  be 
certified. What happens in August? We just shut it down? 

Mr. HAWLEY. No, we have to work with the airlines and the Con-
gress to figure the best way forward. Our job is the security assess-
ment,  and  we  have  already  begun  that.  I  expect  that  by  that  time 
we  will  be  able  to  demonstrate  to  you  and  other  Members  of  Con-
gress  the  security  measures  that  are  in  place  that  may  allow  for 
a practical way forward. But, yes, that needs to be developed. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

Senator MCCASKILL. And you do acknowledge, Mr. Hawley, that, 
in  fact,  the  amount  of  foreign  repairs  has  dramatically  gone  up  in 
the  last  5  years?  Since  we  directed  you  to  make  the  rule,  the  per-
centage of all the repair work being done in foreign repair stations 
has gone from approximatley 34 percent to 60-some percent. 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Well,  I  know  that  there  are  about  720  abroad  and 
over  4,000  domestically.  I  am  not  sure  what  the  trajectory  is  in 
terms  of  growth  of—in  terms  of  revenue,  but  there  are  about  700 
that need to be covered in these assessments. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  And  many  of  these  airlines  are  using  non-

certified repair stations? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  I  would  have  to  really  check  to  get  back  to  you 

whether that is a true statement. I can’t affirm—— 

Senator MCCASKILL. Ms. Berrick, isn’t that a true statement? 
Ms. BERRICK. My understanding is that some of them are, right. 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  I  believe  that  is  a  true  statement,  and  I 
would  be  more  comfortable  if  you  knew  the  trajectory  and  if  you 
knew  the  status  of  airlines  using  noncertified  foreign  repair  sta-
tions.  I  respect  that  you  have  to  figure  out  what  the  priorities  are 
in terms of our Nation’s security, but I think this is a gaping hole. 
I  know  that  the  airlines  want  to  take  responsibility  and  want  to 

be careful. But this is something we need to do. 

Before I yield to my colleague, I would like to briefly ask you one 
question  about  the  checkpoint  screening  technologies.  We  spent  a 
bunch  of  money  on  checkpoint  technology  and  reconfiguration  and 
on explosive trace portals. 

GAO  has  reported  that  114  of  these  explosive  trace  portals  are 
sitting  in  storage  at  a  cost  of  over  $20  million.  If  we  didn’t  need 
them,  why  did  we  buy  them?  And  if  we  need  them,  why  are  they 
sitting in storage? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Well,  to  get  back  on  the  foreign  repair  station,  I 
would  take  issue  that  it  is  a  gaping  hole.  I  do  not  believe  it  is  a 
gaping hole. I view it as one issue that among many a balanced se-
curity measure has to be in place. 

On  the  portals,  so  to  speak,  there  are  some  maintenance  issues 
with  them  in  terms  of,  they  are  called  puffers  because  they  put 
compressed air out, lint and other things go up into the filters and 
can  clog  them.  And  we  are  working  with  the  industry  to  make 
them more reliable. 

In  other  words,  when  you  have  a  large  portal  in  the  checkpoint 
and  it  is  down  for  maintenance,  it  blocks  the  way  and  also  is  not 
providing  that  level  of  security.  So  we  are  insisting  on  improved 
performance  before  fully  deploying  those.  And  also,  as  you  may 
know,  we  are  moving  out  with  the  whole  body  imager,  which  is  a 
highly  effective  technology,  and  we  have  already  announced  that 
we  will  have  30  of  them  out.  And  that  is  another  generation  of 
technology that we think will be very effective. 

Senator MCCASKILL. Have we checked the maintenance on those 
technologies  to  make  sure  that  we  don’t  end  up  with  $20  million 
of those in storage because they don’t work? 

Mr. HAWLEY. Yes, we have, indeed. 
Senator MCCASKILL. And we are confident that we are not going 
to have a problem with spending that kind of money and then say-
ing we can’t use them because, frankly, they are impractical? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  No.  We  know  they  work.  They  are  in  use  in  other 
places  around  the  world.  We  have  had  extensive  testing  of  them, 
and  I  think  the  real  issue  is  public  acceptance.  And  as  you  know, 
there  are  those  advocates  who  are  not  comfortable  with  the  clear 
image  that  is  projected  to  the  Officer  screening.  I  think  that  is 
probably  the  issue,  public  acceptance,  rather  than  the  technology. 

Senator MCCASKILL. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator Kerry? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN F. KERRY, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM MASSACHUSETTS 

Senator KERRY. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Obviously,  the  whole  existence  of  Homeland  Security  is  a  re-
sponse  to  America’s  learning  in  the  most  tragic  way  just  how  vul-
nerable  our  airports  and  our  airlines  were.  And  everybody  still  re-
members  painfully  how  horrible  it  was  to  see  commercial  airliners 
turned into missiles in the wrong hands. And I think that pain was 
particularly  acute  up  in  Boston  because  two  of  those  planes  took 
off from our city and our airport. 

We  here  responded,  I  think,  swiftly  and  appropriately  by  saying 
we  were  going  to  put  in  place  the  resources  and  exponentially  ex-
pand  the  Federal  Air  Marshal  Service,  among  other  things.  And  I 
want  to  talk  about  a  few  of  those  other  things,  but  first  let  me 
focus on the Federal Air Marshal Service. 

The  purpose  of  putting  it  in  place  was  sort  of  a  last  line  of  de-
fense.  It  was  to  combat  terrorism,  to  reassure  the  public  that  they 
are safe in the skies, and finally, to act as a deterrent to terrorists 
from  launching  a  future  attack.  We  are  now  approaching  7  years 
from that period, and despite all of the time and energy, effort, re-
organization, and money put into this program. Let me just preface 
this—I would not bring this up in a public hearing, as a former law 
enforcement officer, because I understand the imperatives of deter-
rence,  and  deterrence  works  off  of  a  number  of  different  theories. 
But CNN just weeks ago informed millions of Americans through 
an  investigation  that,  according  to  whistleblowers  within  the  serv-
ice, ‘‘Of the 28,000 commercial airline flights that take to the skies 
on  an  average  day  in  the  United  States,  fewer  than  1  percent  are 
protected by onboard armed Federal Air Marshals.’’ 

Now,  again,  I  repeat  I  wouldn’t  personally  bring  this  up  in  a 
spontaneous  way.  But  now  that  is  it  out  there,  I  am  concerned 
about  it,  as  Americans  are  concerned  about  it.  And  we,  unfortu-
nately, have to respond to it. 

Now I understand that TSA has publicly denied the number and, 
for reasons which I agree with, hasn’t released the actual one, stat-
ing  the  number  of  covered  flights,  which  is  classified,  and  I  think 
it ought to be classified. I am not suggesting it shouldn’t be. 

But  that  doesn’t  deal  with  the  problem  of  adequately  addressing 
the deterrent and adequately confirming to people that they should 
feel  safe.  That  still  remains  our  public  responsibility.  And  accord-
ing  to  TSA’s  website,  while  the  exact  number  of  flights  that  Air 
Marshals  protect  is  classified  because  you  don’t  want  terrorists  to 
play  a  mathematical  guessing  game  against  the  percentages,  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

actual  number  of  Air  Marshals  employed  by  the  agency  is  ‘‘in  the 
thousands.’’ 

Now  my  concern  here  is  pretty  simple.  I  think  Congress  needs 
assurance  and  the  public  needs  assurance  that  this  program  is 
really  working,  that  the  people  who  would  do  us  harm  don’t  have 
to bet on some mathematical guessing game that right now all they 
have  to  do  is  rely  on  the  news  that  is  out  there,  which  is  not  ade-
quately responded to, frankly. And I don’t think that is acceptable. 
I  think  Americans  need  to  know  that  whatever  level  of  deter-
rence is necessary and whatever level of protection they have come 
to  expect,  it  is  there.  That  is  the  right  of  every  flyer  and  of  every 
family in the country. 

And  one  Marshal  stated  this  in  the  broadcast  of  CNN.  This  is 
what  the  Marshal  said,  that  you  folks  are  ‘‘whistling  past  the 
graveyard,  hoping  against  hope  that  this  house  of  cards  that  you 
call  airline  security  doesn’t  come  crashing  down  around  [you.]’’  He 
said ‘‘them.’’ I changed it to ‘‘you.’’ 

Now that shouldn’t be acceptable. It is not acceptable to the Sen-
ate, to the Congress, the American people. Without a concrete refu-
tation and some kind of evidence, some kind of statement, without 
a specific number that the program is working and a proactive pub-
lic awareness campaign, I think you are going to have a hard time 
counteracting this knowledge that is out there now. 

And  that  means  that  the  program  could  fail  in  providing  two  of 
the three goals that I spoke of—number one, reassuring the Amer-
ican people and, number two, actually providing an adequate deter-
rent against terrorism, even if the CNN report got it wrong. 

So  after  the  report,  I  sent  Secretary  Chertoff  a  letter  expressing 
my  concerns.  And  as  a  result  I  have  now  gotten  dozens  of  e-mails 
from  current  and  former  Federal  Air  Marshals,  reaffirming  the 
CNN  report,  speaking  of  high  turnover  rates,  inadequate  training 
for  new  employees,  abusive  management,  abuse  of  traveling  privi-
leges,  and  discrimination  and  sexism.  And  people  have  outlined 
how  they  have  been  punished  for  whistleblowing  in  the  past  and 
have  been  pressured  not  to  report  on-the-job  injury,  or  related  ill-
nesses. 

We have spent billions of dollars on this program since 9/11. And 
the President’s budget is now requesting $786 million more, which 
incidentally  raises  other  questions.  I  think  Senator  Stevens,  when 
I came in here, was asking you about the funding mechanism. And 
I gather if that funding mechanism doesn’t pass, you actually have 
to cut these programs. Is that correct? 

Mr. HAWLEY. No, sir. 
Senator KERRY. You don’t? 
Mr. HAWLEY. These are separate. We were just talking about the 
EDS  deployments,  the  explosives  detection  checked  baggage  sys-
tem. 

Senator  KERRY.  OK,  these  are  separate.  But  this  would  mean  if 

you don’t get that fee, there is a reduction, isn’t there? 

Mr. HAWLEY. No. No, sir. 
Senator KERRY. How so? 
Mr. HAWLEY. It is in a different budget category. There is a sepa-

rate category for the Federal Air Marshal Service. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

Senator  KERRY.  I  am  not  talking  about  the  Federal  Air  Marshal 
Service.  I  am  talking  about  your  overall  transportation,  security, 
other facilities. I mean the four different sections. 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  It  is  just  limited  to  the  checked  baggage  systems 

is what we were talking about. 

Senator  KERRY.  OK.  So,  in  other  words,  that  fee  will  only  go 

to—— 

Mr. HAWLEY. Yes. Yes, exactly. It is a targeted four year specific 

fee for exactly that, checked baggage in-line system—— 

Senator  KERRY.  Will  the  other  sections  of  the  budget,  neverthe-

less, then be increased? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  They  are  on  their  own  and  separately  considered 
by  the  Congress,  but  the  fee  does  not  impact  any  of  the  security 
programs  you  have  mentioned  other  than  the  checked  baggage  de-
ployment of new systems. 

Senator  KERRY.  Well,  let  me  give  you  an  opportunity  now  in 
front of this Committee to help Americans understand and address 
what has been made public. Whether you agree or disagree that it 
should  have  been,  it  certainly  affects  notions  of  deterrence  as  it 
currently stands. We have to address that, both of us. 

Mr. HAWLEY. Yes. 
Senator  KERRY.  And  I  would  like  you  to  try  to  do  so  here  now 
in  order  reassure  passengers  and  anybody  with  any  nefarious  in-
tent  that  they  are  listening  to  that  this  country  is  ready  and  pre-
pared  and  that  we  are  adequately  deployed,  and  we  are  not  going 
to play a gambling game based on numbers. 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Thank  you,  Senator  Kerry,  for  raising  that  issue. 
I  very  much  appreciate  it  because  the  CNN  story  was  completely 
wrong.  And  it  was  admitted  by  CNN  it  was  a  guess  of  somebody 
who  was  essentially  anonymous  and  perhaps  based  on  a  very  lim-
ited time period or geography. 

But we have—I am trying to figure out a good way to say it that 
would  just  kill  this  issue  once  and  for  all.  We  have,  as  you  men-
tioned,  thousands  of  Air  Marshals.  We  run  thousands  and  thou-
sands of missions a month all over the world. 

Our  Federal  Air  Marshals  are  among  the  best-trained—highest 
marksmanship,  best-trained  officers.  We  like  the  reassurance.  We 
like  the  deterrent.  But  make  no  mistake,  the  number-one  capacity 
of  the  Federal  Air  Marshal  Service  is  to  stop  attacks  cold.  And  I 
have  no  doubt  in  my  mind  that  if  called  to  serve,  there  is  no  con-
test. 

And  we  change  every  day  our  Federal  Air  Marshal  flight  cov-
erage  based  on  threats,  and  we  move  them  around  city  to  city, 
country  to  country.  Unfortunately,  I  guess,  in  some  respects,  they 
don’t  break  cover  very  often.  And  there  was  a  case  where  a  flight 
was leaving Amsterdam in the Netherlands going to Indonesia, and 
some folks got up and were acting beyond something that we could 
tolerate,  and  our  Federal  Air  Marshal  team  on  that  flight  broke 
cover. 

Anybody  wanting  to  do  harm  to  an  American  aircraft  has  to 
know  that  in  flights  to  or  from  areas  that  are  at  all  interesting 
from  a  threat  perspective,  Air  Marshals  are  covering  those  flights. 
Maybe  not  100  percent  of  those  flights,  but  Air  Marshals  are  cov-
ering those flights. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

And  anybody  interested  in  the  Olympics  in  Beijing  this  summer 
or  throughout  China,  Federal  Air  Marshals  are  covering  a  signifi-
cant  number  of  flights  there.  As  we  look  at  any  particular  threat 
either  in  the  U.S.  or  abroad,  Federal  Air  Marshal  teams  are  on 
those flights. 

Senator  KERRY.  Well,  I  appreciate  your  saying  that.  I  think  it  is 
important.  I  am  not  pressing  you  for  numbers  because  I  think  it 
would be inappropriate to do so here. 

But I will tell you, just anecdotally, that on any number of flights 
that  I  have  been  on—and  I  fly  a  lot,  as  we  all  do—I  have  encoun-
tered  Air  Marshals.  I  have  had  conversations  with  them  on  flights 
from  Washington  to  Boston,  Boston  to  New  York,  New  York  to 
Washington,  Washington  to  California,  Washington  to  Miami,  Eu-
rope to here. I have encountered Air Marshals. 

So  I  hope  that  whatever  is  going  on  in  terms  of  the  whistle-
blowing component and the management component of FAMS that 
you  guys  will  address  it  because,  under  any  circumstances,  there 
is  a  lack  of  communication  there  or  understanding  and  trust.  And 
I  think  it  is  important  for  the  agency  to  get  its  act  together  with 
respect to that. 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Yes,  sir.  And  I  would  pass  on  to  you,  and  I  have 
heard from Air Marshals myself who have flown with you and very 
much appreciate your support of them. 

Senator KERRY. Thank you very much. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Because  of  the  scheduled  votes,  we  will  have  to 
adjourn the hearing earlier than expected. But if we may, Mr. Sec-
retary  and  Madam  Director,  submit  questions  to  you  for  your  con-
sideration and response? 

Ms. BERRICK. Yes. 
Mr. HAWLEY. Yes, sir. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  So  we  will  do  that,  and  with  that,  the  hearing 

is adjourned. 

[Whereupon, at 11:03 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

HON. EDMUND S. ‘‘KIP’’ HAWLEY 

Question  1.  How  is  TSA  determining  the  effectiveness  of  initiatives  such  as  Be-

havioral Detection and the Aviation Direct Access Screening Program? 

Answer. The Screening of Passengers by Observation Techniques (SPOT) Program 
has several metrics in place to track its effectiveness. Some of these metrics include: 
the  number  of  SPOT  referrals,  the  number  of  SPOT  referrals  to  Law  Enforcement 
Officers (LEO), the specific reasons for the LEO referral, and the results of the LEO 
referral  To  date,  over  11,000  SPOT  referrals  have  been  made  to  Law  Enforcement 
Officers,  resulting  in  over  900  arrests  for  various  crimes,  such  as  fraudulent  docu-
ments,  immigration  violations,  and  outstanding  warrants.  Furthermore,  Behavior 
Detection  Officers  (BDOs)  who  perform  SPOT  have  been  credited  with  thwarting 
possible  nefarious  acts,  such  as  the  recent  incident  in  Orlando  where  an  individual 
was  identified  by  BDOs  as  displaying  suspicious  behavior.  This  individual  was  re-
ferred to Law Enforcement Officers, and components for making explosives, specifi-
cally  pipe  bombs,  were  discovered  in  his  baggage.  BDOs  provided  a  critical  layer  of 
security that assisted in preventing the materials and the individual from boarding 
an airplane. 

The SPOT Program also utilizes a Standardization Team to conduct annual visits 
at each SPOT airport to evaluate the BDOs’ procedures, methodology, reporting, and 
effectiveness  of  training.  Recommendations  of  these  standardization  teams  have  re-
sulted  in  changes  to  the  program  to  better  equip  the  BDOs  to  identify  people  who 
exhibit suspicious characteristics and behaviors. 

The Department of Homeland Security Science and Technology Directorate is also 
reviewing  and  evaluating  the  behaviors  identified  in  the  SPOT  Program.  This  re-
view  will  provide  TSA  with  additional  scientific  expertise  and  help  ensure  that  the 
BDOs  are  concentrating  their  efforts  on  behaviors  that  are  indicative  of  threats  to 
transportation security. 

The Aviation Direct Access Screening Program (ADASP) provides additional secu-
rity and deterrence by randomly screening persons and property entering or present 
within  a  Security  Identification  Display  Area,  Air  Operations  Area,  secured  area, 
sterile  area,  or  entering  an  aircraft.  This  program  adds  a  measure  of  unpredict-
ability and introduces an additional dimension of complexity designed to thwart ac-
tions  that  would  be  harmful  to  aviation  security.  The  ADASP  Program  Manager 
tracks the metrics for this program, monitoring prohibited items and other items of 
interest  found  and  ensuring  that  the  ADASP  operations  are  providing  an  effective 
use of resources. 

Question  1a.  What  has  been  the  security  impact  of  switching  from  private-sector 

to Federal travel document checkers? 

Answer. Replacing contract travel document checkers (TDCs) with Transportation 
Security  Officers  (TSOs)  strengthens  the  current  layers  of  security.  TSOs  provide  a 
uniformed presence that serves as an added deterrent. TSOs are also better trained 
and  equipped  than  the  previous  document  checkers.  The  Transportation  Security 
Administration (TSA) has invested considerable resources in deploying technology to 
the TDCs, such as magnifying loupes and ultraviolet lights used in detecting fraudu-
lent documents. TSOs are vetted Federal employees and have access to Sensitive Se-
curity  Information,  to  include  the  latest  security  threats.  This  information  was  not 
necessarily available to the private sector TDCs. 

Efficiencies  are  also  gained  in  the  checkpoint  screening  process  with  TSA  per-
forming the TDC function. There is no longer any disconnect between private docu-
ment checkers and Federal TSOs. Passenger screening has become one fluid process 
undertaken by TSA. 

To  date,  over  3,700  TDC  referrals  to  Law  Enforcement  Officers  have  resulted  in 
over 350 arrests. This metric is tracked to demonstrate the effectiveness of the Fed-
eral  document  checkers  in  identifying  potentially  fraudulent  documents  or  sus-

(49) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

picious  behavior  in  individuals  who  may  wish  to  cause  harm  to  the  transportation 
system.  While  a  byproduct  of  the  TDC  referral  process  may  be  the  netting  of  low- 
level  criminals,  our  intent  is  to  solely  identify  and  resolve  a  potential  threat.  This 
is further driven by current intelligence and events that still points to terrorists’ de-
sire to attack the transportation sector. 

Question  1b.  What  is  the  current  annual  attrition  rate  among  TSA’s  senior-level 
and management employees? How does this compare with the workforce as a whole? 
What  efforts  does  TSA  have  underway  to  address  the  turnover  and  what  has  been 
the impact of these efforts? 

Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration’s  (TSA’s)  senior-level  and 
management  employees  are  in  the  J,  K,  L,  and  Transportation  Security  Executive 
Service  (TSES)  pay  bands.  These  pay  bands  correspond  to  the  General  Schedule 
grades  of  14  and  above  plus  the  Senior  Executive  Service  (SES).  The  Fiscal  Year 
(FY)  2007  attrition  rates  for  these  pay  bands  was  9.5  percent,  8.5  percent,  6.3  per-
cent,  and  14.8  percent,  respectively.1 TSA’s  Fiscal  Year  2007  overall  attrition  rate 
was 18.9 percent. 

Building on previous efforts, TSA has five training programs to enhance the com-
petencies  and  engagement  of  its  senior-level  and  management  employees  and  those 
aspiring to those ranks. They are: (1) Core Skills Integration for J and K band em-
ployees  in  headquarters  (CSI:  J/K),  (2)  Foundations  of  Leadership  for  supervisory 
employees,  (3)  Mid-Level  and  (4)  Senior-Level  Leadership  Development  Programs 
(MLDP and SLDP), and (5) Leading from the Middle. 

The  Critical  Skills  management  course  is  for  all  headquarters  (HQ)-based  J  and 
K  band  employees.  It  is  called  Core  Skills  Integration:  J/K  (CSI:  J/K),  and  is  de-
signed  to  enhance  collaborative  decisionmaking  and  process  discipline  skills  for  all 
employees at the critical J/K level at TSA HQ. 

The Foundations of Leadership Training is a 9-day course intended for newly pro-
moted  supervisors  to  provide  the  competencies  needed  by  first  line  supervisors 
across  TSA.  Launched  in  November  2006,  the  course  has  now  trained  over  3,000 
TSA  supervisors,  receiving  strong  participant  evaluation  scores.  Since  the  course  is 
nearly  2  years  old,  it  will  be  reviewed  to  assess  its  impacts  and  to  make  necessary 
changes.  Employee  attitude  survey  data  show  improvement  in  some  critical  areas 
since the introduction of Foundations. Focus groups indicate the agency is realizing 
an  additional  benefit  from  the  exposure  participants  get  to  peers  from  different 
parts  of  the  organization.  TSA  plans  to  update  the  content  and  make  the  course 
more widely available. 

The  Mid-Level  Leadership  Development  Program  serves  the  succession  manage-
ment goal of preparing employees who already have supervisory experience with en-
hanced  competencies  that  will  prepare  them  to  be  highly  qualified  bench  strength 
for  mid-level  management  positions  both  in  the  field  and  TSA  HQ.  While  the  pro-
gram  is  less  than  a  year  old,  it  has  already  been  rigorously  evaluated.  The  highly 
decentralized  beta  model  produced  many  excellent  program  practices  at  many  loca-
tions.  Work  is  now  underway  to  provide  structure  and  tools  that  will  facilitate  im-
plementation of the best practices enterprise-wide. 

The Senior-Level Leadership Development Programs build bench strength for crit-
ical  senior  positions  by  developing  competencies  identified  for  those  positions  with 
mentoring,  details,  action  learning  projects,  formal  training,  and  other  learning  ex-
periences. Currently, three iterations of this program are being offered: 

• SLDP 1—intended to build bench strength for the critical field positions of Fed-
eral  Security  Director,  Executive  Deputy  Federal  Security  Director,  Special 
Agent  in  Charge,  Deputy  Special  Agent  in  Charge  and  Assistant  Special  Agent 
in Charge at K Band and TSES levels. There are currently 61 participants; 
• SLDP  2—intended  to  build  bench  strength  for  the  critical  field  positions  of  As-
sistant Federal Security Director for Screening, Inspections, Operations, and the 
AFSD Generalist. There are currently 51 participants; and 
• SLDP  3—a  formal  Candidate  Development  Program,  intended  to  build  bench 
strength for TSES positions, primarily at Headquarters. TSA anticipates select-
ing 22 participants. 

Most  SLDP  1  participants  will  complete  the  program  requirements  this  fiscal 
year.  About  half  have  already  been  promoted,  some  more  than  once.  While  SLDP 
2  participants  only  began  implementing  their  individual  development  plans  in  the 
spring, many of them have already been promoted as well. Stakeholder assessments 

1 This information was pulled from the National Finance Center on June 28, 2008. Fiscal Year 
2007 information from the National Finance Center adjusts slightly over time because of retro-
active corrections. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

of  the  programs  and  their  participants  have  been  uniformly  favorable,  and  TSA  is 
confident  that  there  is  already  a  positive  impact  on  bench  strength  for  critical  field 
positions.  While  SLDP  3  is  still  in  the  selection  phase,  the  program  plan  calls  for 
all  participants  to  complete  requirements  by  the  end  of  FY  2009.  In  the  interim, 
TSA’s  succession  plan  update  will  allow  TSA  to  identify  any  new  or  emerging  suc-
cession  vulnerabilities  and  plan  for  a  suitable  learning  and  development  response. 
The newest offering in the leadership suite is a highly rigorous course for middle 
managers titled, Leading from the Middle. This course takes a blended learning ap-
proach  including  candidate  assessment  and  coaching,  distance  learning,  classroom 
training,  and  directed,  graded  work  on  an  issue  paper  that  concerns  genuine  work-
place concerns. 

Question  2.  When  will  Secure  Flight  be  fully  operational  for  domestic  watch  list 

matching? For international watch list matching functions? 

Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration  anticipates  that  it  will  as-
sume  full  watch  list  matching  for  all  domestic  aircraft  operators  by  July  2009  and 
for  all  international  aircraft  operators  in  early  2010,  pending  approval  of  the  nec-
essary funding levels and the publication of the Final Rule. 

Question  2a.  What  are  TSA’s  key  challenges  in  meeting  Secure  Flight  scheduled 

completion dates? 

Answer.  The  main  challenge  facing  the  Secure  Flight  program  is  to  continue  to 
maintain our aggressive implementation schedule. The $82 million requested in the 
Fiscal  Year  2009  budget  allows  us  to  maintain  our  progress  and  allow  the  acceler-
ated  implementation  timeline  to  assume  full  watch  list  matching  for  all  domestic 
aircraft operators by July 2009 and for all foreign air carriers by early 2010. 

Question 2b. What is the status of the Secure Flight rulemaking? 
Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  anticipates  that  the 
Secure Flight Final Rule will be submitted to the Office of Management and Budget 
(OMB)  for  review  under  Executive  Order  12866  by  early  August.  Following  OMB 
clearance, TSA will publish the final rule in the Federal Register. 

Question 3. Please provide a general update on the status of the TSA’s efforts re-

garding general aviation security. 

Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  is  engaged  in  efforts 
to  enhance  international  and  domestic  general  aviation  (GA)  security  to  minimize 
the  vulnerability  of  such  flights  being  used  to  deliver  illicit  materials,  employed  as 
a weapon, or transport individuals wishing to cause harm to the United States. List-
ed  below  are  a  number  of  initiatives  that  TSA  is  currently  developing  and  imple-
menting to help close existing security gaps: 

Secure Fixed Based Operator (SFBO) Concept: TSA has developed, in close coordi-
nation with the industry, a program in which overseas FBOs voluntarily provide ad-
ditional security for flights inbound to the United States. The program allows FBOs 
to  compare  passenger  and  flight  crew  passports  to  the  submitted  manifests  to  con-
firm identities of persons onboard GA aircraft prior to departure. This program cur-
rently serves as a proof of concept to validate the effectiveness of the proposed secu-
rity measures and assist in positively identifying the pilot. Current SFBO locations 
are  Anchorage,  Alaska,  and  Shannon,  Ireland.  TSA  is  actively  engaged  in  discus-
sions with additional potential host countries and plans to continue to partner with 
foreign FBOs to expand the existing pilot program to several more locations. 

Automatic Detection and Processing Terminal (ADAPT): To enhance TSA’s ability 
to  enforce  airspace  security  rules,  the  agency  has  implemented  a  joint  program  be-
tween the Federal Aviation Administration and TSA known as ADAPT. This system 
serves as a critical advance warning system by allowing TSA and other agencies to 
gain  better  security  situational  awareness  of  the  operations  occurring  in  the  Na-
tional  Airspace  System.  The  system  is  currently  operational,  and  it  is  continually 
being upgraded with additional commercial and government databases to more pre-
cisely verify flight operations and significantly improve security. 

Positive Pilot Identification (PPID): To appropriately address the issue of positive 
identification  of  airmen,  TSA  is  in  the  early  phases  of  the  development  of  a  pilot 
program  designed  to  explore  various  methods  of  pre-departure  and  in-flight  pilot 
identification.  While  the  program  will  focus  on  multiple  types  of  operations,  the 
agency will initially focus on operations utilizing large aircraft. The purposes of the 
phased  approach  are  to  gain  an  understanding  of  the  concept  of  the  operations,  to 
enhance  TSA’s  ability  to  monitor  a  small,  manageable  population  of  operators,  and 
to determine the advantages and disadvantages of alternative technology and other 
solutions  and  their  impact  on  GA  operations.  The  pilot  program  will  serve  as  a 
means  of  verifying  pilot  identity  for  access  to  special  airspace  and  in  the  event  of 
an incident management situation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

International  Outreach:  To  facilitate  better  communication  and  harmonization 
with  our  foreign  partners,  TSA  recently  signed  a  quad-lateral  agreement  with  the 
European  Union,  Australia,  and  Canada  to  establish  a  working  relationship  in  de-
veloping  security  initiatives  that  have  an  impact  on  GA  throughout  the  world. 
Through  this  partnership,  we  intend  to  collaborate  with  industry  security  partners 
to incorporate universally accepted security measures into the GA realm of aviation. 
This international cooperation is positive step forward for GA, and will not only en-
hance security measures and practices being developed in agreement with other na-
tions,  but  it  is  also  envisioned  that  these  measures  and  practices  will  become  more 
uniform and standardized. 

9/11  Act  Recommendations:  TSA  is  in  the  process  of  developing,  socializing,  and 
implementing an airport vulnerability assessment tool for GA airport owners/opera-
tors to conduct a security self assessment of their respective facility. TSA envisions 
that this tool will be interactive and offered online, and will be aligned with existing 
security practices and measures to provide effective security while being reasonable 
and  feasible  for  industry  to  utilize.  Additionally,  TSA  is  in  the  process  of  analyzing 
the feasibility of establishing a funding mechanism for security enhancements at GA 
airports. 

Question  4.  Included  in  the  Implementing  Recommendations  of  the  9/11  Commis-
sion Act of 2007 is a requirement that the TSA develop a means of enhancing secu-
rity ‘‘by properly identifying authorized airline flight deck and cabin crew members 
at  screening  checkpoints  and  granting  them  expedited  access  through  screening 
checkpoints.’’ What is the status of these efforts? 

Answer. The Transportation Security Administration (TSA) is evaluating the fea-
sibility of instituting a sterile area access system through pilot testing at three air-
ports:  Baltimore-Washington  International  Airport,  Pittsburgh  International  Air-
port, and Columbia (South Carolina) Metropolitan Airport. TSA will conduct a pilot 
of  the  proposed  sterile  area  access  system  for  60  days  at  these  locations  and  has 
committed to a July 2008 implementation date. 

Question 5. The 9/11 Act tasks TSA with many new and important responsibilities 
for surface transportation security. For rail security alone, the Act requires some 12 
new  rulemakings,  reports,  and  assessments.  How  does  the  TSA  plan  to  implement 
the  new  surface  transportation  security  provisions  of  the  9/11  bill  without  any  in-
creased funding for the upcoming fiscal year? 

Please  provide  a  list  of  all  the  mandates  given  to  TSA  in  the  9/11  Act,  including 
for rail and surface transportation, and whether or not the mandate has been com-
pleted. If the mandate has not yet been completed, please include the expected com-
pletion date. 

Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  has  developed  imple-
mentation  plans  for  all  of  the  provisions  in  the  Implementing  Recommendations  of 
the 9/11 Commission Act of 2007 (9/11 Act) pertaining to freight rail transportation. 
Additional funding to implement a number of the provisions in the 9/11 Act (includ-
ing  several  rail  provisions)  was  included  in  the  Fiscal  Year  (FY)  2008  Consolidated 
Appropriations  Act  and  a  spend  plan  has  been  approved.  The  funding  will  carry 
through FY 2009. TSA is identifying the specific processes needed to implement the 
actions  required  in  the  9/11  Act.  This  includes  the  identification  of  the  data  nec-
essary  to  assessing  the  economic  impacts  of  specific  taskings  and  rulemakings  de-
ployment. TSA is working diligently to meet its obligations in the 9/11 Act. 

The  Transportation  Security  Administration  tracks  the  status  the  9/11  Commis-
sion  Act  implementation  on  a  monthly  basis  as  part  of  a  Department  of  Homeland 
Security managed working group. The attached spreadsheet lists all mandates given 
to TSA in the 9/11 Act and their current status. We would be happy to provide addi-
tional  information  to  Congress  regarding  estimated  completion  dates  on  particular 
mandates  of  interest.  Certain  tasks  lack  sufficient  resources  to  allow  them  to  be 
completed  in  accordance  with  the  9/11  Act’s  deadlines.  Projected  completion  dates 
are provided if known or reasonably predictable. Tasks that have not been resourced 
will not have an expected completion date. 

Question 6. Please explain why FEMA, presumably with TSA’s guidance, has lim-
ited the use of FY 2008 grant funds for the Class I freight railroads to just training 
when the 9/11 Act clearly provides 22 different appropriate uses for the funds. 

Answer. The Implementing Recommendations of the 9/11 Commission Act of 2007 
authorized a grant program for freight railroad carriers. The Fiscal Year (FY) 2008 
Consolidated  Appropriations  Act  appropriated  $400  million  for  Public  Transpor-
tation  Security  and  Railroad  Security  Assistance.  For  FY  2008,  the  Department  of 
Homeland  Security  (DHS)  awarded  $7.4  million  from  this  appropriation  to  the 
freight railroad carriers. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

DHS focused the Railroad Security Assistance on Class II and Class III railroads, 
which  have  smaller  operating  budgets  and  profit  margins  and,  therefore,  do  not 
have  the  funds  to  pay  for  security  enhancements  and  mitigation  efforts  through 
their  own  budgets.  The  Class  I  railroads,  having  already  prepared  robust  vulner-
ability  assessments  and  security  plans,  were  afforded  an  opportunity  to  obtain 
grants for the enhancement of training for frontline employees. Training of frontline 
employees  is  a  top  funding  priority  for  DHS  across  all  transportation  grant  pro-
grams. 

Question  7.  Why  did  the  FY  2009  budget  proposal  seek  to  eliminate  all  funding 
for  freight  railroad  security  efforts,  despite  the  9/11  Act  authorization  of  $300  mil-
lion for this purpose? Do you believe that the freight railroads’ operations are totally 
secure and that no risks exist? 

Answer.  The  freight  railroads  and  their  owners  are  well  positioned  financially  to 
make the necessary operational and infrastructure changes to improve their security 
posture.  Funds  have  been  made  available  to  the  freight  railroads  through  the 
Freight  Railroad  Security  Grant  Program  (FRSGP)  administered  by  the  Federal 
Emergency Management Agency. The FRSGP provided assistance to both small and 
large railroads to improve their security foundation by making funding available for 
conducting vulnerability assessments, developing security plans, and conducting se-
curity-related training for frontline employees. 

The  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  has  identified  risks  in  freight 
railroad  operations  and  is  actively  working  with  the  industry  to  reduce  vulnerabili-
ties and minimize the consequences of a terrorist attack. For example, 2 years ago, 
TSA  identified  the  transportation  of  Toxic  Inhalation  Hazard  (TIH)  materials 
through  high  population  density  areas  to  be  the  primary  security  risk  for  freight 
railroads  and  the  communities  they  serve.  TSA  negotiated  a  voluntary  agreement 
with  the  freight  rail  industry  that  would  drive  TIH  risk  reduction.  This  program’s 
goal is to reduce the objectively measured risk of TIH rail transportation by 50 per-
cent by the end of 2008. To date, this program has achieved a reduction of 52.7 per-
cent  in  the  measured  risk.  This  reduction  has  been  attained  through  the  diligent 
and  concerted  efforts  of  the  railroad  carriers  to  make  operational  changes  that  re-
duce  the  time  that  TIH  rail  cars  spend  transiting  high  threat  areas.  The  rail  car-
riers have also instituted measures that provide better monitoring of these rail cars 
while they are standing still (referred to as ‘‘dwell time’’) so as to better detect and 
deter  potential  acts  of  terrorism.  TSA  has  and  will  continue  to  monitor  efforts  to 
reduce  the  vulnerability  of  these  security-sensitive  shipments  through  field  inspec-
tions  and  examination  of  rail  car  trip  data.  The  TSA  surface  inspection  force  has 
conducted  over  3,100  individual  surveys  to  verify  the  management  of  these  cars  by 
the railroads. 

In  addition,  TSA  published  a  notice  of  proposed  rulemaking  on  December  21, 
2006,  proposing  rule  security  requirements  for  freight  railroad  carriers;  intercity, 
commuter,  and  short-haul  passenger  train  service  providers;  rail  transit  systems; 
and rail operations at certain, fixed-site facilities that ship or receive specified haz-
ardous  materials  by  rail.  TSA  anticipates  issuing  the  final  rule  before  the  end  of 
2008. 

Question  8.  Although  you  have  moved  all  of  your  canine  units  and  Visible  Inter-
modal  Protection  and  Response  teams  under  aviation  security,  you  indicate  that  a 
large  number  of  them  will  still  be  used  for  surface  transportation  purposes.  What 
percentage of these resources will be solely allocated to surface transportation? 

Answer. Since the program’s inception in 2005, Visible Intermodal Protection Re-
sponse  (VIPR)  deployments  have  been  conducted  in  both  the  aviation  and  surface 
transportation areas. 

Of  the  783  canine  teams  that  are  projected  to  be  deployed  by  the  end  of  Fiscal 
Year  (FY)  2009,  82  teams,  or  approximately  a  little  more  than  10  percent,  will  be 
allocated to surface transportation. 

The percentage of VIPR teams that will be allocated to surface transportation can-
not  be  accurately  projected,  because  VIPR  resources  are  not  allocated  by  transpor-
tation  mode,  but  rather  by  intelligence  and/or  threats,  or  through  the  direction  of 
senior security managers. 

Absent specific intelligence information, the decision to conduct a VIPR operation 
at  a  particular  transportation  venue  is  made  by  the  Federal  Security  Director  and/ 
or  the  Federal  Air  Marshal  Special  Agent  in  Charge.  Historically,  approximately 
half  of  all  deployments  have  been  focused  in  the  aviation  domain.  The  allocation  of 
additional  funding  to  the  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  for  VIPR 
deployments  in  the  FY  2008  budget  enabled  TSA  to  support  all  modes  of  transpor-
tation and respond to intelligence and/or emerging threats. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

Question  9.  On  December  15,  2006,  your  agency  issued  a  proposed  rule  to 
strengthen the security of the Nation’s rail systems in high-threat urban areas. The 
proposed  rule  would  require  freight  railroads  to  increase  the  security  of  hazardous 
material  shipments  and  to  appoint  a  rail  security  coordinator  to  share  information 
with  the  Federal  Government.  This  proposed  rule  would  also  formalize  the  TSA’s 
freight  and  passenger  rail  inspection  authority  and  allow  the  TSA  to  impose  fines 
for security violations. Congress has been promised many times that this rule would 
be finalized soon, but it is still not complete. When can we expect to see this impor-
tant rule finally completed? 

Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration  anticipates  publishing  the 

final rule in the fourth quarter of this calendar year. 

Statutory reference 

Task Description 

Status 

Section 1202(b)  Conduct a revision of the National Strategy 

for Transportation Security (NSTS). 

Section 1202(c) 

Submit an expanded Periodic Progress Re-
port on the National Strategy for Transpor-
tation Security. 

Section 1202(c) 

Submit a written explanation of transpor-
tation security activities not delineated in 
the NSTS. 

Establish and submit a report containing 
the Transportation Security Information 
Sharing Plan (TSISP), 150 days after enact-
ment, and annually thereafter. The plan 
shall contain a ‘‘reasonable deadline’’ by 
which the Plan will be implemented. 

The revision is in progress. The strategy 
must align with other strategies and plans 
required by the 9/11 Act and with the 
Transportation Systems Sector Security 
Plan (TS–SSP). Estimate completion by the 
end of the calendar year. 

A progress report is undergoing agency re-
view. 

This requirement has been completed. A 
written explanation of transportation secu-
rity activities not delineated in the National 
Strategy for Transportation Security (NSTS) 
was delivered to Congress on November 19, 
2007. 

The Transportation Security Information 
Sharing Plan (TSISP) is undergoing agency 
review. Anticipate submission to Congress 
by the end of the calendar year. 

Section 1203(a) 
Title XII (49 
U.S.C. 
114(u)(6)(A)) 

Section 1203(a) 
Title XII (49 
U.S.C. 
114(u)(6)(B)) 

Section 1203 
(b)(1) Title XII 

Submit a report on updates to the Transpor-
tation Security Info Sharing Plan 1 year 
from enactment. 

The first annual report will be due one year 
after the Transportation Security Informa-
tion Sharing Plan (TSISP) is implemented. 

Submit a semi-annual report on number of 
public and private stakeholders who were 
provided with each Comptroller General re-
port. 

The first semi-annual report will be due six 
months after the Transportation Security 
Information Sharing Plan (TSISP) is imple-
mented. 

Section 1302(a)  Establish regulations for civil penalties for 

nonaviation modes. 

Regulation is under development. 

Section 1302(a) 

Issue report to the public of all transpor-
tation enforcement actions via the Federal 
Register. 

TSA will meet the deadline of December 31, 
2008. 

Section 1302(a) 

Submit a report to the public via Congress 
on transportation security enforcement proc-
ess. 

Section 1303 

Develop VIPR (Visible Intermodal Protection 
Response) Team. 

Section 1304 

Deploy surface transportation inspectors to 
assist carriers and enforce transportation se-
curity regulations and directives. 

This requirement has been completed. A re-
port on the transportation security enforce-
ment process was delivered to Congress on 
February 25, 2008. 

This requirement has been completed. The 
Visible Intermodal Protection Response 
(VIPR) teams have been created and are 
currently operating. 

This requirement has been completed. TSA 
has deployed transportation security inspec-
tors-surface and will deploy additional in-
spectors commensurate with funding. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

55 

Statutory reference 

Section 1307(b) 

Task Description 

Status 

Increase the number of explosives detection 
canine team up to 200 canine teams annu-
ally. 

This requirement has been completed. The 
National Explosives Detection Canine Team 
Program (NEDCTP) has begun training and 
deploying canine teams. 170 new teams 
should be deployed by the end of the end of 
the calendar year. 

Section 1307(c) 

Establish criteria to ensure that the canine 
explosives detection teams trained by exter-
nal organizations are adequately trained 
and maintained. 

The National Explosives Detection Canine 
Team Program (NEDCTP) is increasing the 
number of canine teams and is studying op-
tions for engaging external organizations. 

Section 1309 

Review TWIC regulations on conformity 
with statute. 

Section 1404(a)  Develop and implement the ‘‘National Strat-

egy for Public Transportation Security’’ 
plan. 

Section 1405(a)  Review and study the DOT–FTA public 

transportation security assessments. 

This requirement has been completed. In 
the Transportation Worker Identification 
Credential (TWIC) rulemaking, TSA estab-
lished the eligibility and qualifications 
standards workers must meet in order to 
apply for and receive a TWIC. These stand-
ards include the list of criminal offenses set 
forth in Section 1309. 

This requirement has been completed. The 
existing Mass Transit Annex to Transpor-
tation Systems Sector Security Plan (TS– 
SSP) meets the requirement. 

This requirement has been completed. Secu-
rity assessments conducted by the Federal 
Transit Administration (FTA) were provided 
to TSA. 

Section 1405(b)  Conduct local bus-only public transportation 

system security assessments to determine 
local public transportation security needs. 

Assessments have been completed and infor-
mation is being prepared for use by the 
transportation system operators. 

Section 1405(c) 

Require high-risk public transportation 
agencies to develop comprehensive security 
plans. 

Section 1405(c) 

Review, amend and approve high-risk public 
transportation agencies’ security plans. 

Section 1405(e)  Update public transportation system security 

assessments. 

Section 1405(f) 

Establish and adopt security improvement 
priorities. 

Through TSA’s Baseline Assessments and 
Security Enhancement (BASE) program 70 
mass transit systems were assessed, con-
firming that security plans have been devel-
oped and are being implemented. Assess-
ment results are being used to develop pa-
rameters for the mandated regulation. 

Security assessments conducted under 
TSA’s Baseline Assessments and Security 
Enhancement (BASE) program (70 total) 
confirm security plans have been developed 
and are being implemented. Assessment re-
sults are informing development of the pa-
rameters for the mandated regulation. 

This requirement has been completed. Base-
line Assessments and Security Enhance-
ment (BASE) program assessments were 
used to update the Federal Transit Admin-
istration (FTA) assessments. Revisions to 
the BASE assessment checklist since imple-
mentation in August 2006 have streamlined 
the process. 

This requirement has been completed and is 
on-going. Baseline Assessments and Secu-
rity Enhancement (BASE) program assess-
ments were used to set priorities for the as-
sessed agencies. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Statutory reference 

Task Description 

Status 

56 

Section 1406(a)  Establish public transportation grant pro-

gram. 

Section 1407(a)  Establish a new program that is part of the 
larger National Exercise Program that con-
ducts security exercises for the public trans-
portation sector (excluding ferries). 

Section 1408(a) 

Issue interim final regulations on public 
transportation security training program. 

Section 1408(a) 

Issue final regulations on public transpor-
tation security training program. 

Section 1408(d)  Approve or require amendment to a public 
transportation agency’s training program. 

Section 1408(g) 

Secretary shall ensure the public transpor-
tation security training program is a compo-
nent of the larger National Training Pro-
gram. 

Section 1410(a)  Ensure DOT receives timely notification of 
all credible terrorist threats against public 
transportation systems. 

Section 1410(b) 

Fund public transportation ISAC. 

Section 1411 

Establish a program to complete a name- 
based background and immigration status 
check for all front-line public transportation 
employees. 

Section 1412 

Submit a report on implementation of Title 
XIV (Public Transportation Security) action 
items to include the amount of funds needed 
to carry the Title XIV’s mandates that have 
not been appropriated or obligated. 

Section 1413(i) 

Publish regulations documenting process by 
which persons may contact DHS to report 
public transportation security problems. 

This requirement has been completed. It 
was completed with a joint letter by the 
Secretaries of DHS and Department of 
Transportation (DOT) specifying DHS as 
the lead on substantive and administrative 
matters pertaining to the Transportation 
Security Grant Program (TSGP). The letter 
was sent to the appropriate Congressional 
committees on December 21, 2007. 

TSA’s Intermodal Security Training and Ex-
ercise Program (I–STEP) meets the exercise 
program requirements. 

Interim final regulations are under develop-
ment. The Congressional purpose has been 
met—security training guidelines by subject 
areas and categories of employees were pub-
lished in February 2007 with streamlined 
application and eligible expenses funded 
under Transit Security Grant Program 
(TSGP). 

TSA is proceeding in an integrated ap-
proach for the surface modes required to 
produce regulations on security plans that 
include training requirements. TSA pre-
pared a draft security training rule, includ-
ing preamble and regulatory text, for mass 
transit and passenger rail. 

This requirement is contingent on the publi-
cation of the regulations and receipt of 
training programs. 

Requirements for making the public trans-
portation security training program a com-
ponent of the National Training Program 
will be incorporated into the regulatory 
project. 

This requirement has been completed. Noti-
fication to DOT occurs through the National 
Operations Center (NOC) and the Transpor-
tation Security Operations Center (TSOC) 
alerts and advisories and through direct en-
gagement between TSA and FTA in the 
interagency Mass Transit Security Informa-
tion Network. 

The FY08 DHS Appropriations Act did not 
provide funding for the public transpor-
tation ISAC. 

Significant funding and time will be re-
quired to implement this requirement. TSA 
has begun to develop a project plan for a 
rulemaking needed to satisfy this require-
ment. 

The report is undergoing agency review. 

The regulatory project has been initiated. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

Statutory reference 

Task Description 

Status 

Section 1414(b)  Routinely update guidance and rec-

ommendations given to public transit agen-
cies for conducting voluntary security back-
ground checks. 

This requirement has been completed. Guid-
ance approved by OMB in November 2007. 

Section 1414(e) 

Publish a regulation covering process for 
handling false statements. 

A draft interim final rule has been devel-
oped and is undergoing agency review. 

Section 1557(d) 

If determined necessary by the Secretary, 
issue security regulations for pipeline opera-
tors. 

Evaluation of the need for regulations is on- 
going. 

Section 1501(13)  Define security-sensitive material. 

Section 1502(a)  Establish procedures to ensure all grants 
made under Title XV (Surface Transpor-
tation Security) are expended in accordance 
with this Title. 

Section 1502(d)  Notify Congress within 5 days of issuing a 

Letter of Intent (LOI). 

A proposed definition for security-sensitive 
material (SSM) is undergoing agency re-
view. 

This requirement has been completed. Pro-
cedures have been established. 

This requirement has been completed. Ap-
propriate Congressional delegations and 
staffs receive formal notification (within five 
days of issuing a Letter of Intent (LOI)). 

Section 1504 

Develop a Railroad and Over-the-Road Bus 
Security Public Outreach and Awareness 
Plan. 

This requirement has been completed. A let-
ter including the January 2008 plan was 
sent to Congress on June 17, 2008. 

Section 1511 

Establish a Task Force to assess the risk of 
a terrorist attack on railroads. 

This requirement has been completed. Task 
force has been established. 

Section 1511(b) 
and Section 
1511(e) 

Develop and implement the modal plan ti-
tled ‘‘National Strategy for Railroad Trans-
portation Security’’ (NSRTS) based on the 
task force’s risk assessment and consults 
with railroad-related entities and submit a 
report containing the assessment and the 
plan. 

The ‘‘National Strategy for Railroad Trans-
portation Security’’ (NSRTS) is under 
developmment. 

Section 1512(a) 

Issue railroad security regulation for high- 
risk carriers. 

A regulatory project has been initiated. 

Section 1512(d), 
and (e), (f), and 
(h) 

Section 1513(c) 

Section 1513(g) 

Provide technical assistance, threat info and 
guidance to railroad carriers on developing 
their security plan developed in accordance 
with the NSRTS; Review and approve vul-
nerability (VA) and security plans; Develop a 
program to assign railroads to risk tiers and 
notify appropriate railroads. 

Award security improvement grants to rail-
road carriers, the Alaska railroad, shippers 
of security sensitive materials by rail, own-
ers of railcars used to transport security sen-
sitive materials and other recipients identi-
fied in Title XV. 

Submit a report on the feasibility and appro-
priateness of requiring a non-federal match 
for grants awarded to freight railroad car-
riers. 

Contingent on completing the railroad secu-
rity regulation for high-risk carriers. 

This requirement has been completed. 
Grants award announced on May 16, 2008. 

This report is in the initial stages of devel-
opment. 

Section 1514 

Award grants to Amtrak for general security 
purposes as well as specific projects. 

This requirement has been completed. 
Grants have been awarded. 

Section 1516(a)  Develop a program for railroad carrier exer-
cises that is a component of the National Ex-
ercise Program. 

Pilot exercises were held in the National 
Capital Region from January through June 
2008. This program will be consolidated as 
an exercise package for national dissemina-
tion. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

58 

Task Description 

Status 

Statutory reference 

Section 1517(a); 
Section 1517(e) 

Issue regulations for a railroad security 
training program that is a component of the 
National Training Program. 

A consolidated regulatory project including 
railroad, public transit, and over-the-road 
bus entities has been initiated. Anticipate a 
Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (NPRM) to 
be issued in the first quarter of Calendar 
Year 2009. The requirements of the Na-
tional Training Program will be included in 
the training regulation and program imple-
mentation. 

This requirement is contingent upon issuing 
the regulation and the reviewing the car-
riers’ training programs. 

The report will be submitted after the regu-
lations are published and the training pro-
grams have been reviewed. 

Completion of this requirement will be con-
current with the Freight Railroad security 
regulation. 

TSA is working with the DHS Chemical Se-
curity Analysis Center (S&T) to conduct 
analyses of tests on release of toxic inhala-
tion hazards from rail tank cars. Expected 
to begin around January 2009. 

Significant funding and time will be re-
quired to implement this requirement. TSA 
has begun to develop a project plan for a 
rulemaking needed to satisfy this require-
ment. 

A regulatory project has been initiated. Cur-
rently, TSA via the TSA Contact Center 
(TCC) has in place procedures through 
which persons may report security related 
matters including those relating to motor 
carriers and railroads. 

This requirement has been completed. The 
guidance approved by OMB in November 
2007 was disseminated to mass transit and 
passenger rail security partners. 

Section 1517(d)  Approve or amend the railroad carrier train-

ing program. 

Section 1517(f) 

Submit a report on a representative sample 
of the railroad training programs. 

Section 1517(g) 

Issue guidance and best practices for a rail-
road shipper employee security program. 

Section 
1519(b)(5) 

Complete a study of the probable methods of 
a terrorist attack on a railroad tank car 
used to transport toxic gases (DISPERSION 
MODEL). 

Section 1520 

Establish a program to complete name-based 
security background and immigration status 
against the consolidated terrorist watch list 
for all railroad frontline employees. 

Section 1521(i) 
and Section 
1536(i) 

Publish regulations documenting the process 
by which persons may contact DHS to report 
railroad security problems and over-the-road 
bus security problems, deficiencies or 
vulnerabilities. 

Section 1522(b)  Routinely update guidance and rec-

ommendations given to railroad carriers/ 
contractors for conducting voluntary security 
background checks. 

Section 1522(e) 

Publish a regulation covering a process for 
handling false statements. 

A draft interim final rule has been devel-
oped and is undergoing agency review. 

Section 1531 

Section 1531(d) 
and (e) 

Publish regulations for high risk tiered over- 
the-road bus operators to conduct vulner-
ability assessments and to submit a security 
plan. 

Provide technical assistance, threat informa-
tion, and guidance to over-the-road bus oper-
ators on completing their vulnerability as-
sessments and developing their security 
plan. 

Section 1531(f) 

Review and approve security plans of high 
risk over-the-road bus operators. 

Section 1531(h)  Develop a process to assign over-the-road 
bus operators to a risk-based tier that in-
cludes notifying the operator within 60 days 
of assignment or reassignment. 

A draft Notice of Proposed Rulemaking 
(NPRM) is undergoing agency review. 

TSA will provide technical assistance to as-
sist operators to comply with the require-
ments of the regulations when published. 

This requirement is contingent upon issuing 
the regulations and receiving the security 
plans. 

A draft Notice of Proposed Rulemaking 
(NPRM) is undergoing agency review. 

Section 1532 

Establish a program for making grants to 
private over-the-road bus operators that 
prioritizes grants based on security risks. 

This requirement has been completed. All 
awards were announced and finalized on 
May 16, 2008. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

59 

Statutory reference 

Task Description 

Status 

Section 1533 

Establish a program for over-the-road bus 
exercises that is consistent with the larger 
National Exercise program. 

Section 1534(a); 
Section 1534(e) 

Develop and issue regulations for an over- 
the-road bus training program to prepare 
over-the-road frontline employees that is a 
component of the National Training Pro-
gram. 

Section 1534(d)  Approve over-the road bus operators’ security 

training programs. 

Section 1534(f) 

Submit a report on the over-the-road bus 
employee training program. 

Section 1538 

Submit a report containing threat assess-
ment of the risk of terrorist attack on the 
Nation’s school bus system. 

Section 1540 

Submit a report containing threat assess-
ment on commercial trucking security issues. 

Section 1541 

Section 1551 

DHS and DOT shall execute and develop an 
annex to the dept’s 9/28/04 MOU address-
ing roles and responsibilities with respect to 
motor carrier transportation security mat-
ters. 

DHS shall support the DOT secretary to 
publish a final rule requiring railroads to 
analyze routes over which Security Sensitive 
Materials are carried and adjusts the routes 
over which SSM is carried accordingly. 

TSA’s Intermodal Security Training and Ex-
ercise Program (I–STEP) is being adapted to 
serve as the over-the-road bus exercise pro-
gram. 

A draft Notice of Proposed Rulemaking 
(NPRM) is undergoing agency review. TSA 
will assure the necessary steps are taken to 
make the over-the-road bus training pro-
gram a component of the National Training 
Program. 

This requirement is contingent upon the 
issuance of the training regulations and re-
view of the training program plans. 

The report will be submitted no later than 
two years after issuance of the regulations 
on over-the-road bus training program. 

The report is under development. 

The threat assessment has been initiated, 
however the magnitude of the study, about 
100 threat scenarios, will preclude comple-
tion by the due date. 

Annex is undergoing agency review. 

This requirement has been completed. An 
Interim Final Rule (IFR) was published on 
April 16, 2008. 

Section 
1551(i)(2) 

Publish high-consequence targets that rail-
roads must consider in transporting security 
sensitive materials. 

A project to develop and publish the list has 
been initiated. 

Section 1552(a)  Develop a program to ‘‘encourage using im-
proved technology’’ to track rail cars trans-
porting SSM and detecting breaches in the 
integrity of a tank car. 

This requirement has been completed. 

Section 1554 

Develop a program to facilitate tracking of 
motor carrier shipments of security sensitive 
materials and enhanced technology to im-
prove their security. 

A program has been developed, however it 
was not funded for implementation under 
the 2008 Consolidated Appropriations Act. 

Section 1554(c) 

Evaluate and submit a report on the pro-
gram developed to track motor carrier ship-
ment of security sensitive materials. 

The evaluation is contingent on completing 
Section 1501(13) and funding of the track-
ing program. 

Section 1556(b) 

Incorporate technical corrections for back-
ground check requirements for persons hold-
ing a valid TWIC card. 

Section 1557(a)  Establish a program for tasking pipeline op-

erators to comply with PHMSA security 
guidelines. 

This requirement poses significant informa-
tion technology challenges that TSA is cur-
rently addressing. Further changes may be 
required to the existing HME regulation. 

This requirement has been completed. Pro-
gram has been established. 

Section 1557(b)  Develop and implement a plan for reviewing 

pipeline security plans of the 100 most crit-
ical pipeline operators. 

A plan has been developed and funds have 
been allocated. TSA is taking steps to imple-
ment the plan. 

Section 1557(d) 

Issue security recommendations, as appro-
priate, for pipelines operators based on re-
view of pipeline security plans. 

This requirement has been completed. Rec-
ommendations have been provided to the in-
dustry. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

60 

Statutory reference 

Task Description 

Status 

Section 1558(a); 
Section 1558(d) 

Develop a pipeline security and incident re-
covery protocols plan and submit a report. 

TSA is developing a project plan with De-
partment of Transportation (DOT) that in-
cludes possible use of the Transportation 
Security Center of Excellence. The report 
will be submitted by the deadline of August 
3, 2009. 

Section 1607(b)  Begin implementation of strategic plan for 
explosives detection at passenger screening 
checkpoints. 

Implementation of strategic plan for explo-
sives detection at passenger screening 
checkpoints is underway. 

Section 1601 

Expend fund from ‘‘Checkpoint Screening 
Security Fund’’ for explosives detection 
equipment at checkpoints. 

Section 1602(a) 

TSA shall develop a program to screen 50 
percent of air cargo on passenger aircraft 
with 18 months of and 100 percent within 
36 months of bill passage 

Section 1602(a) 

Issue air cargo screening IFR and Final 
Rule as necessary. 

Section 1602(a) 

Secretary’s explanation for not issuing final 
rule, if necessary. 

Section 1602(a) 

Submit a report to Congress on air cargo 
screening system. 

Section 1602(b) 

Submit a report to Congress and GAO on air 
cargo screening exemption. 

Section 1603(b) 

Submit a report on the cost-sharing study 
for in-line baggage screening. 

Section 1604(a)  Develop a program for making grants to air-

port sponsors for projects to improve avia-
tion security such as replacing baggage con-
veyor systems, reconfiguring terminal bag-
gage areas to install explosive detection sys-
tems, etc. 

This requirement has been completed. TSA 
will purchase checkpoint evolution screen-
ing equipment until funds are expended. A 
spend plan was developed and sent to Con-
gress on April 11, 2008. Funds will be ex-
pended in accordance with the spend plan. 

A strategy has been implemented to achieve 
the 18-month and 36-month milestones. 

The Interim Final Rule (IFR) is in the draft-
ing stage. Anticipate publishing the IFR be-
fore the end of the calendar year. 

TSA expects to release a Final Rule within 
one year of issuing an Interim Final Rule 
(IFR) in accordance with the requirements 
of the 9/11 Act. 

TSA is developing its 100 percent screening 
strategy and will submit a report one year 
after full implementation of this strategy. 

This requirement has been completed. A re-
port on air cargo screening exemption was 
sent to Congress in March 2008. 

This requirement has been completed. A re-
port on the cost-sharing study was delivered 
to Congress on April 2, 2008. 

Currently being implemented and completed 
on an annual basis. 

Section 1604(b) 

Submit a report on the prioritization sched-
ule for airport security improvement projects, 
a corresponding timeline, and a description 
of the funding allocation. 

The report is undergoing agency review. A 
letter on the status of this provision was 
sent to Congress on March 31, 2008. 

Section 1605(a) 

Submit a report on the plan to test and im-
plement advanced passenger prescreening 
system. 

This requirement has been completed. The 
Secure Flight report was delivered to Con-
gress on December 5, 2007. 

Section 1607 

Section 1609 

Develop and issue a strategic plan for 
strengthening explosives detection at pas-
senger screening checkpoints. 

An updated Strategic Plan is undergoing 
agency review. 

Submit a report on the department’s evalua-
tion of the results of the blast-resistance pilot 
program. 

Evaluation is complete and the report is un-
dergoing agency review. A letter on the sta-
tus of this provision was sent to Congress 
on March 31, 2008. 

Section 1609 

Make available blast-resistant cargo con-
tainers to air carriers. 

TSA has placed blast-resistant cargo con-
tainers on the qualified products list and 
made them available to have air carriers. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Statutory reference 

Task Description 

Status 

61 

Section 1611 

Develop program for specialized security 
training for TSO’s. 

Section 1612 

Hire sufficient TSA personnel to enhance se-
curity and reduce passenger wait time to 10 
minutes. 

Section 1613 

Institute a pilot program at not more than 2 
airports to ID technologies to improve secu-
rity at airport exit lanes. 

Section 1613(c) 

Submit a preliminary report in the form of a 
Hill briefing on the these pilot programs. 

Section 1613(c) 

Submit a final report on the results of the 
pilot programs. 

Section 1614(a) 

Submit a preliminary report on TSA’s efforts 
to institute a sterile area access system. 

Section 1614(b) 

Initiate implementation of the sterile area 
access system. 

This requirement has been completed. TSA 
has established ongoing training programs 
for Transportation Security Officers (TSOs) 
to develop specialized skills in the following 
areas: behavior observation and detection, 
direct access security screening, bomb ap-
praisal, improvised explosive device recogni-
tion, and travel document verification. 

This requirement has been completed. TSA 
has instituted a Screening Allocation Model 
that ensures that TSA has the appropriate 
level of personnel at each airport to meet all 
operational needs during both peak and 
down periods of passenger volume. The sys-
tem-wide average wait time has never ex-
ceeded the 10-minute threshold cited in Sec-
tion 1612. 

TSA is planning to institute a pilot program 
at two airports to ID technologies to im-
prove security at airport exit lanes. The 
pilot launch is expected to take place at 
Dallas Forth Worth International and Se-
attle-Tacoma International in the 4th quar-
ter of 2008. 

This requirement has been completed. The 
briefing on ID technologies to improve secu-
rity at airport exit lanes was submitted to 
the appropriate Congressional committees 
on April 16, 2008. 

A report on the results will be completed 
within 18 months of the pilot launch. The 
pilot launch at both airports is expected to 
take place in the 4th quarter of 2008. 

This requirement has been completed. A 
preliminary report on TSA’s efforts to insti-
tute a sterile area access system was deliv-
ered to Congress on March 26, 2008. 

TSA initiated three pilots projects for its 
proposed sterile area access system at Balti-
more-Washington International, Pittsburgh 
International, and Columbia Metropolitan. 

Section 1615(a) 

Publish Federal Register notice for a na-
tional registered armed law enforcement pro-
gram for armed officers traveling by com-
mercial aircraft. 

Significant funding and time will be re-
quired to implement this requirement. An 
integrated project team has been formed to 
begin these efforts. 

Section 1615(b) 

Submit a report on the law enforcement bio-
metric credential program. 

This requirement is contingent upon imple-
mentation of Section 1615(a). 

Section 1616 

Issue regulations for security of foreign and 
domestic aviation repair stations. 

A draft Notice of Proposed Rulemaking 
(NPRM) is undergoing agency review. 

Section 1616 

Develop program to conduct security reviews 
of foreign repair stations. 

Section 1617 

TSA shall develop and implement a new 
threat and vulnerability assessment program 
for general aviation. 

Section 1617 

TSA shall complete a feasibility study on up-
grades to security at general aviation air-
ports. 

TSA will initiate a repair station audit pro-
gram immediately after publication of the 
final regulation. TSA inspectors continue to 
conduct audits of foreign repair stations in 
cooperation with foreign governments and 
repair station operators. 

TSA is creating a web-based assessment 
tool. Testing of the website begins August 
2008 with site launch targeted for Fall 
2008. 

This requirement has been completed. A let-
ter on the results of the grant feasibility 
study was sent to Congress on April 9, 
2008. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

62 

Statutory reference 

Task Description 

Status 

Section 1617 

TSA shall develop a program under which 
general aviation aircraft are required to sub-
mit passenger information and advance no-
tification requirements for CBP before enter-
ing U.S. airspace. 

This requirement has been completed. TSA 
currently ensures that passenger informa-
tion submitted by international general 
aviation aircraft, as identified in coordina-
tion with the FAA, is vetted against the ap-
propriate databases before entering U.S. 
airspace. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. ROGER F. WICKER TO 

HON. EDMUND S. ‘‘KIP’’ HAWLEY 

Question 1. We often hear reports of airport closures or terminal evacuations due 
to  suspect  baggage.  How  many  times  were  airports  closed  or  terminals  evacuated 
during 2007? Of these, how often were these evacuations and closures based on sus-
pect  baggage  identified  at  security  checkpoints?  Has  TSA  calculated  the  economic 
cost associated with these evacuations and closures? 

Answer. In 2007, there were 49 terminal evacuations. In all 49 instances, the ter-
minal evacuations were based on suspect baggage identified at security checkpoints 
or other airport locations. TSA does not calculate the economic cost associated with 
these closures. 

The  Transportation  Security  Administration’s  (TSA’s)  Bomb  Appraisal  Officer 
(BAO)  program  is  designed  to  help  address  these  checkpoint  evacuation  incidents. 
BAOs  are  TSA  employees  who  were  former  military  or  public  safety  bomb  disposal 
technicians and have previously served as members of a certified bomb squad. They 
are graduates of one of two bomb disposal schools, the Federal Bureau of Investiga-
tion  Hazardous  Devices  School  or  the  Department  of  Defense  Naval  School,  Explo-
sive Ordnance Disposal. BAOs bring their experience with improvised explosive de-
vices  directly  to  TSA’s  front  line.  If  TSA  screening  personnel  are  unable  to  resolve 
an alarm, BAOs provide TSA with one more opportunity to resolve an alarm before 
turning  the  situation  over  to  a  Law  Enforcement  Officer  who  may  order  an  evacu-
ation and call for a bomb squad response. 

During calendar year 2007, there were 1,156 BAO-related requests to conduct ad-
vanced  alarm  resolution  procedures.  Of  these,  the  BAO  cleared  1,139  events  in  an 
average  of  12.5  minutes.  Of  the  17  events  not  cleared  by  the  BAO,  7  were  not 
cleared  because  the  BAO  was  not  present  to  respond.  The  remaining  10  events  re-
sulted in bomb squad responses for items such as hand grenades, 20 millimeter pro-
jectiles,  blasting  caps,  temperature  sensors,  etc.  Without  the  involvement  of  TSA 
BAOs,  the  number  of  terminal  evacuations  summarized  above  may  have  been  far 
greater. 

Question 1a. Does TSA have a national policy on resolving suspect baggage? What 
are the procedures and technologies used by TSA to implement this policy and con-
tain these threats? 

Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration’s  (TSA’s)  national  policy  for 
resolving  possible  threats  in  suspect  baggage  involves  application  of  process  algo-
rithms,  technical  procedures,  technological  solutions,  and  the  training  and  experi-
ence of our professional screening workforce. When a bag is identified as containing 
potential threat items, the screening workforce must follow the procedures for clear-
ing  possible  threats  as  detailed  in  the  Screening  Checkpoint  and  Checked  Baggage 
Standard Operating Procedures. 

At  screening  checkpoints,  accessible  property  is  first  examined  with  X-ray  sys-
tems.  For  those  items  that  appear  to  contain  a  prohibited  item,  the  X-ray  operator 
refers  the  bag  to  a  property  search  screener  who  may  apply  a  mixture  of  Explosive 
Trace  Detection  (ETD)  screening,  liquid  explosive  screening,  and/or  physical  search 
procedures.  For  items  that  remain  a  potential  threat,  Transportation  Security  Offi-
cers  request  Bomb  Appraisal  Officer  (BAO)  and/or  law  enforcement  assistance. 
BAOs  have  extensive  experience  (military  or  commercial)  with  explosive  handling 
and/or  identification.  BAOs  are  readily  available  to  assist  the  screening  workforce 
by providing advanced alarm resolution procedures in cases where there may be an 
improvised explosive devices (IED) or IED components. 

For  checked  baggage  at  airports  equipped  with  Explosive  Detection  Systems 
(EDS)  X-ray  systems,  the  screening  workforce  utilizes  On-Screen  Alarm  Resolution 
Protocols to determine if the bag contains a possible threat. Additional screening is 
conducted  utilizing  ETD  devices  and/or  physical  search  procedures  for  bags  identi-
fied  by  the  EDS  as  a  possible  threat.  At  airports  equipped  with  ETD  devices  only, 
the screening workforce applies a varying ETD bag search protocol to each checked 
bag  (search  types  are  applied  on  a  random  basis).  If  a  possible  threat  is  identified, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

63 

additional  screening  is  conducted  utilizing  physical  search  procedures.  Again,  BAO 
assistance  is  requested  for  incidents  involving  suspected  explosive  devices.  Law  en-
forcement  is  notified  when  checked  luggage  remains  suspicious  after  all  screening 
alarm resolution procedures and BAO resolution efforts have been exhausted. 

Question  2.  I  recently  wrote  to  you  regarding  concerns  over  small  and  medium 
sized airports’ access to the latest explosive detection systems. Would you agree that 
the need for the small and medium airports to receive the latest explosive detection 
systems is just as important as the larger airports? 

Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  agrees.  Based  on  the 
current  strategic  plan  for  the  Electronic  Baggage  Screening  Program  (EBSP),  TSA 
intends to deploy explosives detection systems (EDS) to all CAT X–III airports. This 
includes  all  medium-hub  airports  and  most  small-hub  airports  across  the  country. 
TSA is exploring the concept of dual use, which incorporates the screening of carry- 
on  and  checked  baggage  at  smaller  airports.  There  are  opportunities  for  EDS  and 
advanced  technology  to  enhance  screening  capabilities  at  the  smaller  airports  com-
pared to current procedures. As part of the initial deployments of Automated Explo-
sives Detection Systems (Auto-EDS) at smaller airports, TSA will be evaluating the 
feasibility of dual-use. 

For  many  small  airports,  the  latest  reduced-size  EDS  equipment  is  optimal  from 
a  security,  economic,  and  spatial  standpoint.  These  machines  are  smaller,  have  im-
proved  false  alarm  rates,  and  are  less  expensive  from  a  life-cycle  cost  perspective 
than  the  initial  generation  of  EDS  machines  deployed  at  many  large  airports.  TSA 
has and will continue to deploy these reduced-size EDS machines at smaller airports 
across the country. 

Question  2a.  What  is  the  breakdown  of  funding  for  the  past  3  years  of  explosive 

detection systems between the different categories and sizes of airports? 

Answer. This data is not available for Fiscal Year (FY) 2006. The chart below pro-

vides the data for FY 2007 and FY 2008. 

Category 

Size 

X 
I 
II 
III 
IV 

X 
I 

X 
I 
II 

III, IV 

FY07 

$341,380,300  Large 
$89,449,473  Medium 
$19,089,906  Small 
$9,778,509  Non-hub 

$687,888 

FY07 Supplemental 

$143,667,214  Large 
$54,082,786  Medium 

FY08 

$357,304,911  Large 
$88,177,540  Medium 
$33,813,323  Small &Non-hub 
$11,189,539 

$353,763,779 
$75,480,028 
$15,828,626 
$15,313,644 

$145,219,136 
$52,530,864 

$364,305,523 
$72,878,726 
$53,301,064 

Funding  for  passenger  screening  checkpoint  equipment  is  broken  down  by  tech-
nology,  not  by  airport  size  or  category.  However,  TSA  did  procure  20  checkpoint 
Auto-EDS  in  FY  2007  for  deployment  to  CAT  X,  I,  III  and  IV  airports.  Approxi-
mately $5.5 million for checkpoint screening explosive detection technology was allo-
cated  for  smaller  category  airports  in  FY  2007.  Approximately  $2.7  million  for 
checkpoint  screening  explosive  detection  technology  was  allocated  for  Category  X 
and I airports. 

Question  2b.  How  does  TSA  determine  which  airports  receive  the  latest  security 

Answer. There are a number of factors impacting TSA’s decisions on where to de-
ploy  the  latest  security  technologies.  While  primarily  driven  by  a  risk-based  ap-
proach,  considerations  are  also  made  based  upon  the  sites’  capability  to  accommo-
date  the  equipment  with  regard  to  space  availability,  size,  and  weight,  among  oth-
ers. 

Airport  technology  project  prioritization  takes  into  account  risk  (e.g.,  threat,  con-
sequence,  and  vulnerability)  as  well  as  operational  and  economic  considerations 
(e.g.,  projected  airport  growth,  screening  performance,  economic  viability,  and  on- 
the-job injury rates). Deployment of new technologies at airports is based on several 
factors, including: 

technologies? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

64 

1.  Predicted  optimal  screening  system  for  each  airport—TSA  identifies  likely 
candidates for specific technologies based on the most cost-effective, or optimal, 
screening system; 
2.  Specific  requests  from  airports  and  Federal  Security  Directors  (FSDs)—In 
some  cases,  airports  or  their  FSDs  will  request  specific  equipment.  While  the 
Office  of  Security  Technology  makes  the  final  decision  on  the  make  and  model 
of equipment to be deployed, where practical and justified, TSA attempts to pro-
vide equipment requested by airports and their FSDs; and 
3. Availability of specific equipment—In some cases, TSA may not have the re-
sources needed to purchase all equipment requested or total equipment requests 
for specific technologies may exceed availability. TSA attempts to balance equip-
ment supply with demand. 

Question  3.  Based  on  the  lessons  learned  from  the  puffer  detection  system  pro-

gram, what changes has TSA implemented for future detection system testing? 

Answer.  As  part  of  the  procurement  process  for  new  technology,  the  Transpor-
tation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  thoroughly  tests  equipment  for  effectiveness 
and suitability. Procurement specifications are defined for each new technology and 
systems  are  tested  against  detection  requirements  in  a  laboratory  environment. 
Qualified  systems  that  demonstrate  detection  effectiveness  are  piloted  in  the  field 
to  evaluate  operator  usability,  throughput,  reliability,  maintainability,  availability, 
and  passenger  acceptance.  The  final  selection  of  technologies  is  based  upon  a  con-
solidated  evaluation  of  system  performance,  including  results  from  laboratory  and 
operational testing. 

Incorporating some lessons learned from the Explosive Trace Portal procurement, 
TSA  has  emphasized  being  a  more  ‘‘program  management  centric’’  organization. 
This  has  improved  TSA’s  ability  to  follow  the  acquisition  life  cycle  to  ensure  that 
product  specifications  are  fully  reviewed,  life-cycle  costs  analyzed,  developmental 
and  operational  test  and  evaluation  results  are  harmonized,  and  procurement  deci-
sions are made based on the results of a documented process. This will improve the 
decision-making  process  when  procuring  from  a  single  vendor  until  we  know  the 
equipment  is  sufficiently  mature  such  that  a  single  vendor  can  provide  the  equip-
ment that detects/performs as specified at a life cycle cost we can afford. 

Question 3a. Have small and medium sized airports been considered for detection 

system testing? 

Answer.  Yes,  the  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  considers  a  vari-
ety of airport locations in selecting sites for operational (or field) testing and evalua-
tion.  Considerations  are  made  based  upon  evaluation  objectives,  operating  environ-
ment, ability to integrate items under test into the overall security architecture, and 
potential impact on current operations. As an example of TSA’s commitment toward 
including small and medium sized airports for detection systems testing, we are cur-
rently  considering  several  Category  III  and  IV  airports  for  the  Dual-Use  Auto-EDS 
Field Assessment. Under this pilot project, TSA will evaluate computed-tomography 
based  systems  (similar  to  those  currently  employed  to  screen  checked  baggage  in 
large and medium-sized airports), for screening both carry-on and checked baggage. 
Question  4.  It  is  my  understanding  that  TSA  is  using  a  number  of  different  sys-
tems  for  detection  such  as  metal  detectors  and  new  technologies  including 
backscatter  and  millimeter  wave  systems.  Where  is  TSA  in  the  ongoing  testing  of 
new  detection  technologies?  As  TSA  determines  the  capabilities  of  these  new  sys-
tems are you also studying the ongoing operation and maintenance costs? 

Answer.  As  an  example  of  testing  activities  encompassing  new  passenger  screen-
ing  technologies,  the  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  has  recently 
completed evaluation of several Whole Body Imaging (WBI) systems at Phoenix Sky 
Harbor  International  Airport  (PHX).  The  WBI  systems  will  remain  at  PHX  for  an 
additional period to gather reliability, maintainability, and availability (RMA) data. 
Testing  of  the  WBI  systems  is  currently  ongoing  at  Los  Angeles  International  Air-
port (LAX) and John F. Kennedy International Airport (JFK). 

We  have  also  recently  completed  evaluation  of  several  Advanced  Technology 
carry-on baggage screening systems at LAX, Albuquerque, Reagan National Airport, 
PHX, and JFK. 

To better understand total life-cycle costs associated with operation of aviation se-
curity  devices,  TSA  is  establishing  extended  surveillance  sites  for  these  systems. 
This will provide an opportunity to validate vendor provided life-cycle data, charac-
terize  system  performance  over  a  longer  time-frame,  examine  system  RMA  and  lo-
gistics  supportability  for  these  systems  (and  associated  operations  and  support 
costs). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

CATHLEEN A. BERRICK 

65 

Question 1. U.S. passenger and freight rail networks rely on an open architecture 
for the movement of freight, spanning vast rural stretches that are difficult to patrol 
and  secure,  and  traversing  densely  populated  urban  areas.  As  a  result,  rail  net-
works are inherently vulnerable to a variety of transportation security incidents, in-
cluding  potential  terrorist  attacks.  What  are  the  significant  security  concerns  re-
garding U.S. passenger and freight rail networks? 

Answer.  To  date,  U.S.  passenger  rail  systems  have  not  been  targets  of  terrorist 
attacks. However, worldwide, public transportation in general and passenger rail in 
particular,  have  been  attacked  multiple  times,  sometimes  with  grave  results.  Ac-
cording  to  transit  agency  officials,  certain  characteristics  of  passenger  rail  systems 
make them inherently vulnerable to terrorist attack and therefore difficult to secure. 
By design, passenger rail systems are open (i.e., multiple access points, hubs serving 
multiple carriers, and, in some cases, no barriers) so that they can move large num-
bers  of  people  quickly.  The  openness  of  passenger  rail  systems  can  leave  them  vul-
nerable because personnel cannot completely monitor or control who enters or leaves 
the  system.  In  addition,  other  characteristics  of  some  passenger  rail  systems—high 
ridership, expensive infrastructure, and high density locations—also make them at-
tractive  targets  for  terrorists  because  of  the  potential  for  mass  casualties  and  eco-
nomic  damage  and  disruption.  Moreover,  the  same  characteristics  that  make  pas-
senger  rail  difficult  to  secure  also  may  make  the  sustained  use  of  some  security 
measures,  such  as  metal  detectors,  difficult  because  they  could  result  in  long  lines 
that could disrupt service. In addition, multiple access points along extended routes 
could make the cost of securing each location prohibitive. 

Regarding  freight  rail,  Federal  and  industry  stakeholders  have  identified  several 
security  risks.  Specifically,  TSA  officials  have  determined  that  the  rail  transpor-
tation  of  toxic  inhalation  hazard  (TIH)  materials  in  close  proximity  to  large  popu-
lation  centers  represents  a  significant  security  concern  because,  if  released  from  a 
rail  car  in  large  quantities  under  certain  atmospheric  conditions,  these  materials 
could present a significant health hazard to people within the path of the resultant 
plume.  Concern  also  exists  regarding  the  critical  role  that  certain  infrastructure, 
such as key bridges and tunnels play in the national railroad system. For example, 
certain bridges, such as those over large rivers, play a key role in the national rail-
road  system  because  of  limited  rerouting  options.  As  a  result,  the  sabotage  or  de-
struction  of  this  infrastructure  presents  significant  economic  concerns.  Cyber  secu-
rity concerns have also been raised regarding possible attacks against rail computer 
networks and communication and control systems. 

Question  2.  What  steps  is  the  TSA  currently  taking  to  address  these  concerns? 
More specifically with regard to passenger rail, what are the various layers of secu-
rity that are now deployed to secure passenger rail systems? 

Answer. DHS, primarily through the efforts of TSA, has undertaken initiatives to 
strengthen the security of the Nation’s surface transportation systems. TSA has re-
cently  increased  its  focus  on  the  security  of  surface  modes  of  transportation,  and 
while  efforts  are  still  largely  in  the  early  stages,  they  demonstrate  the  various  lay-
ers  of  security  that  TSA  has  developed  to  secure  passenger  rail  and  mass  transit 
systems. These security efforts include: (1) assessing risk by conducting threat, criti-
cality,  and  vulnerability  assessments  of  passenger  rail  and  mass  transit  assets;  (2) 
developing  and  issuing  mandatory  rail  security  directives  and  recommended  vol-
untary best practices for mass transit and passenger rail; (3) issuing a notice of pro-
posed  rulemaking  that  would  add  additional  security  requirements  for  passenger 
rail  operations;  (4)  collaborating  with  the  American  Public  Transportation  Associa-
tion (APTA) on industry-wide security standards for mass transit systems; (5) hiring 
and deploying surface transportation security inspectors who are conducting compli-
ance  inspections  of  the  top  100  transit  agencies;  (6)  conducting  Visible  Intermodal 
Protection and Response (VIPR) operations at transit agencies throughout the coun-
try  and  (7)  distributing  grant  monies  to  transit  agencies  for  security  enhancements 
through the Transit Security Grant Program. 

To date, TSA has largely focused its freight rail security efforts on addressing the 
risks  posed  by  the  transportation  of  TIH  materials.  For  example,  since  2004,  TSA 
has been meeting with rail carriers operating in major U.S. cities to assess the secu-
rity  status  of  these  materials  while  in  transit.  Additionally,  in  June  and  November 
2006,  TSA  and  DOT  jointly  developed  and  issued  27  recommended  security  action 
items, or best practices, for the rail transportation of TIH materials. These 27 action 
items  address  a  range  of  actions  that  were  to  be  taken  to  protect  TIH  being  trans-
ported  by  rail  including  for  example,  maintaining  systems  to  locate  rail  cars  trans-
porting TIH materials, and inspect rail cars containing TIH materials for any appar-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

66 

ent signs of tampering, sabotage, attached explosives, and other items. Also, in De-
cember  2006,  TSA  issued  a  proposed  rulemaking  that  would  require,  among  other 
things, that rail carriers incorporate specific processes into their operating practices 
to  mitigate  the  security  risks  posed  by  TIH  materials.  For  example,  the  rule  would 
require rail carriers, shippers, and receivers of certain hazardous materials, includ-
ing  TIH,  to  establish  and  provide  for  a  secure  chain  of  custody  and  control  for  rail 
cars in their possession containing these types of materials. However, this proposed 
rule has not yet been finalized. 

In addition to GAO’s ongoing work on mass transit security and freight rail secu-
rity, we are also conducting reviews of commercial vehicle security and highway in-
frastructure security. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:01 Aug 01, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\75355.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

